A2
THE
BANNER OF TEMPERANCE.
MIKE SMILEY.
By Father Frane
.
Such stuff are Yankees made of.
CHAPTER I.
There
is a small village on the west bank of the
Connecticut, not many miles from the point where the
boundaries of three states meet. The houses, at the
time our tale commences, were few and scattered; and
there was nothing in the aspect of the greater part of
them that would either attract the attention or invite
the stay of the passing traveller. They were low,
dark, without ornament, either of architecture, or
horticulture
,
and almost without any of the ordinary signs
of comfort, which so commonly accompany the cottage
of a New England farmer. The fences which here
and there appeared in broken patches, straggling, or
rather staggering from field to field, or from house to
house, indicated both the care and thrift of a former
generation which placed them there in due order and
stability, and the degeneracy of the present, which had
left them to decay and the winds. Every thing about
the village was in keeping with the fences, and, as a
matter of course, the animals and the children, (I
name them in the order of apparent intelligence and
cultivation,) were in no keeping at all. The fields
were the best possible illustration that modern times
can afford, of the garden of the sluggard, so well
described
by Solomon; except that, in this case, the soil
seemed to be so utterly exhausted, that even the brier
refused to grow there, and the thistle scorned to be
seen in the stinted growth to which alone it could
attain. The white-headed children, and the equally
white-bodied pigs, among whom they played and rolled
in their dirt, as their fit companions and equals, gave
to the passer-by the only signs of life the village
afforded
,
save when, occasionally, a broken-down, withered
figure of a woman, issued from the door of her hut,
to draw water from the common well, or gather up a
few chips, or, more probably, abstract another rail from
the useless fence, to keep alive the scanty embers that
were smoking on the cheerless hearth.
It was about noon of a sultry day in August, when a
traveller on horseback rode slowly through the village,
on his way to the mansion of a friend, about five miles
above, on the banks of the river, but within the
precincts
of the same town, of which the village was a
part. He was tall, well formed, and handsome. His
dress was that of a sportsman, and a beautiful pointer
that panted lazily after him, with his feverish tongue
hanging as if it would drop from his mouth, confirmed
the suspicion suggested by his dress. The horse and the
rider were evidently equally languid and fatigued; and
at every cottage as they passed, there seemed to be on
the countanence of each an expression of despairing
disappointment, that no one offered any temptation for
even a temporary halt to man or beast. From the
outward appearance, a sojourn in any of them would
have been any thing but repose or refreshment to the
traveller, while the shadeless aspect of the yards and
fields would but leave the horse exposed to the
unmitigated
heat of the sun.
Fatigue and thirst, however, are urgent solicitors,
and, in their extremes, not over fastidious. They
would not be denied; and our traveller, after turning
in disgust from seven, made a desperate resolve that
at all events the next house should furnish what it
could for his relief. As he approached it, his courage
began to fail, for, if possible, it looked more cheerless
than any he had passed. But his mind once made
up, he seldom allowed himself to hesitate; and, with
a firm hand he turned the head of his over-wearied
beast towards the door of the miserable tenement in
which old Zeb Smiley, familiarly known in the
neighbourhood
as Giant Zeb, had been for three-score and
seven years content to vegetate, and to see a
numerous
progeny of stripling giants of the same name,
awake to the same kind of equivocal life, and creep
through the same kind of semi-vegetable existence.
Wallowing in the dirt before the door, was the last of
the many representatives of Giant Zeb, to whom the
name of Hopeful Mike, selected for its peculiar
inappropriateness
,
had now become as familiar as his own
thoughts. Noticing the first inclination of the
traveller
to turn aside at his father's door, he scrambled up
from the dirt, shook his rags, somewhat as a shaggy
water-dog would do on emerging from the water; and
with a regard for decency which appeared singular in
such a place, and such a person, adjusted the more
important of them, so as to make them as available as
possible. Finding that the traveller was actually
intent
upon alighting, Mike made bold to seize the
bridle
,
and to ask, in a very respectful manner, if he
might hold the horse.
There is little fear, replied the stranger, that he
will attempt to move, for he is so overcome by the
heat, that he is scarcely able to put one foot before the
other. If you will bring me a pail of water I will
thank you.
Pleased with any thing that afforded even a momen
tary relief from the stagnant monotony of mere being,
Mike rushed into the hovel, and immediately
re-appeared
with an odd-looking, and exceedingly
antiquated
apology for a bucket, accommodated, in the
absence
of its original iron handle, with a rope which had
seen much service. He was followed, on the instant,
by as poor and shrivelled piece of mortality as ever
claimed the name of woman, screaming after him in
a tone quite above the practical gamut, between the
laboured wheeze of the asthma, and the screech of
extreme
terror. You lazy, good-for-nothing little
varmint
,
B
what are ye doing with my water? Bring it
back, this moment, or I'll skin ye alive.
Surprised at a sight, so unusual, as a gentleman
halting at her door, Mrs. Smiley no sooner put her
ungainly visage out of the humble portal than she
withdrew it again to consider what could be the
possible
design of so unexpected a visit. Unwilling to
intrude upon the rights, or disregard the wishes of even
the most humble individual, the courteous stranger
approached the door and apologized for the disturbance
he had occasioned, by explaining the circumstance
of his long and weary ride in the heat of the day, his
extreme fatigue, and the absolute necessity of
obtaining
some refreshment for his horse before he could
proceed, and adding, that he had asked of her boy
the favour of a bucket of water for his horse.
True politeness never fails to win its way to the
heart, even of a savage. And he who would soothe
and subdue a woman, has only to use a gentle
courteous
,
conciliating address, and his purpose is
accomplished
.
In a mild and gratified tone, Mrs. Smiley
assured the stranger he was entirely welcome to any
thing her miserable hut could afford, which was little
enough, to be sure, for such a gentleman. She wished
it was better, but
I beg you will make no apologies, interrupted
the stranger. It is I who should apologize for
disturbing
your house, and not you for your lack of
means to entertain me. It is not for myself that I
need attention so much as for my beast; and, if you
will allow me, I will see what I can do for his
refreshment
.
While this brief conversation was going on, Mike
had begun to busy himself with the horse, and he
showed so much skill and aptness in hostelry, that the
traveller, when he turned that way, was fain to leave
to him the task he had intended to perform with his
own hands. Heated and reeking as the noble
animal
then was, it was as much as his life was worth
to set before him so large a bucket of water. But
Mike evidently understood his business, though it
would be difficult to conjecture where he had ever had
an opportunity to handle a horse before, or to learn
how he should be treated. The operation occupied
some ten or fifteen minutes, during which the weary
traveller sat upon a rude bench, near the door of the
hovel, watching the movements of the boy, and
wondering
in himself how he could have acquired so
much knowledge of hostelry.
You have been well taught, my boy, said he,
in the care of horses. There are few experienced
grooms who could have done it better, and certainly
none who would have been more faithful. Where
did you learn this art?
I never larnt nothing, replied the boy, still
continuing
to rub down the breast and legs of the beast
with unabated zeal, and occasionally dashing a cool
handful into his nostrils. I never larnt nothing, only
I heard Jim, the stage-driver, when he stopped one
day at Uncle Nat's shop to have a shoe fastened,
scolding at Sam for giving his horses water to drink
when it would do them more good to put it on their
legs, with a leetle washing of their tongues and noses,
besides being a tarnal sight safer than drinking when
they were all in a lather.
There was nothing remarkable in this long speech
of Mike's except its length; and it is doubtful if he
had ever before put so many words together in one
sentence. But there was a heartiness of tone and
accent about it that attracted the notice of the
stranger
;
and when, a few minutes after, as he was in the
act of remounting his saddle, he slipped a piece of
money into the hand of the astonished and delighted
boy, with many thanks for the service he had rendered,
he added a word of courteous encouragement, and a
prediction that he would one day be master of a horse
of his own.
The suggestion touched the deepest chord that had
ever vibrated in the heart of Hopeful Mike.
Stagnant
and uneventful as his brief life had been, he had
not been without an occasional aspiration after
something
higher. He had dreamed of being something
and doing something for himself. He had even
soared so high in his dreams, as to imagine it possible
that he might, at some future day, attain to the
dignity
of a stage-driver. This was his climax of human
greatness. He had never seen a character of so much
importance, one whose periodical arrival was so
anxiously waited for and so heartily welcomed, or one
whose authority in all matters was so absolute, as that
of Jim Crawford, the good-natured driver of the
Connecticut
river stage.
CHAPTER II.
A few
days after this incident, Mike was indulging
himself in this day-dream of ambition, as he lay,
stretched at full length on the bank of the river, in
the shade of the noble elm. His thoughts could
hardly be said to have any definite shape or end, but
straggled on in a kind of disjointed reverie,
occasionally
interrupted by a low whistling soliloquy, to which
he was much addicted. Suddenly, his quick ear was
arrested by the distant tramping of a horse. Starting
quickly up, he was surprised to see a noble animal,
which he recognized at once as the same which now
occupied most of his thoughts, in the act of leaping a
broad ditch that intersected the field some sixty or
eighty rods from the place where he was. He was
fully caparisoned, but without a rider. The leap was
one that by common consent would have been called
impossible; but it was accomplished with apparent
ease. Tossing his head wildly, the beautiful creature,
the very embodiment of untameable beauty and
power, flew with the speed of the wind towards a
deep and broken ravine that separated the open field
from a thick and tangled wood beyond.
To follow at the top of his speed was only a
natural
impulse with Mike. He did not ask himself what
was to be gained by it. The object of his pursuit was
soon out of sight, but not out of hearing. Guided by
B2
his ear, Mike kept on the chase till he caught another
glimpse of the flying animal just dashing over the
brow of a precipice some twenty feet high, from which
he conceived it impossible that he could ever be
brought back alive. In an instant more, however, he
was seen darting across the interval below towards
the river, into which he flung himself with a plunge,
that seemed as if he had intended to span its entire
breadth at a leap.
Powerfully and beautifully he dashed aside the
waters, and was soon on the opposite shore. The
bank was high, steep, and sandy. The spot where
he landed was only a little narrow shelf of rock, two
or three rods in length, the bank at either end being
as precipitous as that on the side. There was
therefore
no escape except through the water. Thus
suddenly
cut off in his flight, he paused a moment
unresolved
,
and then plunged in again, and made his
way rapidly towards the other shore.
Mike had watched all his motions with intense
interest
,
and well knowing that his blood would be
cooled and his mettle reduced, as well as his strength
much exhausted by this effort, prepared to receive
him in the best way he could. Concealing himself
in the thick bushes that overhung the bank, at the
point where, from the direction taken, he supposed
the horse would come out, he waited for that moment
of suspended power, when the effort to swim gives
way to the struggle for a footing on the shore; and
then suddenly and boldly seizing the rein, made an
easy prisoner of the nearly exhausted fugitive.
Securing his charge to a tree, he began to think
that it was time to look for his master. He
accordingly
hastened towards the place where the horse had
been first seen. Reaching the other side of the gully,
he gave a loud halloo! Hearing no response, he
followed the track a few rods, till it was lost in a
small thicket. Repeating his cry at the entrance of
the wood, with a clear, long, earnest breath, he thought
he heard a very indistinct reply, as of some one at a
great distance. Raising his voice to its highest pitch,
he reiterated the call. A low, faint moan, as of one
in extreme pain and weakness, now fell on his ear.
Making his way quickly in the direction from which
it came, he soon found the body of his late friend, the
young traveller, lying in a most painful position,
across the trunk of a fallen tree, and covered with
blood, from a wound in the head.
Exerting all the strength he could command, which
was very great for one of his years, Mike raised the
body from the tree, and laid it gently on the ground,
placing a large tuft of moss for a pillow. He then
ran to a little brook, which discharged itself into the
river, a few yards below, and rolling up two of the
broadest leaves he could find into a conical form, for
a cup, filled them both with water, which he dashed
into the face of the wounded man. This he repeated
two or three times, and then, with a sponge of moss,
wiped away the blood from the temples and hair.
The sufferer was so far revived by these attentions,
as to open his eyes, though still unconscious.
Encouraged
by this sign of returning life, Mike renewed
his efforts. At length the lips parted, as it were, by
instinct, and the cooling draught found its way to
the parched tongue and throat. This was repeated
several times, with the happiest effect. The poor
man opened his eyes again, and looked about him.
For some time he was bewildered and it was many
minutes before he could recall to his memory the
countenance of his kind attendant, or account to
himself
for his own singular situation. At length, after
another full draught from the cooling brook, he was
so far recovered as to be able to speak. With the
warmest thanks, and assurances of a more substantial
remembrance to his deliverer, from whom he had
learned the story of the flight, and re-capture of his
horse, he recounted the circumstances which brought
him into his present sad condition.
He had set out in the morning, on a fox-hunt in
company with his friend, Charles Wilkins, and some
of his neighbours. The party had separated at a
considerable
distance from each other, when suddenly
the signal was given on the opposite side of the
valley, and all set off at full speed in that direction.
He was following rapidly, when another fox started
from a little thicket, and flew across his track.
Instantly
changing his course, he gave chase,
determined
to have the sport all to himself. He was
gaining
fast upon his game, when, in leaping over the
fallen tree, where Mike had found him, his head must
have come in violent contact with the projecting
point of a broken limb, which he did not see in
season
to avoid it. Stunned by the blow, and thrown
backward, he fell athwart the trunk, with no power
to move; and in that position he must have lain a full
half hour or more, when Mike discovered him. A
half hour longer, and probably life would have been
extinct.
As soon as he felt able to be left alone for a few
minutes, Mike was despatched for assistance. A
litter
was brought, the sufferer was carefully placed
upon it, and, followed, by his horse, which Mike had
the proud satisfaction of being permitted to lead,
conveyed
back to the house of his friend, Charles
Wilkins
.
From that day a new era dawned upon the hopes
of Hopeful Mike. Eugene Ralstonfor that was
the name of his patron, whose life he had so
singularly
been instrumental in savingimmediately
claimed him as his own, and, with the ready consent
of his parents, installed him as groom to his favourite
charger. His rags were exchanged for a neat suit of
iron-gray cassimere, a glazed cap with a broad gilt
band, and other equipments to correspond. The story
of his kind attentions, and ready ingenuity in
relieving
the distressed sportsman, as well as his success
in waylaying and capturing his horse, was in every
body's mouth. His name was honourably mentioned
in the newspapers, in connexion with the accident
that had befallen Mr. Ralston. And it was now
manifest
to all, that, if there was any thing in Mike to
build upon, his fortune was made.
CHAPTER III.
Eugene Ralston
belonged to one of the most
respectable
and wealthy families in New England;
and Mike, as the preserver of his life, was the object
of the regard and gratitude of all his friends. He was
immediately placed at school, where he made such
rapid progress, as, in the course of a few months, to
shoot ahead of some who had enjoyed the same
privileges
from their earliest childhood.
Emerging so suddenly from the total darkness and
stagnant inactivity of his early life, into the broad
blaze of comfort, intelligence, and respectability, it
would not have been surprising if he had been
entirely
overcome by the change, and thrown into the
back-ground. But there was, in the original elements
of his character, something substantial to build upon.
He could not have remained in his own native village
to the age of manhood, without rising above the level
of all about him. And now, when he had every
advantage
,
and every encouragement, which the glorious
system of New England education could afford, he
seemed, almost at a single stride, to measure the
distance
between midnight and morningbetween the
condition of semi-barbarism and that of civilization
and refinement, such as is found in the metropolis.
Every thing was newevery thing was surprising.
He could sometimes hardly believe the evidence of
his senses, or realize that the race of beings with
whom he was now associated was a part of the same
family with those among whom he had always lived.
He was less dazzled by the splendour and luxury of
the city, than awed and elevated by the sense of human
power, as exhibited in the wonderful achievements of
intelligence, skill, and industry. Young as he was,
he perceived, almost at a glance, that it was not so
much wealth, as a well-directed intelligence, and a
high moral estimate of the true ends and aims of life,
that constituted the difference between the state of
society to which he was now introduced, and that
which he had left. And he at once resolved that no
effort should be wanting on his part, to secure all the
advantages which his new situation afforded him. He
therefore applied himself with a diligence and zeal
that could not have failed, even with powers far
inferior
to his own, to reap a large and rich reward. His
progress was rapid and easy; so much so, that a year
had not passed before Mr. Ralston perceived, that to
carry out his original design, of attaching Mike to
himself as a servant, would be doing him great
injustice
.
He not only made himself acquainted with every
subject that was brought before him, but he mastered
it; as far at least as he had means to do so. And the
attempt to hold him in a subordinate situation, could
not have been long successful, if it had been made.
It was as much to the credit of Mike's heart, as his
progress in learning was to that of his head, that, from
the very dawning of his better fortune, he never lost
sight of his parents, or his native village. He denied
himself every indulgence for the pleasure of
contributing
to the comfort of his mother. Many were the
tokens of kindness sent to her during the year; and
they were always such as were best adapted to her
circumstances.
It was nearly two years from the time that Mike
left home, before he was able to make his parents a
visit. And then, when his old friend, Jim, the
stage-driver
,
drew up at the door of his father's hut, instead
of leaping out, as he thought he should, and shouting
at the top of his voice, he buried his face in his hands,
and burst into tears. He had never realized, till that
moment, the utter desolation of the home of his youth,
the entire absence of all that constitutes the comforts
of life, in the lot of his parents.
Halloo there, Mike, what are you about? said
Jim, throwing down the steps of the stage with a slam
that brought Mrs. Smiley to the door, to see what was
the matter. In an instant the tears were wiped away,
and Mike was in his mother's arms. Poor woman!
she could hardly believe her eyes. Was it possible
that this brave-looking young man was her own Mike!
She put him from her a moment; and examined him
from head to foot, without saying a word, and then,
with all a mother's heart, strained him to her bosom,
saying, Mike, you are a good boy, Mike, to
remember
your poor old mother, and then burst into tears.
Jim wiped a drop from his eye, as he mounted his box
and drove off, saying to himself, Well, I have heard
of people crying for joy, but I never believed it before.
It was a sad visit for poor Mike. Every blessing
that he had enjoyed during the last two years, every
comfort he possessed, was now remembered only to
aggravate the contrast between his own lot, and that
of his parents. It made him perfectly miserable to
look about him; for he felt that as yet, he had no
power to effect any substantial change in their
condition
.
He poured out the fulness of his heart to his
mother, who was so happy in the good fortune of her
boy, as never to have thought that any material
change in her own lot could result from it.
4 C
But what can I do, mother? said Mike, earnestly,
what
can
I do? I must, and will do something. It
makes me perfectly miserable to have so many
comforts
,
while you are so poor and wretched. God
helping
me, it shall not be.
Starting suddenly up, as he said this, he was met
by Giant Zeb, who tumbled in at the door, just in
time to hear the last words.
What's that that shall not be? and who's that
that says so? stammered the old man, with the
peculiar
tone and accent, or, rather, with the accentless
and toneless utterance of an habitual inebriate.
Mike was struck aback in a moment. His cup
was fullhe could not speak. His father tumbling
stupidly into the first chair he could reach, did not
notice him, and he stood a moment as in doubt
whether to speak, or to steal away and weep alone.
But the doubt was instantly dissipated by the sharp
voice of his mother, screaming bitterly, Why, Zeb,
so drunk that you can't see Mike?
Father, said Mike, extending his hand, don't
you know me?
Know you?let me see, replied the old man,
rousing himself up,what you, Mike? Why, what
a fine gentleman!come, go down to Tim's, and
treat all round, by way of welcome home. Ha! ha!
ha! Mikefine gentlemanplenty of money now
let's have another drink.
It was with much difficulty that the old man was
diverted from this thought. He was too far gone to
reason. After some time Mike succeeded in coaxing
him to lie down on the bed, where he soon fell into
a deep sleep, from which he did not awake till a late
hour the next morning.
Mike did not close his eyes that night. He was in
a perfect agony of spirit. The whole truth had flashed
upon his mind in an instant, when the giant frame
of his father, reduced to the feebleness of infancy,
with scarcely the instinct of a brute, left to guide its
motions, tumbled in at the door of his hut, and settled,
rather than sat down, in the broken chair by his side.
He wondered he had not seen it before. Here was
the whole secret of the poverty and wretchedness
about him.
Rum, rum;
that was the fire that had
eaten out the substance and the souls of all that
desolate
village, and consumed parents and children for
many generations. It was like a new revelation to
his mind. He had seen men intoxicated a thousand
times before. He had seen
gentlemen
, as they were
called, carried home in a state of helplessness, from
a dinner-party, and from the society of
ladies
, who
had furnished the temptation, and plied it with all
the seductive arts of flattery which woman has ever
at command. It was a national epidemic; and no
eye had yet been opened to measure, and no voice
raised to deprecate its fearful ravages, though myriads
of hearts had been made desolate by it, though
widows and orphans had perished by millions in its
path, and the almshouses and the graveyards of the
country were teeming with its annually increasing
multitudes of victims.
202
CHAPTER IV.
The
subject had taken such hold of Mike's thoughts,
that it excluded all others. He could not sleep that
night. He did not even attempt it; but sat down
near a little old table, and leaning upon his elbows,
with his face upon his hands, he endeavoured to
measure
the length, and depth, and height, and breadth of
that awful evil. For a long time he was overwhelmed
with its magnitude and omniprevalence. To move
it, seemed like re-constructing the whole framework
of society. He did not know where it was possible
to make a beginning. At length he remembered that
nothing was ever accomplished without a beginning;
and beginnings always seem very feeble and
inadequate
to their end; and the world laughs at them.
But upon them all revolutions depend. And so,
said he, striking his hand upon the table, with some
violence, I'll begin: but how? where? and he
pondered long and deeply.
Let me see, said Mike, at length, as he broke
from his reverie, and drew out a pencil and paper
from his pocket, how much does it cost my poor
father every year for rum? He drinks, upon the
average, and has done so, probably, for fifty years,
six glasses of rum a-day. This, at four cents a glass,
is a quarter of a dollar a-day, or a dollar and three
quarters every week, or ninety-one dollars a year.
Ninety-one dollars a year!
exclaimed the astonished
youth; and this, in fifty years, amounts towhat?
impossible!FOUR THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED AND
FIFTY DOLLARS!!
Mike was overwhelmed with the results of these
simple calculations.
Four thousand, five hundred
and fifty dollars!
for one man to consume in making
a beast of himself. What a little fortune that would
be! Mike went on. The man who spends this sum
for rum, loses at least twice as much every year, in
being unfitted for labour; and as much more in the
waste and destruction of his goods and propertythe
health and comfort of his family which result from
intemperance. Here then, is more than
twenty
thousand
dollars
, which one man has sacrificed to the
appetite
for strong drink. And there arelet me think
one, two, threetwenty men, in this poor, desolate
village, each of whom has been as deeply devoted to
his cup as my father; and what does all this amount
to?
Four hundred thousand dollars
!! Ah! I see
through it all; enough to make any man a prince;
and this accounts for the fact, that Tim Cochrane is
the only man in the village who owns a decent house,
or ever has any thing comfortable for his family. All
this money goes into his pocket. Ah! I have itI
have it
Mike could scarcely wait for the morning, so eager
was he to lay these astounding results before his father
and the neighbours. They grew upon his imagination
every moment, as the night advanced; and, at the
earliest peep of day, having commended himself and
his cause to God, he left his little room, and sallied
out into the field, to refresh himself for the day's work
that was before him. He had found a place to begin
it, and he was resolved, however hopeless it might
seem, to begin at once, and do what he could.
He could not refrain from opening his budget first
to his mother; for he felt bitterly, how terribly she
had suffered from that dreadful scourge. But the
poor woman had suffered so long that it seemed to her
as necessary and unavoidable as death. She had never
dreamed of relief or comfort, but in the grave. She
stared wildly, when Mike told her of the money that
had been worse than wasted, in that poor, desolate place.
She did not believe there was so much money in the
world. Ah! it is no use, Mike, said she, it's no
use; you might as well try to stop the river flowing.
But Mike would not think so; and he waited for
his father to rouse himself from that death-like apathy
But he found him a desperately hard subject. He
would not believe the figures. He would not believe
any thing. Besides, he could as well live without
air as without rum. Mike was as persevering as
his father was obstinate. He would not leave
him till he had made him count it over his fingers,
and reckon it up for himself; and then he was obliged
to acknowledge, that his rum cost him within a
fraction of one hundred dollars a year. He did not
suppose, at first, that he ever had as much money in
any one year of his life. He was really alarmed.
But come, said he, let's go down to Uncle Nat's
and see what he'll say to it.
Mike felt ready to face the whole world, for he knew
he was right; he knew that figures, if placed right,
always tell the truth. So he accompanied his father
to Uncle Nat's. The smithy was next door to Tim
Cochrane's; and there was never a shoe set, or a nail
driven, that Tim did not reap the benefit of it. In
that smithy, before an audience of some ten or twelve
of the most ragged, squalid, filthy looking beggars
that were ever brought together in one place, out of
the almshouse, was delivered, by Mike Smiley, the first
tee-total temperance lecture that ever was attempted
in these United States. The congregation was motley,
irregular, and not so thoroughly open to conviction
as could have been desired. It was some time before
Mike could gain any thing like general attention.
But when Uncle Nat, who was considered good at
figures, had examined the whole statement carefully
marking it down with chalk on the dingy walls of his
shop, and finally, though very reluctantly, was
compelled
to acknowledge that it was entirely correct, the
whole company opened their eyes wide with
astonishment
,
and stood gaping at each other, as if they had
lost the power of speech.
At this moment, Mike jumped upon the anvil, with
his paper in his hand, and commenced a set speech.
He explained fully the results to which his figures
led, and showed clearly, that there was not a man
before
him who had not already expended in rum, and
in the losses occasioned by rum, a handsome fortune.
He pointed to their fields, which might have been, if
properly cared for, as rich and fruitful as any on the
banks of their noble river. He pointed to their hovels,
and asked what made the degrading contrast between
them and the palaces of some of the farmers of that
beautiful valley. He pointed to their wives, who
were little better than slaves, leading a miserable,
half-starved, comfortless life, in the midst of a land
flowing with milk and honey. He pointed to their
childrenbut he could not sketch that pictureand
then to their own persons, and the sketch he gave of
them was such as actually made those hardened old
sots blush and feel ashamed to be seen of each other.
Mike saw his advantage. I am but a boy, said
he, and why do I speak so? Because I love you.
I am one of you; bone of your bone, and flesh of your
flesh. There is my father; and there, yonder, wiping
a tear from his eye, my poor old mother. You are
all my friends; and I cannot bear to go back to the
comforts and blessings which are provided for me, in
my new home, and feel that I have left you in this
unhappy condition. Have I not told you the truth?
Is it not rum that makes all the difference between us?
How many comforts would not that hundred dollars
a year purchase for your wives and children! How
differently would your houses look if you should spend
it upon them! How differently would
you
look if
you should spend it in clothing, and in
wholesome
food. How differently would this whole
village
look if that
four hundred thousand dollars
,
which you have drunk up in rum, had been laid out
in improving your lands, repairing and ornamenting
your houses, educating your children, making your
wives comfortable, and making menyes, making
men
of yourselves! Are you men now? Look at
yourselves
look
at each otherare you men? Do you
look as if you had minds?souls?hearts?
Surprised at his own boldness, Mike jumped down
from his rostrum, and taking his father by the hand,
begged he would forgive him if he had spoken too
plainly. The whole audience was confounded. They
had been taken by surprise. Every man of them was
convinced; but habit long indulged gains a terrible
advantage over conscience. An impression was made,
but it needed to be followed up, blow upon blow, to
make it effective and lasting.
Giant Zeb was the first to break silence, I tell
you what, Uncle Nat, said he, the boy's right.
But what can we do?
Do? answered Tim Cochrane, who stepped in
just at this moment from behind the door, where he
overheard the whole; do? come into my shop, and
I'll tell you what to do.
The whole charm was broken in an instant. In
vain did Mike plead and beseech his father not to go.
In vain did he remind them of all his figures. Uncle
Nat led the way and they all followed. What
followed
that, need not be told.
D
CHAPTER V.
Mike
made a very prudent use of all the little
savings
of his wages, in putting the house into more
comfortable
order for his mother. When he returned to Mr.
Ralston's he took an early opportunity to call the
attention
of that gentleman to the figures he had made
at home. Mr. Ralston, though a temperate man for
those days, was astonished at the result. He gave
the subject his serious attention. He assisted Mike
in getting at some further statistics upon the subject.
Mike pursued it with the ardour of a man whose heart
is in his work. The further he proceeded the more
he was astonishedoverwhelmed. At length, he
ventured
to put his investigations in the form of an essay,
which he sent to one of the leading journals of the
city, with the signature,
Total Abstinence
.
That article was the leader of one of the
mightiest
revolutions that ever swept over the face of
society
.
It was copied into all the papers. It attracted
universal attention. It was talked of in all the streets,
and at every table, and at every fireside. It was
fiercely
attacked on every side, and that by some of the
ablest pens in the nation. But its positions were
impregnable
.
Not one of them was ever refuted, or
even so much as shaken. They are to this day, the
grand colossal columns that support the central dome
of the Temple of Temperance.
This essay was followed up by others, by the same
hand. And when, by-and-by, it came out, that the
mover of all this far-reaching excitement, was an
humble lad scarcely nineteen years of age, in an
inferior
station in society, the excitement became still
deeper and more general. Mike was called outnot
to fight, as would perhaps have been the case if all
this had happened elsewherebut to explain himself
more fully.
So well had he availed himself of the advantages
to which his relation to Mr. Ralston had introduced
him, that he did not hesitate, after consultation with
that gentleman, and receiving his approbation, to
propose
a public lecture. This was attended by a
crowded
audience, who were astounded at the fearful
picture
of the then state of our country. So many
desired
to hear it who could not be accommodated, that
it was necessary to repeat it. Then it was called for
in other places. Every where it produced a marked
impression. It excited inquiry. It provoked
discussion
.
It led to self-examination.
Mike's hands were now full. He had made his
beginning, and a noble beginning it was. But where
was it to end? What was the remedy for the
tremendous
evils that were consuming the vitals of society.
On this point the young orator allowed no
compromise
.
It was
total abstinence!
and he laid it down
with great emphasis, showing clearly that this was
the only ground on which the intemperate could ever
hope to become temperate or the temperate to
remain
so.
The results of that grand moral movement are well
known. Look abroad over our fair land, and see
millions
of acres then arid and sterile, now blooming and
fruitful; thousands and tens of thousands of hearths
then desolate, now cheerful and bright as the early
remembrance of homecountless broken widowed
hearts made whole by the returning sunshine of love
and plenty, and whole families, yea, whole
communities
,
then dispersed, divided, hovering around the
purlieus of the almshouse or the prison, now
gathered
,
united, industrious, intelligentas if it were a
nation
born in a day, or a whole tribe redeemed from
servile bondage. Men, fathers, husbands, legislators,
teachers, once raving, delirious, fierce, brutal, now
clothed and in their right minds, risen as it were from
the second death, and standing erect, beloved and
honoured
,
in the high places of our land.
Discouraging as was the prospect in his native
village
,
Mike did not despair. He was frequently there,
and so diligently and faithfully did he ply the
arguments
and persuasions of a heart warm to the life in
his subject, that he succeeded, at length, in obtaining
a solemn promise from his father that he would try
the experiment for one year. Zeb Smiley was a man
of more than ordinary natural abilities, and his
resolution
,
once taken, was proverbially unchangeable.
By his influence, Uncle Nat was brought to the same
stand. Both of them signed their names to the same
paper, and thus each became a sentinel over the other.
The whole neighbourhood of tipplers was in
consternation
.
Tim Cochrane was in a rage. His craft
was in danger. In his passion, he pounced upon
Uncle Nat's forge and tools, to secure the balance of
his score at the counter, and turned him out of his
shop. The effect of this was salutary. Uncle Nat
and Zeb immediately went off together at the
suggestion
of Mike, and, by his aid, secured a valuable
contract
for labour in clearing a new road, which furnished
full and profitable employment for the whole season.
They laboured side by side, encouraging and
strengthening
each other. And daily, as the effects of their
old habits wore off, and their strength, physical and
mental, increased, they found their toils grow
sweeter
and lighter. Mike continued his labours in the
village, till he obtained the names of more than
two-thirds
of the old topers to his pledge. By the aid of
Mr. Ralston, he set up a temperance store, which
was kept by one of his cousins; and, before the year
was out, Tim Cochrane was obliged to move away
for want of customers to sustain his business.
Go through that village now, and what a change!
The houses are all neatly painted or white-washed, the
fences in good repair, the fields waving with plentiful
harvests, or green and blooming with the first
promise
of the year. The daily gathering of bright-faced,
happy throngs of children to the school-house, and
the Sabbath meeting of a grave, decent, devout
congregation
of parents in the house of God, all tell of
the marvellous, the almost miraculous change that has
come over the scene. If the story had been told
fifty
,
or even twenty years ago, it would have been set
down for fictiona picture that might look well on
paper, but could never be reduced to real life. But
we have seen it with our own eyes. We know the
spot. We know many of them, and if it is worth a
voyage across the Atlantic to see Herculaneum and
Pompeii recovered, all dead and silent and soulless,
from the burial of ages, what is it not worth to the
heart of a philanthropist, to see hamlets and villages
and towns recovered from a moral burial, and not only
dwellings and fields thrown open to the reviving light
and showers of heaven, but their occupants restored
to life, and health, and beauty, and men, women, and
children, husbands and wives, fathers and mothers,
young men and maidens, rejoicing together, and
blessing
God and each other in their marvellous
resurrection
from the dead.
CHAPTER VI.
Mike Smiley
now became an object of public
notice
.
Mr. Ralston, who was struck with his singular
ability to master whatever he undertook, encouraged
him to prosecute his studies to the utmost, freely
advancing
him all the means necessary to the
accomplishment
of an object so near his heart. When his
education was completed, and he was admitted to the
bar, Mr. Ralston took him into his own office, the
better
to introduce him to the routine of business.
He had been but a few months in this situation,
when a singular accident occurred, which greatly
assisted
in bringing him into the very foreground of his
profession. Mr. Ralston had been engaged in a very
important case, which had been contested for many
years, and which was now about to be brought to a
close. The parties were both eager for an immediate
issue, but Mr. Ralston's client had procured a long
delay, in order to bring up some witnesses, who had
been long absent at sea. All was now ready, and the
day of trial fixed. Mike, who, in hunting up
authorities
,
copying and comparing documents, and writing
out heads of arguments, had made himself acquainted
with all the principles involved, as well as with the
facts in the case, had entered it with all the energy
and ardour of his soul. The court was held in a
county-town, about thirty miles from the city. Mike,
or rather, Mr. Smiley, had gone thither by the stage.
Mr. Ralston, for the benefit and pleasure of the
exercise
,
went on horseback, on the same noble steed by
whose means our young hero was first made
acquainted
with his patron, and now partner. The horse
was somewhat advanced in years, but had lost very
little of his early fire and beauty.
A few miles from the city it was necessary to cross
a bridge, over a narrow creek, or arm of the sea, in
the middle of which was an ill-constructed draw, for
the benefit of vessels occasionally passing up and
down the creek. The draw had been opened that
morning, and though apparently replaced, was not
properly secured. Mr. Ralston was the first to pass
over it, and, being in a profound study upon the
knotty points of his case, did not perceive that any
thing was out of the way. No sooner, however, was
his full weight brought upon the draw, than it gave
way at once, and plunged both the horse and his
rider into the deep water below.
With singular presence of mind, though not
without
great difficulty, Mr. Ralston kept his seat in the
saddle; and his noble steed, not unused to the water,
rising to the surface, struggled bravely to reach the
shore. Here, however, was a difficulty, almost
insurmountable
.
Though the creek was narrow, the bank
was absolutely perpendicular, and of a soft clayey
consistency, that allowed nothing like a foothold.
After many unsuccessful attempts, Mr. Ralston
bethought
himself of an expedient to effect his own
escape
,
if he could not save his horse. Suddenly
springing
to his feet upon the saddle, he gave a powerful
leap toward the bank, and just succeeded in gaining
it, so as to secure himself by grasping the long, tough
grass on its edge. He now took a rail from the fence
near by, and proceeded to break away the sharp angle
of the bank, in the hope that it might make a path
for his horse. In this he was so far successful, that,
in half an hour from the time he commenced, he was
enabled to remount, and ride home. Fortunately he
had emerged from the creek on the side towards the
city, and was, therefore, not obliged to go round a
great distance, in order to procure a change of clothing.
The season was October; and an exposure for so
long a time, to the cold air, in wet clothing, was not
without serious consequences. Mr. Ralston was
obliged to take his bed at once, where he was confined
some weeks, with a violent fever, and in imminent
danger of his life.
In the mean time, the court had assembled, the
parties
were there, with their witnesses, and every thing
waited for the arrival of Mr. Ralston. As it had been
positively arranged, at the previous session, that the
case should come on that day, and that a proposal for
any further continuance from either of the parties,
should be equivalent to a non-suit, the opposing party
endeavoured to avail himself of this unexpected delay,
pretending that it was a premeditated
ruse
, to procure
a respite, which could not be had in any other way.
Mr. Smiley, who fortunately had the satchel, with all
the papers, finding that the day was wearing away,
and knowing that all would be lost, if something were
not done immediately, proposed to the judge to
commence
the case, as Mr. Ralston would undoubtedly
be there in a short time. It was a terrible step for
poor Mike. Not only were hundreds of thousands
pending upon the result, but Mr. Ralston's standing
and fame as a lawyer were at stake. He hoped to be
able to consume time in unimportant preliminaries,
till his partner should arrive.
His partner did not come, however, and it was not
many hours before Mike knew that the whole case
had devolved all at once upon him. His opponents
would not listen to a postponement, though the hand
of Providence had seemed to make it necessary. And
the case came on. Mike was all alone; his whole
frame was agitated; but his mind was clear and bold.
He had grasped all the points in the case; he had
measured the length and breadth of his antagonist;
and with the desperate energy of one who has every
thing to lose, or every thing to gain, in a single throw,
put forth his utmost efforts to do justice to the cause.
It was a wonderful effort. The examination of the
witnessesthe statement of his casethe detection
and exposure of the weak points and sophistries of his
opponentthe laying down of the principles of law
the argument and appeal to the juryall of every part
would have done credit to the most experienced
lawyer
of the bar. It was not only a wonderful effort,
but a successful one, and Mike had the proud
satisfaction
,
at the end of the week, of announcing to Mr.
Ralston, in his sick room, the favourable verdict.
Onward, still onward, was Mike's motto. And
onward, still onward, he marched, rising step by step,
in influence and power, till he reached the Halls of
Congress; and if he does not, at no distant day, fill
the presidential chair, it will be rather because he is
too straight forward and honest for any party, than
because he is wanting in ability to fill the station, or
ambition to aspire to it.
EMMA ALTON.
By Mrs. Caroline H. Butler
.
It
was Emma's bridal morn. I saw her standing
at the door of her father's cottage, a simple wreath of
the pure lily of the valley entwined amid the rich
braids of her auburn hairthe image of innocence
and happiness. That morning, fair Emma Alton had
given her hand where long her young affections had
E
been treasured; and to those who then saw the fine
handsome countenance of Reuben Fairfield, and the
pride and love with which he regarded the fair being
at his side, it seemed impossible that aught but
happiness
could follow the solemn rites the cottage had
that morning witnessed.
The dwelling of my friend to whose rural quiet I
had escaped from the heat and turmoil of the city,
was directly opposite the neat little cottage of Emma's
parents, and as I sat at my chamber window, my eye
was of course attracted by the happy scene before
me. The morning was truly delightfulscarce a
cloud floated o'er the blue vault of heavennow and
then a soft breeze came whispering through the
fragrant
locust blossoms and proud catalpas, then
stooping
to kiss the dewy grass, sped far off in fantastic
shadows over the rich wheat and clover fields. All
seemed in unison with the happiness so apparent at
the cottagethe birds sangbutterflies sported on
golden wingbees hummed busily. Many of Emma's
youthful companions had come to witness the
ceremony
,
and to bid adieu to their beloved associate, for as
soon as the holy rites were concluded, Reuben was to
bear his fair bride to a distant village, where already a
beautiful cottage was prepared, over which she was to
preside the charming mistress.
There is always, I believe, a feeling of sadness
commingled with the pleasure with which we regard
the young and trusting bride, and as I now looked
upon Emma standing in the little portico surrounded
by the bright and happy faces of her companions, her
own still more radiant, I involuntarily sighed as I
thought of what her future lot might be.
Was my
sigh prophetic?
Presently the chaise which was to
convey the new-married pair to their future home,
drove gaily to the gate of the cottage. I saw Emma
bid adieu to her young friends as they all gathered
around her. I saw her fair arms thrown around the
neck of her weeping mother, and then, supported by
her father and Reuben, she was borne to the carriage.
Long was she pressed to her father's heart, ere he
resigned
her for ever to her husband.
God bless you, my child! at length said the old
man; but no sound escaped Emma's lipsshe threw
herself back in the chaise, and drew her veil hastily
over her faceReuben sprang to her sidewaved his
hand to the now weeping assemblage at the cottage
door, and the chaise drove rapidly away.
I soon after left the village, and heard no more of
the youthful pair. Three years elapsed ere I again
visited that pleasant spot, and the morning after my
arrival, as I took my favourite seat, and looked over
upon the little dwelling opposite, the blithe scene I
had there witnessed, recurred to me, and I marvelled
if all which promised so fair on the bridal morn had
been realized. To my eye the cottage did not look as
cheerful, the air of neatness and comfort which before
distinguished it seemed lessened. I noticed the walk
was now overgrown with grass, and the little flower
plot, about which I had so often seen Emma employed,
was now rank with weeds. The blinds were all closely
shut, and every thing about the cottage looked
comfortless
and desolate. Presently the door opened, and
a female appeared, bearing in her hand a small basket
which she proceeded to fill with vegetables growing
sparsely among the weeds and tall tangled grass. Her
step was feeble, and she seemed hardly capable of
pursuing her employment. As she turned her face
toward me I started with surpriseI looked at her
again more earnestlyis it possiblecan that be
Emma
,
thought Ican that pale, wretched looking girl
be her whom I last saw a happy, blooming bride?
Yes, it was Emma! Alas! how soon are the bright
visions of youth dispelled; like those beautiful images
which flit around the couch of dreams, they can never
be realized.
The history of Emma is one which has often been
written by the pen of trutha tearful record of
man's
ingratitude and follyof
woman's
all-enduring love,
sufferance, and constancy.
The first few months of Emma's married life flew
by in unalloyed happiness. Reuben lived but in her
smiles, and life, to the young affectionate girl, seemed
but a joyous holiday, and she the most joyous
participant
.
Too soon the scene was changed. Reuben
Fairfield was of a gay and reckless nature, fond of
conviviality
,
of the jest and song, he was consequently a
great favourite with the young men of the village, and
there had been rumours that even before his marriage
he had been too free a partaker of the wine-cup. If
this were the case, months certainly passed on after
that event, when Reuben seemed indifferent to any
society but that of his young wife. Little by little
his old habits returned upon him, so insensibly too
that even he himself could not probably have defined
the time when he again found pleasure away from the
home of love and Emma. In the only tavern of the
village, a room was devoted exclusively to the revels
of a band of reckless, dissolute young men, with whom
Reuben had at one time been intimate, and it needed
but the slightest appearance on the part of the latter
to tolerate once more their idle carousals, than with
one consent they all united to bring back the Benedict
to his old habits. They thought not of the misery
which would follow the success of their fiendish plot;
of the broken heart of the young being who looked
up to their victim as her only hope and happiness.
It was the gay spring-time, when Reuben Fairchild
bore his bride away from the arms of her aged
parents
;
but what became of the solemn vows he then
uttered, to protect and cherish their beloved daughter?
For when next the forest trees unfolded their tender
leaves, and the orchards were white with fragrant
blossoms, misery and despair had fallen as a blight
upon poor Emma! The heart of affection is the last
to acknowledge the errors of a beloved object, so it
was with Emma; but her cheek grew pale, and her
mild blue eyes dimmed beneath their wo-charged lids.
Reuben now almost entirely neglected his patient,
still loving wife. In vain she reasoned, entreated,
implored, yet
never reproached
. He was alike
regardless
;
daily he gave himself up more and more to the
insatiate destroyer, until destruction, both of soul and
body, followed. And loud rang the laugh, and the
glasses rattled, and the voice of the
Inebriate
shouted
forth its loathsome jargon from the
Tempter's Hell!
There were times, it is true, when he would pause in
his reckless career; and then hope once more buoyed
up the sinking heart of Emma; and when for the
first time he pressed their babe to his bosom, while a
tear fell on its innocent cheek, it is no wonder that
the young mother felt her sorrows ended. That tear,
the tear, as she thought, of repentance, had washed
them all away. But when vice once gets the
ascendancy
,
it reigns like a despot, and too soon the holy
feelings of the
father
were lost in the intoxicating bowl.
Poverty, with all its attendant ills, now came upon
the wretched wife. One by one the articles of her
little
menage
were taken from her by Reuben, to
satisfy
the cravings of
appetite
, and with her babe she
was at last forced to leave the cottage where her early
days of married life so blissfully flew by, and seek
shelter from the winds of heaven in a miserable hut,
which only misery might tenant. The unfortunate
find few friends, and over the threshold of poverty
new ones seldom pass, and therefore it was that
Emma was soon neglected and forgotten. There were
some, it is true, who regarded her with pity and
kindness
,
but there were also very many who pointed the
finger of derision at the
drunkard's wife
innocent
sufferer for her husband's vices! At length the babe
fell ill. It died, and poor, poor Emma, pale,
disconsolate
,
knelt by the little cradle
alone
; no
sympathizing
hand wiped the tear from her eye; no kind word
soothed her lacerated bosom; the earthly friend that
should have sustained her under this grievous trial
was not at her side, but revelling in scenes of low
debauchery.
That night was marked by a storm of terrific
violence
.
The rain poured in torrents; dreadful
thunder
rent the heavens, the whirlwinds uplifted even the
largest trees, while the incessant flashing of the
lightning
only added tenfold horrors to the scene. But
the bereaved mother, the forsaken wife heeded it not;
with her cheek pressed against the scarce colder one
of her dead babe, she remained for hours totally
unconscious
of the wild war of the elementsfor more
complete desolation reigned in her heart. At length
the door opened and Reuben entered. With an oath,
he was about to throw himself upon the straw pallet,
when his eye casually fell upon the pale, marble-like
face of the little babe. His senses, stupified as they
were, aroused at the sight.
What ails the child? he muttered.
Reuben, our darling babe is
dead!
replied
Emma
,
lifting her pallid features to the bloated gaze of
her husband. Then rising from her knees, she
approached
him and led him to look upon the placid
countenance of their first born.
We will not dwell upon the scene; remorse and
grief stirred the heart of Reuben almost to madness.
On his knees he implored forgiveness of his much
injured wife; he swore a solemn oath, that never
again would he swerve from the path of sobriety, but
that years of penitence and affection should atone for
his past abuse of life and love.
The day came for the funeral. Reuben had
promised
his wife that he would not again leave the house
until the remains of their babe had been given to the
earth; he intended to keep his promise, but as the
day wore on the insatiable cries of habit tempted him
away. Only
one glass
, he thought
but another
followed
and
then another, until alike forgetful of
himself
and his unhappy wife, he soon became grossly
intoxicated.
In the mean while a few of the neighbours had
assembled
;
the clergyman, too, had arrived, and the
funeral
rites were only delayed by the absence of
Reuben
.
Minutes wore on.
He will not come, whispered one. Ah, it is
easy to guess where he is, added another, and looks
of pity were turned upon the heart-stricken mother,
as with her head bowed upon the little coffin she hid
her grief and shame. The clergyman at length
approaching
the mourner, in a low tone demanded if
the ceremony should proceed.
Has
he
come? eagerly inquired Emma.
The clergyman shook his head.
O wait, wait, he will be here, he promised me.
O yes he will come!
But another half hour rolled on, and still Reuben
came not. The neighbours now moved to depart, when
rising from her seat, her pallid countenance
betokening
the agony of her heart, Emma signified her
assent
that the solemn rites should proceed. But
suddenly
in the midst of that earnest prayer for comfort and
support to the afflicted mother, a loud shout was heard,
and Reuben was seen staggering towards the hut.
With a brutal oath he burst into the room, but
happily
for poor Emma, she saw him not, the first sound
of his voice had deprived her of consciousness, and
she was placed fainting on the bed. Reuben was
overpowered and dragged from the hutthe funeral
service ended, and leaving the unconscious mother in
the care of a few compassionate neighbours, the little
procession wound its way to the church-yard
It was nearly a year after this sad scene, that one
evening a stranger alighted from the stage at the Inn,
announcing his intention to remain there for the night.
Entering the bar-room (for it was before the
health-establishment
of the temperance law) he ordered a
glass of brandy, which he was about to carry to his
8
lips, when his eye encountered the wistful gaze of
Reuben Fairfield, who now without the means to
allay
the death-worn upon his vitals, was stretched
upon a bench at one end of the room.
I say, neighbour, you look thirsty, ejaculated the
stranger in a gay tone. Here, take this, for faith
thou hast a lean and hungry look
.
Eagerly seizing it, Reuben drained the contents of
the glass to the bottom, and for a moment the worm
was appeased! The stranger now made some casual
remark, to which Reuben replied in language so well
chosen, and evidently so far above his apparent
station
in life, that the former was astonished, and by
degrees a lively conversation took place between
them, during which Reuben more than once partook
of the young man's mistaken kindness. While
conversing
,
the stranger several times drew from his
pocket a handsome gold watch, and the chink of
silver
fell upon the famished ears of Reuben with
startling
clearness. Apparently with that feeling of
ennui
which so often seizes upon the solitary traveller, the
stranger now strolled from the bar-room into the hall,
a door leading into a room opposite was open, and
sounds of loud merriment attracted his eyes in that
direction. A company of young men were playing
at cardswithout ceremony he entered, and,
advancing
to the table, appeared to watch the game with
some interest. He was invited to join them, and, after
some hesitation accepted.
Reuben had followed the young man into the room,
and now eagerly watched the pile of silver, and an
occasional bank note, which rather ostentatiously, it
would seem, the stranger displayed. The evening
wore away, and with a promise from Reuben that he
would awaken him betimes to visit a singular cave in
the neighbourhood, the stranger retired to rest. Not
so Reuben. A fiendish plot entered his brain
that
money must be his
and even at that moment when
robbery, perhaps murder, was at his heart, he dared
to think of the pure-minded, innocent Emma as a
sharer of his ill-gotten wealth! All night he paced
the dark forest contiguous to his abode, where long
after midnight the feeble lamp shone upon the
haggard
features of the once lovely girl as she strove
with trembling fingers to render the apparel of the
inebriate
decent for the morrow.
As the day was breaking, Reuben passed softly
into the cottage, for he knew that Emma now slept,
approaching the bedside, something like a shade of
pity stole over his countenance. She smiled in her
sleep and called upon his namethis was too much
for the miserable man. Hastily opening a table
drawer
,
he drew forth a sharp knife which he concealed
beneath his coat, muttering as he did soI may
need it, and then without daring to cast his eye
again toward the bed, left the house and proceeded to
the inn, where the stranger already awaited his arrival.
With each point of view as they proceeded on their
route the latter expressed himself delighted,
particularly
as his guide, too, endeavoured to give interest to
every scene by the relation of some anecdote or history
attached. At length they reached the neighbourhood
of the cavern. Here the river which before had rolled
so gently along, reflecting the varied hues of
autumn
in its trauslucent depths, now suddenly changed
its course, and leaping over a precipice some thirty
feet in height, pursued its way for some distance
between
huge masses of shelving rocks crowned on
either side by dark gloomy forests. After a laborious
descent they arrived at the mouth of the cave,
situated
about mid-way down the bank. Reuben entered
first, and the stranger was about to follow, when
turning
suddenly upon him with a blow of giant strength,
hurled him from the precipice, and he fell senseless
upon the jagged rocks below! Leaping quickly
down, Reuben now rifled the pockets of the
unfortunate
man of both money and watch, and then drew
him, still breathing, up the ragged cliff and far into
the cave. More than once as he saw life yet stirred
in the limbs of his victim, his hand was upon the
knifebut
he drew it not forth!
Covering the body with fragments of rock and
under-wood
,
he left the hapless man to his fate, certain
that even if consciousness returned, his efforts to
extricate
himself from the mass would be unavailing, and
as he had taken the precaution also to closely bind his
mouth, he could utter no cry for assistance.
Returning now to the village, he boldly entered
the inn, and stating to the landlord that the stranger
had been tempted by the fineness of the morning to
pursue his journey a few miles on foot, proceeded to
hand him a sum of money which he said he had
charged him to deliver as equivalent to the amount
due for supper and lodging. This all appeared very
reasonable and no questions were asked. But ere the
day was over, some boys who had strayed in the
vicinity
of the cave, came running home pale and
frightened
,
declaring they had heard dreadful groans issue
thence, and that many of the rocks around were stained
with blood! Immediately every eye was turned to
the spot where a moment before Reuben Fairfield had
been standing, and although no one spoke, probably
the same terrible conviction flashed through the mind
of each; but
guilt
is always cowardly. Reuben had
already disappeared.
A party of villagers immediately set forth to search
the cave. The result may be imaginedthe stranger
was discovered still alive, although but for this timely
aid, a few hours would doubtless have determined his
fate. Reuben attempted to make his escape, but was
soon overtaken and delivered up to justicefound
guilty, and sentenced to
ten years' hard labour in the
State Prison!
This sad history I learned from my friend; and
now poor Emma had come back
to die!
Come back
to that home she had left with so many bright visions
of happiness before her, a heart-broken, wretched
being
.
It was not long ere from the same little gate,
whence but a few years before I had seen her led a
happy blooming bride, I saw her coffin borne to the
still graveyard!
Ah! thought I, as the hot tears gathered, thou
art but another victim at the shrine of Intemperance!
Rest thee in peace, poor Emma!
F
THE FEAR OF RIDICULE.
One
evening a short time since, five or six young
men, clerks in one of our fashionable stores, were
congregated
together before the entrance of a noted
oyster
saloon. They seemed on the point of entering,
when one of their number hung back, declaring that
he would not go in.
What's the matter, Thompson? exclaimed the
others, what's the matter with you? why don't you
come?
Because I think it wrong, answered the young
man, to visit such places; it is against my
principles
to do it.
A fig for your
principles
, exclaimed one. Why
I thought better of you. I didn't suppose, when you
first came among us, that you would evince so little
real spirit.
I did not think you would urge me to visit such a
place as this, answered Thompson. What would
our employers think of us, were they to see us here
now?
Who cares for them? said another. Let our
employers mind
their
business, and we'll mind
ours
.
It is none of their concern how or where we spend
our evenings.
I think it is; and I am not willing to put my
reputation
at stake by being seen in such a place.
Why, Thompson, I didn't think you so
chicken-hearted
,
exclaimed the other. Only hear him, boys.
He's afraid to go in and eat a few oysters with us.
Ho! ho! ho! a parson verilyin our new clerk,
exclaimed the others, laughing scornfully.
Won't you preach us a sermon, Sir Clergyman?
Come I'll give you a text; and a dozen similar
squibs of ridicule were showered upon him, and
Thompson's resolution began to waver.
Come, come, Thompson, at last said one, who
professed to be his friend, don't be a fool. Here
we've invited you to sup with us; and now if you
refuse, I tell you as a friend that your popularity will
be at an end with us. Your credit won't be worth a
rush at the store, I can tell you. Come along with us,
man; you'll feel better for a frolic now and then.
The united influence of ridicule and persuasion
were too much for Thompson's principleshe
yielded to the temptation, and entered the saloon with
them.
They were soon seated around a table loaded with
a luxurious repast. But having gained the first point,
their next was to entice him to drink. This was not
so easy. Thompson had been carefully educated,
and he was for a long time proof against their
solicitations
to partake of the wine-cup; but ridicule at last
prevailed again, and he yielded as he had done before.
The party broke up at a late hour, and all of the young
men were more or less affected by wine. Poor
Thompson went to his room with feelings which it
would be difficult to describe.
I
could not
bear their ridicule, he said to himself
as he lay his aching head upon his pillow.
Having yielded to his companions in two important
instances, through fear of ridicule, he found it a
hopeless
task for him to endeavour to contend against their
continually renewed solicitations to indulge in
dissipation
;
and if his awakened conscience aroused him
occasionally to a partial sense of his danger, and he
faltered at participating in some scene of dissipation
more bold than at first, the lash of ridicule was applied
to him without stint, by his companions, and he would
offer no resistance.
He found it true that the line of prudence once
passed, it was hard indeed to turn back; and he was
hurried along at last, step by step, in the full career
towards the shipwreck of his fair fame, and his hopes
of future peace.
Good principles amount to nothing without strength
of mind and energy to abide by them. And most
surely do the youth find this to be true, who are in
cities exposed to numberless temptations, and without
the protecting influences of
home
. Be careful then,
voung men, and watch yourselves narrowly, that no
improper tastes or dispositions take root in your mind,
and lure you from the path of duty. It is a safe and
pleasant path to pursue, and its end is honour and peace
but once deviated from, it will be found no easy
road to regain.
9 F2
THE SPOILED CHILD.
What
is more holy than a mother's love? It beams
on its object purely and calmly, unmixed with passion
and careless of reward.
And yet this affection may be perverted. It may
render the object once worthy of it miserable and
sinful
,
and bring down the heart which once glowed with
it, sorrowing to the grave. Let us sketch the
melancholy
transaction, as it has occurred in actual life.
One Sabbath afternoon, in the summer of 1825, a
mother sat, with her little boy, on the mound of a
recent
grave. There was in the air that softened
feeling
which frequently succeeds a sultry noon, and
seems to accord well with the melancholy of the
sorrowing
soul; while the ceaseless chirping of
thousands
of insects imparted a feeling of freshness and
retirement which aided the midn in its work of
contemplation
.
But the young mother seemed not to
notice
what transpired around her. She held her child
on her knee; while tears rolled without ceasing
from her eyes. Hers was the wild grief which
bursts at once into the paroxysms that threaten to
overwhelm the feeble frame beneath their violence.
She sat upon the grave of her husband; and, as she
clasped their only child in her arms, and pressed her
lips to his brow, she called wildly upon the name of
him she had loved, and prayed that at least
her
life
might be spared for the sake of her son.
This scene deeply affected the little boy. Though
too young to feel his loss, he had associated a frightful
meaning with the idea of death. He remembered the
last words and looks of his father, when he had
bidden
him farewell, as though sinking to sleep; and,
with his hand on his head, spoke low and sadly, of the
little son being one day a comfort to his mother. And
now, as his mother wept wildly, he placed his arms
around her, with the warm feelings of childhood, and
repeating his father's blessing, promised to be to her
a comforter and supporter. And was the mother's
prayer that she might be spared to watch over her
son heard? And did the son redeem the promise that
he would be the comfort of his widowed mother?
Mrs. Ross was a kind but not a judicious parent.
Sometimes she censured her little boy for acts, which
were but the overflowing of exuberant feelings; and
often she laughed at deeds or expressions which were
deserving of punishment. Under management so
tortuous
his temper became irregular, and his will
ungovernable
.
The impression produced by his father's
death, which, if rightly improved, might have proved
a lasting benefit, was soon effaced; and five years
after that event, when but ten years of age, he was
known among Mrs. Ross's acquaintances as the spoiled
child. At that time, the decanter and wine glass
were the accompaniments of every sideboard, and
every parlour. While Mr. Ross lived, his son had
not been permitted to taste their contents; but
afterwards
,
the mother smiled to see her son swallow
portions
of wine and cordial which she left in the glass
for him, or climb upon a chair to reach the bottle
down to her. The result was the same that happened
to thousands of that period. At an early age he had
imbibed a strong appetite for spirituous liquor, and
sought to gratify it in every possible way. He helped
himself to his mother's wines, spent money at taverns
and liquor stores, and associated with those who, more
vicious than himself, were more expert in obtaining
the means of satisfying their appetite for drink.
To this evil course, Mrs. Ross, in a great measure,
closed her eyes. Some acts, too glaring to escape her
notice, she excused on the score of youth; others she
threatened to punish, but afterwards passed in silence;
while most of his bad habits she concluded would cure
themselves. It will not excite wonder that with such
training, Samuel Ross was at the early age of sixteen,
in a fair way to become a confirmed inebriate.
Mrs. Ross was awakened from her apathy by an
event, at once sudden and unexpected. Samuel was
brought home, helplessly intoxicated. It is natural
for woman to abhor a drunkard; and yet this mother,
kind and sensitive as she was, had never supposed
that her boy was in danger of becoming one, much
less, that she had been instrumental in producing
such a result. The shock received from this
spectacle
almost overcame her; and during the day, and
until
late at night, she sat in the room, sobbing and
wringing
her hands over the helpless form of her son. Yet
this grief was the effect of mortified pride, rather than
the genuine sorrow which can be alleviated only by the
removal of its cause. In the morning a change was
visible
on the countenance of each, as they sat at table.
For the first time the mother did not smile at those
actions
of her son, which would have given pain to any
other beholder; while the young man, conscious that
she had been a witness of his degradation, maintained
a sullen silence. Mrs. Ross tried to converse with
him; but he answered only with short interjections
and in an irritated tone. He had done so before, but
now his words seemed cold and cruel. At last she
burst into tearsthat infallible resort of the weak.
But with a contemptuous expression of countenance,
he arose from the table, and hastily putting on his hat,
passed out of the room. Her sorrowful tones, as she
called him by name, were unheeded, and she was left
alone.
During that day she watched for him in vain, and
the evening was wearing towards ten o'clock before he
returned. Being half intoxicated he was not in a
condition to sustain conversation or bear reproof, but
at his entrance the mother ran to meet him, and
endeavoured
to draw him towards the table, where his
supper was still waiting. But he threw himself
doggedly upon a chair, and, extending his feet to their
full stretch, remained deaf to her questions and
entreaties
.
At last seating herself beside him, she
exclaimed
Samuel, have you forgotten I am your mother?
Let me alone, he replied, in a voice choked with
passion, I did not come home to be lectured.
Mrs. Ross started to her feet; but staring her
in the face with a look of malignity, he rose from the
chair, and passed to his room. With a heavy heart,
she seated herself by the table, and burying her face
in her hands, endeavoured to devise some plan to
regain the affections of her boy, and save him from
the career of ruin into which he appeared to have
entered
.
But the longer she thought over the painful
subject, the more did her thoughts become confused;
and at length she fell into a troubled sleep, which was
interrupted at intervals by frightful dreams.
Morning
dawned, and found her still in this position; and
Samuel, who had partially recovered from the effects
of his debauch was met as he entered the room, by
the spectacle of his mother reclining across the table,
while her face, half concealed by hair, exhibited every
appearance of the deepest grief. For a moment he
was startled. He believed her to be dead; and could
remember enough of the previous night's proceedings
to feel that he had deeply injured her. For a while
he felt some compunctions of shame and sorrow; but
on observing that she was merely asleep, he regained
his usual indifference. Destitute of every generous
feeling, he passed from the room, put on his hat, and
left the house. He returned at noon; but there was
no smile of recognition between the mother and her
son, no kind inquiries after her health, none of the
mutual
exchange of affection which makes home
delightful
.
Mrs. Ross, unsuited for the work of guiding or
governing, knew not in what terms to address her son;
and he, rendered proud and brutal by sensual
indulgence
,
disdained to extend to his mother, a word of
consolation.
Such is a picture of the mode of life, which, during
many weeks, this widowed mother was doomed to
pass. To a woman of high spirit, but who has not
been taught to regulate and modify her will and
affections
,
this constant struggle, with an evil for which
she has no remedy, soon becomes the cause of disease
and wasting melancholy. Such was the case with
Mrs. Ross. Like many others of her sex, she could
sustain an amount of grief, which during the first
wild outbreak had appeared overwhelming; but she
was not formed to endure the corroding cares, which
silently but surely, prey upon the mind week after
10 G
week, and month after month. Her features
naturally
bright with the glow of health, became wan and
sickly; her cheerfulness departed; and she grew
averse to that round of pleasures and social
intercourse
which had formerly been her chief enjoyment.
At the early age of nineteen, Samuel Ross was an
immoderate drinker. He frequented low taverns,
associated with the vilest company, and laughed at
the restraints of morality or decency. At that time
the great temperance movement had made rapid
progress
throughout the country, and many of the evils,
which had existed when Samuel was a boy, had
passed away. Numerous efforts were made to induce
him to join the Temperance men; but none of them
were attended with success. During the distress
which then existed in every part of the country, he
became involved in difficulties, in consequence of
his connection with a gang of young men who were
strongly suspected of being engaged in a plan for
perpetrating extensive robberies. Flying from his
native city, he repaired to St. Louis, and assumed the
name of Hamilton. Let us witness one of the
closing scenes of his career of crime.
In one of the many taverns of St. Louis, half a dozen
men had collected together one afternoon, to play dice.
Hamilton was one of them. As each lost or won, he
drank deeply, accompanying the action with a terrible
oath. During the first five or six throws fortune
appeared
adverse to Hamilton. His antagonist, a thin, tall
man, about forty-three years of age, swept, with a
triumphant leer, pile after pile of money from the
board, and with an oath, which breathed defiance,
called for drink. But while he grew excited, Hamilton
remained cool; and after partially emptying a glass as
often as he lost a throw he suddenly refrained altogether
from drinking. At this moment the tide of success
turned. One after another Hamilton gained and bore
away the piles of money staked before him, until he
had doubled his original capital. He was still calm
and cool as before; while his antagonist bit his lips
with rage.
During this scene, a stout man, enveloped in a
blanket coat, came into the tavern, and, after drinking,
approached the table round which the players were
seated. He stood without speaking for about half an
hour, apparently absorbed with the spectacle. The
men played on without noticing him; but once as
Hamilton raised his eye, as if involuntarily, he
perceived
that the stranger, instead of looking at the
game, had his eyes fixed intently upon him. There
was something in his look which made Hamilton,
reckless as he was, quail, and deprived him in a
moment
,
of his self-possession.
The game proceeded as before, and Hamilton
continued
to win. Suddenly, his antagonist threw his
dice upon the table, and exclaimed:you are
cheating
,
sir. No man could have thrown that dice as
you did then, and win.
But I did win, replied Hamilton, coolly.
It was foul playI stick to that, said the other,
with an oath, as he brought his clenched hand down
upon the table with a violence which made the room
10 G
shake. The other men ceased playing; and
Hamilton's
antagonist demanded that the throw should be
taken over. To this the other would not consent; and
at last it was proposed to ask the opinion of the
stranger
.
Hamilton was most unwilling to do so, for he
had imbibed a strong antipathy against him. To
save appearances he submitted, and all parties urged
the man, if he knew any thing about the game, to give
his opinion, upon the fairness of Hamilton's last
throw.
I think, said the stranger, fixing his eyes coldly
upon Hamilton, that you have been playing with
marked dice.
Every one started to his feet.
Seize him, seize him, shouted Hamilton's
antagonist
.
Gentlemen, said Hamilton, drawing himself to
his full height, let me request of each of you, as a
particular favour, and by friendly advice, to keep his
hands to himself. The man who first touches me,
shall wish he had never been born. As to this
fellow
whom you have chosen to decide between us, I
ask him to prove his assertion.
I say answered the stranger, that I think you
played part of the last game with marked dice. My
proof is simply this. Take this die (and he lifted one
from the counter) and holding it as you held the last
one, win if you can, once in a hundred throws.
Do you call this proof? asked Hamilton.
I do call it proof you dare not give, rejoined the
other.
I demand the money, said Hamilton.
Proof, the proof, he's got marked dice,
search him, seize him, exclaimed the others.
The excitement increased.
Gentlemen, said Hamilton, with his former
coolness
,
I say I played fairly and with common dice.
Who denies it?
I deny it, said the stranger, I deny too that
your name is Hamilton. You were called Sam Ross,
where I first knew you: and I will tell still more if
you challenge me.
The uproar had now reached a fearful height.
Nothing
but Hamilton's self-possession prevented a
scuffle
which would have resulted in loss of life. At
length, through the intercession of the landlord, the
affair was compromised. Hamilton submitted to roll
up the sleeve of his coat, under which it was thought
the marked dice were concealed; and though none
were found, he refunded to his antagonist a portion of
the money.
One evening, not long after this event, a man
enveloped
in a blanket coat, stood by himself, near one of
the wharves of the Mississippi, in the lower part of St.
Louis. He gazed with almost painful interest at
every passer-by. As the evening wore away, he grew
more restless, gliding at intervals when no person was
near, from one part of the street to another, and
seeming to await the approach of a comrade. About
ten o'clock, he suddenly slunk behind a broken fence
post, and remained quiet. In a few moments, a man,
clothed like himself in a large coat, turned a corner on
the opposite side, and crossing towards the wharf,
walked rapidly towards the upper part of the city.
Just as he passed the tottering post, the man stationed
there sprang towards him, and as the other turned,
seized his arm, threw it up, and struck at his breast
with a dirk knife. Happily for the traveller, the
knife's point struck on the buttons of his coat, and
glancing forward, merely bared his ribs without
penetrating
them. Before the assassin could repeat the
stroke he was seized, and hurled upon the pavement.
An alarm was soon given, help soon arrived and the
intended murderer was secured. It was Samuel Ross;
the other was the stranger who had detected the false
dice.
Ross was sentenced to two years imprisonment.
He served his term in the State Prison and afterwards
went to New Orleans. But from the effects of that
long confinement he never recovered. His health
had been ruined by disease and debauchery; and
after his release, he again resumed his habits of
intoxication
,
his constitution yielded, and he died in the
horrors of delirium tremens. Thus was
his
promise
redeemed that he would be the support of his mother!
And was that mother still alive? Long after his
departure she had hoped and prayed for his return.
He came not, and the seeds of decay which he had
sown while with her, ripened into that disease of the
mind which medicine has no power to heal. She
talked wildly of her boy, and accused herself, in tones
which drew tears from the eyes of all around, for
being
the cause of his crimes. One year after her son's
death, she was buried in the grave with her husband;
but she never knew that he with whom, when a boy,
she had wept over that grave, had languished in a
dungeon for attempted murder, and died the
degrading
death of a drunkard. Thus the mother had
herself prevented the answer to the prayer which she
then offered for her son.
G2
DOCTOR GRAY AND HIS DAUGHTER.
By J. R. Orton
.
CHAPTER I.
There
is something lovely in the name of sister,
and its utterance rarely fails to call up the warm
affections
of the gentle heart. The thoughts that circle
round it are all quiet, beautiful and pure. Passion
has no place with its associations. The hopes and
fears of love, those strong emotions, powerful enough
to shatter and extinguish life itself, find no home there,
The bride is the star, the talisman of the heart, the
diamond
above all price, bright and blazing in the
noonday
sun; a sister, the gem of milder light, calm as the
mellow moon, and set in a coronet of pearls.
It was late in the Autumn of 18, when a small
party of young gentlefolks were assembled at the
mansion
of Doctor Gray, in one of the principal streets of
the city of Boston. The house was large, and well
furnished; and all the arrangements for the little fete,
and the fete itself were conducted with that simplicity
and propriety, which are ever the evidences of taste
and delicacy. At a moderate hour, the happy guests
departed, pleased with the hostess, the entertainment,
and with themselves. One only lingered behind, a
very youthful gentleman, who stood with his hand
upon the drawing-room door, in conversation with
Mrs. Gray, and her young, charming daughter. Mrs.
Gray remarked that it was still early, and that
Henrietta
and herself would sit up for the Doctor; and
his own wishes thus seconded, the young man again
resumed his chair.
Henrietta Gray, at this period, was thirteen,
half-girl
,
and half-woman; an age when the maiden stops
in her childish sports, and wonders why they have
always interested her so deeply; and as she muses,
sees in the distance, fairy palaces, and green and
flowery
banks, and smooth, translucent riversthe thorns
and rough waves of the future all blissfully hidden
from her. She was not handsome: her features were
not regular, her face was too pale, her form too slight.
But then the combined expression of the whole was
pleasing. Her eyes were a liquid blue, her
countenance
intelligent; and, above all, kindness beamed in
every feature; and when she spoke, her voice was like
the soothing ripple of a gentle stream.
Arthur Blane, the youth who had secured a few
additional
minutes for the enjoyment of Henrietta's
society
,
was about two years her senior; a fair-haired, rosy
lad, of modest manners; who, as he finally bade her
good night, looked into her eyes and trembled; and
his voice sunk to a cadence almost as mellow as her
own; so true it is, that gentleness begets gentleness,
and tends to subdue all things to itself.
But Arthur Blane's footsteps had hardly died away
on the stairs, when they were heard again in a rapid
11
ascent; and rushing into the presence of Henrietta
and her mother, pale and affrighted, in a few broken
words, but tenderly as possible, he informed them
that an accident had befallen the Doctor. The brief
announcement was hardly ended, when the ghastly
person of Doctor Gray, senseless and bleeding, was
borne into the house. The explanation of the
casualty
was, that in returning from a professional visit, in
a dark and narrow street, his carriage had been
overturned
by striking against a post.
The sudden transformation of Doctor Gray's elegant
and happy mansion to a house of mourning; the wild
grief of Mrs. Gray, the heart-broken sighs of
Henrietta
;
and the attempts of Arthur Blane, and other
friends hastily summoned at midnight, with
consternation
pictured in their faces to administer hope and
consolation; the Doctor's gradual return to
consciousness
;
and the doubts and apprehensions of his
medical attendants as to the final result; are of a
nature
too painful to dwell on. Suffice it, that with the
morning the family were permitted to hope; and the
Doctor entered on a period of slow and painful
convalescence
.
Doctor Gray was, or had been, one of the most
skilful and popular physicians of the city. He was
now fifty years old; and, unfortunately having
remained
a bachelor until thirty-five, during the period
of his single life he had acquired habits of
conviviality
and late hours, which he had never found the
resolution to abandon. He was in the main a kind
husband, and an affectionate parent; but as evil
habits
,
if not vanquished, in the end are almost certain
to vanquish
, so the Doctor's relish for the glee club
and the bottle had grown upon him, until it had
nearly
made its last demand, in a claim for his life.
Another evil had still followed in the wake of the
Doctor's course of life. It lost him the confidence of
his friends; and for several years, while the expenses
of his family had been increasing, his business had
been diminishing. His accident, and the confinement
of several months which followed, turned the
attention
of his creditors to the condition of his affairs;
and he recovered only to find himself a bankrupt
and his wife and children reduced to beggary.
At this distressing period in the history of the
Gray family, the Doctor and his three younger
children suddenly disappeared; and no trace of them
could be discovered. After a time of wonder,
of grief and despair, Mrs. Gray and Henrietta, the
sole remaining members of the household, retired
to cheap and narrow quarters in the suburbs of the
town, where the mother, overcome by the successive
shocks of her severe destiny, sunk into a condition
of imbecility.
Not so with Henrietta. Though a shadow rested
on her pale face, and the sorrows of her young life
had sunk deeply into her heart, a kind Providence
had not suffered her to be broken by their unusual
weight. She was still gentle as ever, but misfortune
is rapid in the development of character; and to
gentleness were now added an unlooked-for fortitute
and energy. Her mother, entirely incapable of effort,
and herself, were to be fed. She laid her case at the
foot of Omnipotence, and received strength. Friends,
it is true, were kind; and some relations there were,
who did not utterly forget the bereaved ones in their
affliction; but, in the main, the wants of both mother
and daughter were now to be supplied, and, for a
period
of weary months and years, were supplied by the
labours of Henrietta. When not occupied with the care
of her sick parent, her needle was in active requisition:
and early and late she toiled, and toiled cheerfully, for
bread; and thanked God that it was daily given her
Among her kind friends, none were more constant
or thoughtful than Mr. and Mrs. Blane. Neither did
Arthur forget her; and to the great scandal of the
prying ones, he divided the leisure of his
college
vacation pretty equally between his father's
and the homely tenement of the Grays; and as
he was an only son, of large expectations, to the
further scandal of the gossips, his parents seemed to
view his conduct with a total unconcern. Indeed, in
these visits, his mother was almost his constant
companion
.
When not diversified with the society of these
friends, life, with Henrietta, presented little else than
one unvarying toilsome round. Her household duties,
her struggle for sustenance, and her care of her half
idiotic and often captious parent, occupied her hands,
her thoughts, and her heart; and yet she had room
for other sorrows; and withal, was not unhappy.
The inscrutable and mysterious fate of her father and
her little brothers, was of itself a burden hard to be
borne: and yet, with all these causes of depression
bearing upon her, the consciousness of a daily effort
to perform her duty, and above all, an humble and
sincere
reliance on the goodness and care of Heaven,
lightened her heart and her footsteps, and clothed her
brow with serenity. While the ills of life are
scattered
with great apparent irregularity, its happiness is
dispensed with far more equal balance than is
generally
imagined.
Nearly four years thus wore away, when the thread
of life, which for some months had been growing
weaker and weaker with Mrs. Gray, parted; and
Henrietta, of all her family was left. The Blanes
were with her in her affliction; and crowned their
generous kindness by offering her a home. The
sympathies
of her own relatives, too, were so far
awakened
by this last event, and the desolate condition of
the stricken orphan, that her aunt Totten made her a
like offer, which, for obvious reasons, Henrietta
preferred
to accept. Her rooms were accordingly given
up, the humble furniture disposed of, and she became
domesticated at her aunt's.
About a month after this event, Mrs. Totten's
servant
,
one morning, left a couple of letters at Mr.
Blane's. One was addressed to Mrs. Blane, and the
other to Arthur; and they proved to be from
Henrietta
.
The one to Arthur was unsealed, and as
follows
:
Dear Arthur
,At a moment like this, when I am
about to be separated from you for a time, and
possibly
for ever, no feeling of delicacy must prevent my
treating you with the frankness due to your noble and
generous nature. That I love you, you will not
doubt; and I am ready, so far as my heart is
concerned
,
to become your wife. But I have first another
and imperative duty to discharge. My inquiries after
my lost father and brothers, have at length, as I have
reason to believe, been crowned with success. I must
go to them. Do not seek to follow me, or to trace
me out; and if Heaven preserve me, the devotion of
my life shall repay you. But if this be too hard, dear
Arthur, take back your plighted troth, and be only my
brother again.
When these letters arrived, Arthur Blane was
absent
from the city; and on his return, he hastened to
Mrs. Totten's. From that discreet lady he obtained
little additional intelligence. Henrietta was gone;
but where, if she was in possession of the secret, Mrs.
Totten was too guarded to disclose. His inquiries at
the several stage offices and elsewhere, with a view
to ascertain the direction she had taken, were equally
unsuccessful; and as this hope faded, gradually Arthur
Blane's handsome and happy face assumed a
lengthened
and woe-begone expression. As months rolled
away, he sunk into a nervous listlessness, which
assumed
,
in the lapse of years during which he heard
nothing from his betrothed, more and more the
character of moroseness. His only relief was in
travel
;
and what excited a much greater amount of
remark was the circumstance that his parents, in their
old age, were also seized with a mania to see the
world. During these peregrinations, the three, often
in company, visited most of the towns in New
England
,
explored a large part of New York, and
penetrated
,
at several points, the interminable West beyond.
CHAPTER II.
The
scene of our little history now changes to the
small village of K, in the interior of the State of
New York: the period, about two years after the
sudden disappearance of Dr. Gray and his children
from Boston. The village was of no great
pretension
.
It lay in a wide valley encompassed by massive,
but not abrupt hills; and to the south and east flowed
small meandering rivers. It was of sufficient age to
be free from stumps, and the immediate enroachments
of the forests; possessed an air of thrift and comfort,
several respectable tenements, and a goodly number
of neat white cottages, surrounded with ample grounds
and embosomed in shrubbery. But it was laid out
absolutely without plan. Its principal street was
thrice the width usually granted to avenues of the
kind; and from its northern extremity, in wild
irregularity
,
diverged other streets towards every
conceivable
point of the compass. Its principal ornaments,
in the way of buildings, were its churches and halls
of learning. Two respectable structures, one of stone
and the other of brick, were devoted to the purposes
of an academy; while several massive collegiate
edifices
crowned a hill at the south. The Brick
academy
,
the germ of two noble institutions of learning,
in the poverty of a new settlement, had been built
and sustained as a classic school through its infancy,
by a voluntary mortgage on the property of the
principal
inhabitants of the place. These, it is hardly
necessary to add, were staid New-Englanders.
It was spring-time, and the buds and foliage of
village
and country were just bursting into a rejoicing
green,when, one morning, the inhabitants of K
became aware of an accession to their numbers. A
little dilapidated hovel, standing on a common, and
for a long period untenanted, had during the night
been accommodated with occupants. A poor
broken-down
horse, hitched to a broken weather-beaten cart,
stood by the shattered door-way; and an elderly,
square-built man, was endeavouring, with refuse
boards and paper, to patch up the open windows. In
the appearance of this individual there was something
peculiar. He wore a faded lion-skin coat, of large
dimensions, and enormous pockets; and an old
slouched
hat to match. He was of middle height, but
thickset
and muscular; with a most massive chest and
head. His face was pale and wrinkled, surmounted
with a heavy Roman nose, and shaded by an
abundance
of short grizzly hair. His eyebrows were
heavy and projecting, and beneath them were a pair
of cold, keen, gray eyes. His head he carried a little
on one side, as though his neck was stiff; and all his
movements were made with great deliberation, and
an obtrusive self-possession. His companionsfor
he was not alonewere three lads of, perhaps, twelve,
ten, and eight years of age, ragged and filthy,
without
shoes or hats; their long, tangled locks sticking
out in every direction, and bleached almost white by
exposure to the weather; and with scarcely clothes
enough, such as they were, to cover their nakedness.
The eldest was robust in appearance; the next in
size less so; while the youngest was painfully frail.
It is, perhaps needless to say, that these
individuals
were Doctor Gray and his children. He had
consented to the loss of his standing in life, and to
the disruption and degradation of his family, as he
flattered himself, from a feeling of excusable pride;
an inability to brave the reverses of fortune amid the
scenes of his prosperity, and to bear up under the
sneers of rivals and the pity of sunshine friends.
But had he probed his heart deeper, he would have
discovered there a consciousness, that in order to
regain his lost ground and retrieve his fortunes, it
was necessary for him to relinquish the bottle; and
that for a sacrifice so great as this, he was not quite
ready
not yet
. It is unnecessary to trace him
through the two years of intervening time. Suffice
it, that he had changed his place of abode more than
once, each time sinking lower in the scale of
respectability
;
until the little remnant of availables he had
managed to smuggle from the city having become
exhausted, he and his children were reduced to the
condition in which they have been described.
The inhabitants of K looked on him with some
wonder and curiosity, but nobody molested him: and
soon he came to be known, on what authority no one
exactly knew, as Doctor Glegg. Ere long, the hut he
occupied became a charmed precinct to all the
children
;
for the door was kept carefully closed against
intruders; and as to windows, there was not a pane
of glass in any one of them; or other contrivance
for the admission of light, save a few straggling
patches of oiled paper. Stolen glimpses, it is true,
had been caught by the more curious of the urchins,
through the door-way, of a box, or large chest; and,
it was cautiously whispered around, and, at length
among the grown-up and gray-headed children of
the place, that Doctor Glegg was a miser; and that
the chest in question contained his gold.
But the Doctor was poor enough; so poor, that his
miserable and cheerless tenement was rarely out of
the reach of absolute want. Indeed, it is surprising
how he and his wretched children managed to live at
all. Unfitted by the habits of his life for manual
labour; and maintaining, even in his most abject
degradation
,
a sort of personal respect, which forbade a
resort to menial offices, his sphere of exertion was
limited. Instead, therefore, of resorting to days'
works, he planted patches of corn and potatoes, on
shares; and secured a little hay in the same manner,
for the benefit of his famished horse; and in place of
the carriage to which he had been accustomed, he rode
to and from his fields in his cart; while his elfin boys
scoured the commons for refuse wood, and,
bare-headed
and bare legged, waded and fished in the
streams.
As time passed on, Doctor Glegg became more and
more an object of curiosity. It was evident to all,
that he was intemperate; but he was never seen
drunk, and was never vulgar or profane. It was
perceived that he was a man of learning and of parts;
and that his conversation was a singular mixture of
wit and wisdom, of bombast and simplicity, according
to the circumstances under which he was accosted.
With men of sense he talked sense; with scholars, he
was scholastic; with fools, bombastic; and to those
who pressed him with an impertinent curiosity, he
was utterly unintelligible. To the last class his
replies
were somewhat after this sort:
Mon Dieu!
man is a curious biped, made up of
the most heterogeneous and incomprehensible parts.
Procul! procul!
scat! Neither him nor his
concomitants
have I any desire to know; but consign them
all, in one conglomerated mass,
to the crocus acclicatus
of the common cant
.
Others, however, who fell into casual conversation
with him, and did not attempt to pry into his
circumstances
,
or the events of his life found his mind well
stored with a variety of information, which he was
capable of imparting in forcible and appropriate
language
.
A student of the Academy having politely
accosted him, Dr. Gray said,
You are in pursuit of knowledge, my young sir:
and among all the attainments after which the scholar
should strive, nothing is more important than a just
appreciation of his mother tongue. Allow me to
inquire
of you, what is the chief element of good
composition
?
Simplicity, replied the student.
The question is well answered, continued the
doctor; De Witt Clinton himself could not have
replied
more justly. To know what we wish to
communicate
,
and then to make the communication in
just those exact words necessary to convey the whole
idea, constitute the chief excellence of style.
A rough person, having taken it upon himself to
abuse Dr. Gray, and to heap on him a volume of oaths
and profane epithets, the old man listened for some
time in silence. At length he quietly remarked:
Sir, you cannot swear.
Swear, old curmudgeon!what do you mean?
It requires sense, sir, continued the doctor, to
swear. You may use the words, but you cannot
swear.
Thus lived, or rather existed, Dr. Gray and his
children in the village of K, for a period of two
years; when an event occurred which wrought a
gradual
change in their condition. There arrived in the
stage from the East, a pale and delicate, but
sweeteyed
young woman, dressed in deep black; who,
having
attended to the safe disposition of her baggage at
the hotel, inquired for the residence of the Rev. Mr.
Trimble. It was shown to her, and she at once bent
her steps in that direction.
The stranger lady approached the dwelling of the
clergyman, not without trepidation. Brushing an
unbidden tear from her eye, she raised the knocker
with a shaking hand, but her heart and her
determination
were constant, for it was none other than
Henrietta
Gray. She found Mr. Trimble at home; and
more than that, a kind and feeling man. She
told to him her little story, and exhibited to him her
certificate of membership in one of the churches of
Boston, as a voucher for her honesty, if, indeed, any
thing else were wanting than her sweet countenance
and modest deportment.
The good man entered heartily into the object of
her mission; informed her that Dr. Glegg and the
three children were still in K; and from his
account
of them, she became more fully confirmed in
the supposition that they were no other than her lost
father and brothers. To change probability into a
certainty, however, with a small daughter of Mr.
Trimble as her cicerone, she strolled into the quarter
of the village where stood Dr. Glegg's hut,and saw
and recognized her parent. She also passed quite
near one or two of the boys; but in their changed
condition, she failed to discover any thing which bore
resemblance to the well-fed, well-clothed, and happy
children she had known. In great agitation of
feeling
,
she returned to Mr. Trimble's house; and
accepted
a cordial invitation from him and his kind
lady, to pass the night with them.
CHAPTER III.
On
the following morning Henrietta found herself
refreshed from the fatigues of her journey, and in a
condition of mind and body to proceed in the
accomplishment
of her purposes. Her new friend, Mr.
Trimble, introduced her at once into a highly
respectable
family, where she took a room and board; and
himself arranged an interview between her and her
brothers. Her baggage was hardly transported from
the hotel to her new quarters, before they arrived:
and ragged and filthy as they were, were clasped
over and over again to her heart, and bathed in her
tears.
She found them as wild as the untamed colts of the
desert. Dick, the eldest, after some little
conversation
,
remembered her; and she perceived, on
studying
his countenance, that some of his former features
remained. But with the others, William and Henry,
there was no recognition on either side; and the two
little fellows endured her caresses in sullen silence,
as though in doubt of the whole proceeding.
An hour was devoted to the joy and sorrow of the
meeting; and then Henrietta assisted her brothers to
cleanse themselves, bathing them thorougly from head
to foot, and cutting and smoothing their matted hair.
This done, she put on her bonnet, and taking them
by the hand, walked out into the business street of
the village. From her slender means she furnished
them with hats and shoes, and purchased cloth for
garments, all of a cheap but substantial quality,
appropriate
to their condition: and telling them to come
again on the morrow, with good advice and soothing
words of encouragement and tenderness, she sent
them home.
For a large part of the succeeding night,
Henrietta
,
happy, and even joyous, plied her busy needle;
and on the following day, several of the garments
came from her hand, finished; but the children did
not appear. Restless in consequence as the night
approached, she walked into the street, and naturally
turned her footsteps towards the quarter where they
resided. From the first she would gladly have seen
her father, and have included him directly in her
mission of love and mercy. But this she feared to do.
He had never been familiar with his children; she
well understood the pride and selfish stubbornness of
his character; and in studying her plans, she had
determined
it safest for their success, not to intrude upon
him, but to leave him to make the first advances, or
to chance, to bring them together. She suspected
that he had forbidden the children to see her, but for
this she was prepared. Passing the hut, she
discovered
Dick in the road beyond, and accosting him,
learned that her suspicions were correct. Her father
on hearing of her presence in K, and interview
with her brothers, had manifested considerable
uneasiness
,
and peremptorily forbidden them to see her
again. Placing the garments she had brought in her
brothers' hands, she expressed an ardent hope that her
father would recall the prohibition, and even that he
would soon allow her to see him; and retired.
But the next day brought no change; and on the
following morning, having completed the rest of the
garments, she again walked towards the hut. This
time she found her father in the road, harnessing his
poor old horse, and was obliged either to turn back,
or to pass him. She chose the latter alternative; and
as she came near, he turned suspiciously upon her,
regarded her coldly and sternly, but without speaking
Greatly agitated, Henrietta extended her arms towards
him, and uttered the word father.
Dr. Gray turned away, and walked to his door.
My dear father! said she, in the most
beseeching
tones, will you not own me?
Dr. Gray leaned against the gate, with his back
towards her, apparently as much affected as herself.
He shook as though with an ague fit, and with a
strong effort at last managed to say, in a broken,
hollow
voice:
Go away! I know you not, and will not know
you!
Poor Henrietta hung her gifts for her outcast
brothers upon the broken fence near her wretched
father, and departed with a sad heart. But her
constancy
was rewarded. That afternoon her little
brothers were permitted to visit her again; and from
that time forward their intercourse was uninterrupted.
Soon she had all her plans for their benefit in
successful
operation. Her industry and skill with her needle,
13 I
aided, perhaps, by sympathy, and the little air of
romance
which surrounded her, gave her an abundance
of employment; her three brothers spent much of
each day with her; and as she worked, she heard
their lessons, conversed with them, and gave them
instruction, so far as she was able, in every
department
of knowledge which she deemed necessary to
their success in life. Her little workshop became a
school of the most practical and valuable kind.
Neither did Henrietta forget her father, or cease
her efforts to ameliorate his condition. Though she
held no direct intercourse with him, through her
prudently-exerted influence he was induced to remove
to more comfortable quarters, where she managed to
surround him with most of the necessaries, and
eventually, to supply him with many of the little
comforts of life, to which, latterly, he had been a
stranger. She even visited his rooms in his absence,
attended to their cleanliness, and conferred upon
them those little graces and finishing touches which
woman alone can bestow. She also attended to his
wardrobe, kept it in repair, and added to it, from time
to time, as her own means permitted, and his wants
required. He, meanwhile, though he still refused to
see her, regarded her, not in his superficial mind so
clearly, but in his innermost soul, as a ministering
angel,and blessed her.
Thus nearly three years passed away. During
this time Henrietta had several times heard from her
aunt Totten, and through her of the uneasiness of her
good friends, the Blanes. This she deeply regretted,
and would gladly have relieved, had her own strong
sense of propriety and duty permitted. But to have
informed them of her plans would have been to
defeat them. It is not to be supposed that Arthur
Blane would have consented to remain in quiet
expectancy
of a wife while she should devote two or three
years of her life to the care of her dissolute and
thankless
father, and to the uncertain task of rescuing and
reclaiming her vagabond brothers. Yet to the mind
of Henrietta, when she had once succeeded in
discovering
where they were, this was her first duty;
in comparison with which, all else, her own hopes
and prospects in life, and even the temporary
happiness
of him she loved most faithfully and deeply sunk
into insignificance. In the rescuing and training of
those helpless children, there was a great work to be
done; and to her it was clear, that it belonged to
herself
,
their sister, and the eldest, to do it; and further,
that if she shrunk from the undertaking, it never
would be accomplished. So strong in the
consciousness
of the rectitude of her heart and her actions, she
looked back without regret, if not always without
sorrow
,
as she thought of her almost dissipated dream of
life and love with Arthur Blane; and forward with
that cheering hope which the just and trustful have
in heaven.
At this period Dr. Gray was prostrated by a sudden
stroke of paralysis, and Henrietta hesitated no longer.
She hastened to his bedside, and gave him the
watchful
care and tender solicitude of a daughter. He never
recovered sufficiently to speak; but he knew her, and
his proud and stubborn heart was at last softened. He
expressed his gratitude by mute signs; and pressing
her hand in his, expired.
This event released Henrietta from a necessary
confinement
to the village of K. Her brothers were
now greatly improved; and, under her skilful
training
,
had made respectable advances in manners,
morals, and education. They had proved apt pupils,
with kind and affectionate natures; and their sister's
unwonted love and purity had assimilated them much
and readily to herself. But in case of her own
return
,
she did not propose to take them to the city. A
country life she considered most conducive to their
happiness, virtue, and manhood: and accordingly set
about providing them with suitable homes. Dick
chose to be a farmer; and William and Henry, now
grown into robust lads, selected mechanical
occupations
.
Aided by the kindness and interest of the
most respectable citizens of K, good places were
soon found, and the boys were properly bestowed.
The death of her father was announced by
Henrietta
to her aunt Totten very soon after its
occurrence
;
and that hitherto discreet lady at once took
the responsibility of consulting the Blanes as to the
future movements of her niece. The consequence of
this unauthorized proceeding was the arrival in the
village of K, in a very few days, of a barouche,
containing the whole Blane family. Arthur's
handsome
face, so his mother declared, within a week, had
shed a most solemn bevy of incipient wrinkles, and
shortened half an inch; and the crimson which
mantled
on the cheek of Henrietta, as they met, did not,
by any means, detract from the graces of her meek,
but now blooming and mature beauty.
A day or two later, through the agency of the
Blanes, who all at once became active in the affairs
of the little village of K, a council was held at
the Rev. Mr. Trimble's at which it was decided,
that, under the peculiar circumstances of the present
case, it was meet and proper that Henrietta Gray
should return to Boston in no other capacity than as
Mrs. Arthur Blane. On the morning of their
departure
,
accordingly, the marriage ceremony was
solemnized
.
The principal personages in this little history, we
believe, are still living. Henrietta is a happy wife,
surrounded with an interesting family; and her three
brothers, who have learned so well to know the depth
and purity of a sister's love, are respectable and
thriving citizens of one of the western States.
BROTHER AND SISTER.
By T. S. Arthur
.
Alfred
, said a mother, in whose life-glass the
sands were ebbing low, Alfred, my dear boy! I
shall be with you only a little while longer. To your
care I commit this dear child, your sister, now
sleeping
before you so sweetly. Alone you will be in the
world. Love her, Alfred, and care for her. Be to
her father, mother, and brother, all in one.
The mother's voice here choked with rising sobs,
and she sunk back, exhausted, upon the pillow from
which she had arisen. The boy, scarcely
comprehending
the nature of the evil about to befall him, or
the importance of the solemn charge he was
receiving
,
wept in sympathy, and mingled his tears with
those of his fast failing parent.
A few weeks afterwards, Alfred Lovell, an orphan,
stood beside his little sister Mary at the graves of
both their parents. Long rank grass covered that of
their father; but the earth was heaped up, yellow
and verdureless, above the spot where the mother's
faded remains had been consigned to their eternal
rest. But ten years old, Alfred scarcely compre
hended the extent of his loss, and little Mary, who had
seen only half as many summers, smiled from her
own pleasant thoughts, while the mourners stood with
bowed heads, and the preacher's voice was raised in
solemn prayer.
Back from the old burial-place, where, beneath the
shadow of two elms that had braved the storms of
a century, were made the graves of their parents,
the children returned to the home in which they had
lived since the light of existence dawned upon them.
But this was no longer to be their home. Relatives,
into whose keeping the children now fell, decided
upon their separation. Mary was taken by an aunt,
a Mrs. Edwards, to raise as her own child, and Alfred
was sent away some two hundred miles to a boarding
school, there to remain until his education was
completed
.
A small property had been left, and this was
invested for their benefit.
Not until the lapse of four years did the brother
and sister meet again. Mary, now in her tenth year,
was playing with her doll, one morning in August,
when a tall lad entered the room where she sat, and
stood looking at her for some moments.
Mary! he at length said, in a voice that slightly
trembled.
The child started and looked up into his face eagerly.
Mary, don't you know your brother Alfred? said
he, with something of disappointment in his tone.
Quick as thought the child sprung from her chair,
and, throwing her arms around the lad, hid her face on
his bosom and cried for joy.
A happy meeting was it for the brother and sister
after this long separation. Alfred had been permitted
to visit his aunt, and spend with Mary his August
vacation. For reasons, satisfactory at least to those
who had the guardianship of the children, they had
not been permitted to see each other since the death
of their mother, until this time. Nor would the
meeting
now have been allowed but for the interference
of a relative, who spoke so strongly against the
particular
reasons which influenced the aunt, who had
adopted Mary, in her views of separation, that the
latter waived the objections which, heretofore, kept
the brother and sister in the relation of strangers to
each other.
A happy meeting, as we have said, was this for the
brother and sister. Scarcely a moment were they
apart during the three or four weeks that Alfred
remained
with Mrs. Edwards their aunt, weeks that flew
by as if they had been only days.
At the time of their separation, Mary was too
young to comprehend the nature of the loss she had
sustaineda loss scarcely felt in consequence of the
tender care with which she was received into the
family of Mrs. Edwards, who, having no children of
her own, permitted her affections to flow forth and
centre upon the child of her adoption. She did not,
therefore, bear in her mind a very strong
remembrance
of her mother. It was far different in the
case of Alfred. With the death of his last
surviving
parent came a sad change for him. At once he
was removed from all the pleasant associations of
14
early life, and his lot cast among unsympathizing
strangers. A child of but ten years, how painful
were his first experiences! How yearningly, in the
sad homesickness that followed, did his heart go back
to the old place! How vividly arose in his mind
images of former times, in which his mother's
presence
made the joy and the sunshine! Then the
music of her voice was in his ears, and he could feel
the gentle pressure of her hand upon his head.
Sad indeed were his first year's experiences. After
this the native lightness of his spirits reacted. He
became
a boy among boys, full of life and activity; and,
what was worse, inbibed, too readily, the vices of
those with whom he was thrown into association. On
being permitted to visit his aunt, who lived near by
the old homestead, every object that he saw brought
back the past and filled his mind with old
associations
.
Daily, with Mary by his side, he rambled
about among the scenes so well remembered,
connecting
with each familiar thing that met his sight, some
incident that was half forgotten.
One day, soon after his return, he had wandered some
distance from the residence of his aunt, with Mary,
his almost constant companion by his side, when he
found himself near the graveyard where rested all that
was mortal of his parents.
Our father and mother were buried here, Mary,
said he, as he leaned upon the fence that inclosed the
spot sacred to the ashes of the dead; let us go in and
look at their graves.
A feeling of sadness had come over the boy. Most
vividly did he remember the time when he saw the
coffin of his mother lowered into the earth, and heard
the hollow rattling of the clods upon the narrow
house in which she was sleeping. Climbing the
fence, Alfred assisted Mary over, and in a few
minutes
they were standing beside the grass-covered
hillocks that marked the resting-place of their
parents
.
It was the first time Mary had been there
since her mother's burial; and that scene had so
faded from her memory, that scarcely a vestige
remained
.
But tears were in Alfred's eyes, and slowly
falling over his face; she wept with him, and felt
sad at heart.
Word for word of the solemn charge the boy's
mother
had given him on her dying bed concerning his
sister, came up in his memory; and, as he drew his
arm around Mary, and bent down and kissed her, he
resolved never to forget this last sacred injunction.
Vivid was the impression that all this made upon the
heart of Mary; young as she was, it fixed itself so
deeply, that she never afterward could forget it.
When the vacation closed, Alfred went back to
school, and five years elapsed before he was again
permitted to see his sister. He was then a tall,
handsome
young man, and she a beautiful girl in her
fifteenth
year. They met with the warmest
demonstrations
of affection, and spent two or three weeks
together
.
Then they separated againAlfred to enter
a mercantile house in New York, and Mary to
remain
with her aunt, who lived about twenty miles
from Philadelphia.
K
In passing through college, Alfred Lovell had
acquired
habits of a dangerous kind. With three or
four young men from the South, who were always
well supplied with money, he had formed an intimate
acquaintance, and following their example, indulged
himself in every sensual gratification within his
reach. On leaving college, the President of the
institution
,
who had observed with pain the evil habits
acquired by the young man, earnestly warned him
of the danger that was in his path. But the warning
had little effect.
With no one to counsel, and no home circle into
which affection could draw him, the position of Alfred
Lovell was even worse in New York than while he
was at college. At the end of two years, when he
attained his majority and came into the possession
of about ten thousand dollars, he needed a guardian
more than at almost any former period of his life.
Among the vices into which he had fallen, that
parent
of all other vices, the habit of drinking
intoxicating
liquors, was included. This placed him in the
highway to ruin.
Alfred, said the merchant in whose
counting-room
the young man had been for two years, I wish
to speak a word with you in private.
Alfred Lovell, anticipating some proposition
looking
to his future worldly advantage, accompanied the
staid, thrifty merchant, into his private room.
Alfred, said this individual after they were seated,
you are now of age.
The young man bowed.
For two years, continued the merchant, you
have been in my service, and I have found you
intelligent
in business matters, and, in the main, true to
my interests. During the whole of this time, I have
observed you closely, with a purpose in my mind.
That purpose was to see how far it would be
desirable
to connect you and my son in business in a branch
of our business in Cincinnati.
Albert felt an instant elevation of spirits, and saw
himself, thus connected, in the highway to fortune.
Buthow that little word dashed his feelings
I am sorry to say, that your habits are of so loose
and dangerous a character, that I do not think it safe
to make the association contemplated. I would not
have pained you by this announcement but in the
hope that the pain would be salutary, and lead to an
entire reform in your habits. You now see how a
young man, who indulges in drinking and other vices,
mars his prospects for life. Capital is always ready
to seek out the right kind of ability; but it as
carefully
regards sobriety and moral character, as it does
ability; for there is no safety in the latter unless
guaranteed by the former.
It so happened that, in the elation of feeling
consequent
upon the arrival of his twenty-first birth-day,
Alfred had, during the morning, indulged freely in
drinking champaign with some friends. In
consequence
,
his mind was neither very clear nor well
balanced
.
But for this, he would not have replied as
he did.
Was I brought in here merely to suffer insult?
he exclaimed, when the merchant ceased speaking.
No; was calmly replied. My purpose was to
startle you into a vivid consciousness of your
danger
,
in the hope of saving you from the ruin that
must come if you go forward in the path you have
entered.
I thank no one for such interference in my
affairs! retorted the blind and heated young man.
Very well, sir! very well! answered the
merchant
;
the anger he felt at this reaction beginning to
manifest itself. I shall interfere no more. Go your
own way; and, when it ends in destruction,
remember
that you were forwarned. I had intended
offering
you an increase of salary; but now I would
prefer
retaining you in my service no longer. When a
young man gives me any impertinence, I dismiss
him. You are at liberty to get yourself another
place.
Alfred attempted to reply; but the merchant
waved him from the room with an imperative motion
of the hand, at the same time turning from him to
the desk at which he had seated himself.
The young man then retired, but with more sober
feelings than when he came in. Soon after, he left
the store. How suddenly had the bright morning
that opened on his majority become clouded! And
from his own evil habits went up the vapours that
obscured the sun.
Stung to the quick at having been dismissed from
the service of the merchant, young Lovell shrunk
from applying to any other house in the city for a
situation as clerk.
I'll go into business, said he to himself, as he
sat reflecting on the position in which he found
himself
placed. I have capital, and I have, also, the
requisite mercantile knowledge.
From that moment his thoughts ran in a new
channel. After the required preliminaries, Alfred
came fully into possession of the little property left
to him at the death of his mother; and, on this basis,
before he attained his twenty-second year,
commenced
business for himself.
The early and long-continued separation between
the brother and sister had wrought so entire an
estrangement
,
that they rarely thought of each other.
Twice, since he left college, had Alfred visited Mary;
but she appeared shy of him, and he did not feel
very strongly attracted towards her.
As the sister's mind developed towards
woman-hood
,
however, she began to think oftener, and with
an awakening interest of her brother. This
interest
was quickened into life when she attained her
eighteenth year; and, from that time, her heart
turned towards him with an affectionate concern that
gained strength daily. The cause of this change, we
will relate.
There had been found among the papers of Mrs.
Lovell, after her death, a sealed letter addressed to
her daughter, to be placed in her hands when she
attained her eighteenth year. The request of the
14 K2
deceased mother was complied with at the proper
time. Her letter was as follows:
My dear Daughter
,As I write this, you are
playing about my room, a happy child, and all
unconscious
of the great loss you will soon have to bear in
the death of your mother. Not long have I now to
remain upon the earth. The sands in my glass have
run low; the life-blood in my heart is ebbing; a few
more fluttering pulses, and my spirit will take its
flight from earth.Ah, my child! not until you are
yourself a mother, can you understand how I am
distressed
at the thought of leaving you alone in this
selfish and cruel world! But I will not linger on
this theme.
Mary, when this letter is placed in your hands,
you will be a womanwith the heart, I trust, as well
as the developed mind of a woman. Your aunt Helen
has promised to take you, and raise you as her own
child. You, therefore, will scarcely feel, I hope, your
loss. But it will be different with your brother Alfred.
A somewhat wayward boy, he has never made many
friends, and none will be so patient and forbearing
towards
him as I have been. Most probably he will be
sent to some boarding-school, and kept there until old
enough to commence the study of a profession. There
will be no mother's care for himno sister's loving
and gentle ministrations. And thus he will grow up
and become a man. Ah! how my heart trembles as
I think of the dangers that will surround him as he
enters the world, free from the restraints of
guardianship
,
and unprotected by the sphere of home. It is
for him, Maryyour brotherthat I now address
you; and my purpose is to awaken in your mind for
him something of the anxious interest that I feel.
Where is he now, Mary? (I speak as though years
have elapsed.) What is he? Do you know? When
did you see him last? I put these questions with
trembling anxiety. Has he wandered from the right
path in search of forbidden pleasures? and is he
tasting
already the bitter fruit that hangs from every tree
that grows along the way of transgression? If so,
yours is the holy mission to bring him back. From
the world of spirits let my voice come to your ears
with this injunction.
If the fears I now express be groundlessif my
dear boy have passed thus far through the fiery ordeal
untouched by the flame, draw close to his side. In a
sister's pure, unselfish, devoted love lies a brother's
safety.
May the God of all mercies bless you and keep
you free from evil, my child.This is the tearful
prayer of
Your Mother
.
For a while after reading this letter, Mary's
feelings
were overwhelmed. It was more than a year
since she had seen Alfred, or even heard from him.
But few letters had ever passed between them. For
some months previous to the time when her mother's
letter was placed in her hands, Mary had thought a
good deal about Alfred, and a purpose to write to him
came more than once into her mind. Now she no
longer hesitated.
Two years have passed since Alfred Lovell became
a man, his prospects for life marred in consequence
of his early indulgence in the vice of drinking. As
we have seen, he determined to invest his ten
thousand
dollars in business, and begin the world for
himself
;
and this determination was acted upon. Had he
reformed his habits, abandoned his pleasure-loving,
pleasure-seeking associates, and put himself earnestly
down to business, success, under the circumstances,
would still have been doubtful; but as he gave
himself
a greater license than before, his ruin was
inevitable
.
Two years were sufficient to involve him
beyond
the hope of extrication. As difficulties closed
around him, Alfred Lovell, in whom the appetite for
drink had been steadily increasing, indulged himself
more and more freely. Nightly he drowned the
anxiety and care of the day in the cup whose dregs
are bitterness itself.
One morning, when his affairs were at their worst,
after taking his usual strong glass of brandy, to
steady his nerves, and drive away, as he sometimes
said, the blue devils, he went to his store, to
commence
the business of the day. It was to be a hard
day; for several thousand dollars in notes fell due,
and there was no balance to his credit in bank.
Where the means to lift these notes were to come
from, was more than Lovell could tell. He had
borrowed
,
in all quarters, from business friends, so
heavily, that little more could be expected from this
source. There had come, in fact, a crisis in his
affairs; and, unless relief presented itself in some
unexpected quarter, his failure that day was
inevitable
.
Lovell had been in his place of business about half
an hour, when a clerk came in from the postoffice,
and handed him a couple of letters. One of these
contained a draft for a few hundred dollars from a
customer; the other was from his sister Mary. He
started, as his eyes rested upon the signature of the
last letter. Its contents affected him visibly. They
were
My dear Brother
:It is long since I have
either seen you or heard from you. Born of the
same mother, whose love even the grave has not
extinguished
,
is it right for us to be to each other so
like strangers? Of late, I have thought of you
much; and now, my thoughts and feelings are all
suddenly awakened to a new and earnest interest
in your welfare. Do you ever think of me, Alfred?
Do you remember the time when we stood by the
grave of our parentsyou a boy of fourteen, and I a
mere child? How often, of late, has that scene come
up from my memory! I had scarcely felt our
bereavement
;
but the tears that were then upon your
face attested the keenness of your suffering. The loss
to you was a sadder one than to me, Alfredfar
sadder. I scarcely felt the change; but you lost
every thing when we lost our mother.
So vividly did this recall to Alfred Lovell the past,
that his eyes became blinded with tears, and he had
to wipe them away before he could finish the letter.
Folding the paper, after reading the last line, he
bent his eyes upon the floor, and sat musing for
some time. A man, when surrounded with
difficulties
,
and ready to be overcome by them, is very
apt, in looking at any thing presented to him, to
inquire how far it is likely to afford relief in his
pressing emergency. In thinking of his sister,
Lovell's mind instantly reverted to the ten thousand
dollars she was to receive as her portion on
reaching
the age of eighteen years. Then followed the
desire to have, at least, the use of it, for a time, in
business.
Ten thousand dollars would carry me through
all my difficulties, said he. I would pay her a
higher interest for its use than she could obtain any
where else.
He checked himself, for there came into his mind
the thought, that he was meeting his sister's
affectionate
advances in a spirit of selfish calculation. In a
little while, however, his mind took up the train of
reflections which had been broken. The pressure
upon him was great, and he could not turn himself
away from the suddenly presented hope of relief.
But all this will not pay my notes, said he,
arousing
himself from a train of reflections in which he
was framing in his mind a suitable answer to return
to Maryone that would tend to serve the selfish
purpose
which had arisen in his mind spontaneously.
I must get money some where. With this hope of
aid in the future, it will not do to give up now.
For three hours, Lovell tried faithfully to borrow a
sum sufficient to meet his payments for that day; but
he tried in vain. Two thousand dollars were yet to
make up when he returned to his store at one o'clock,
after having exhausted every means of raising money.
A mode of raising the sum required to meet his
payments
for the day had been suggested to his mind,
and it was to think over the matter that he now
returned
.
When the suggestion first came, it was
instantly
rejected. It was presented again, and this
time he looked at it for a moment. Finally, as every
expedient failed, he began to ponder it more seriously.
After returning to his store, Lovell sat down to think
as earnestly and as conclusively as possible.
This, or ruin! he at length exclaimed, starting
up and moving hurriedly about for a short time.
Mary will let me have the use of her money, I
know, and all can be made right. No one will be
injured; no one need ever know that such a
transaction
was made.
In an evil hour the tempter prevailed. Alfred
Lovell
made two fictitious notes, of two thousand dollars
each, in his own favour, and endorsed thereon the
name of a wealthy New York house, the signature
of which he had in his possession. On these notes
he readily obtained the cash from a broker with whom
he was well acquainted.
This done, he lost no time in replying to Mary's
letter.
My dear sister, he wrote, your affectionate
letter
reached me to-day, and deeply touched my
feelings
;
the more so, perhaps, because it found me
troubled
and depressed in spirits. Ah, Mary! you say
truly, that I lost every thing in losing my mother.
Thrust out among strangers, where were none to
sympathize
with me, to take me kindly by the hand, or to
breathe a word of tender regard in my ear, I suffered
more than I will attempt to describe: and, worst of all,
was exposed to evils in many dangerous and alluring
forms. I feelprincipally feelthat I am not to-day
what I would have been had my mother livednot
what I would have been, Mary, if the love and care
of a gentle sister had been mine. It was unjust, to
me at least, that early and perfect separation. For
your tender letter, my heart thanks you. Let us be,
in the future, as we should have been in the past
brother and sister in truth, and not in name only.
To this came quickly a reply from Mary, breathing
even a warmer spirit of sisterly affection than did her
first letter.
Can you not make me a short visit, Alfred, said
she. It is long since we met. I would so like to
look upon your face once more.
Alfred answered this by promising, as soon as his
business would permit him to leave New York for a
few days, to make her a short visit. The ease with
which Lovell obtained cash on forged paper, led him
to repeat the same dishonest and dangerous mode of
financiering, until he was comparatively easy in
money
matters. It was far from his purpose to wrong
any one in these transactions. He meant to provide
for the fictitious paper when it came due. All he
wanted was time to get Mary's ten thousand dollars
into his hands.
A few weeks after Mary received her first letter
from Alfred, he wrote to her he was about making
her a visit, and mentioned the time when she might
expect him. On the day that he was to come, Mary's
heart beat tumultuously from the time the morning
broke until the hour when the stage arrived that
brought her brother. She was standing at the
garden
gate, looking for his appearance, when the stage
drove up.
My dear sister! he exclaimed, as he threw his
arms around her neck and kissed her. How glad I
am to meet you once more.
There was something disordered in the look and
manner, of Alfred that seemed strange to his sister
something that caused her to shrink from him. A few
minutes only elapsed before she comprehended its
meaning. He was more than half intoxicated! Oh,
what a thrill of pain went through her heart as this
truth flashed upon her!
The sudden change in her manner was perceived
by Alfred, who, like most persons in his particular
situation, tried to conceal his lapse from sobriety by
affecting a nonchalant air, thus exposing himself
more fully to all eyes.
Alfred, said Mr. Edwards, the uncle, soon after
the young man's appearance, you are fatigued with
riding; will you not go up stairs, and lie down for an
hour or two?
Fatigued! Bless your heart, uncle, replied the
16 L
young man, that is something to which I am a
stranger. Oh no! a trip across the Rocky mountains
wouldn't fatigue me, much less a few hours ride like
this. But how well you look, aunt! addressing
Mrs. Edwards. I don't see that you have grown a
day older since I was a boy.
The aunt replied gravely. But this only caused
Alfred to be gayer and more talkative than before.
Poor Mary! How her heart did ache! Was it thus
she met her brother? Alas! were not her mother's
fears painfully realized!
For several hours the family were compelled to
bear with the young man's rude familiarity, the effect
of partial intoxication; then, as the brandy, of which
he had taken freely, began to die in him, he grew
dull and silent. Soon after tea he was induced to
retire, when Mary sought her own chamber to spend
the night in weeping.
When the brother and sister met at the
breakfast-table
,
on the next morning, both looked as if they had
passed sleepless nights. This was really the case
only with Mary. Alfred had slept soundly enough;
but his nerves, long accustomed to artificial
stimulants
,
were, as was usual in the mornings,
completely
unstrung. All the lines of his face were
drawn down, and the muscles unsteady. In lifting
his cup of coffee, his hand trembled so that he spilled
a portion of the contents on the table; and, when he
got it to his lips, he swallowed eagerly, like one
consuming
with thirst.
I'm so nervous, he said apologetically. I don't
know what is coming over me.
You are a very young man, Alfred, said Mr.
Edwards, seriously, to have so unsteady a hand.
Mine scarcely shows a tremor; and he held his
hand up steadily.
In the city, replied Alfred, none have the
robust
health you denizens of the country enjoy.
I'm afraid your city habits, more than your city
atmosphere, affect your nerves, said the uncle.
There may be something in that, was coolly
replied
.
We keep later hours, and confine ourselves
too much within doors. We have, besides, more
excitement
,
and that exhausts the nervous energy.
By the time Alfred had taken a hot cup of coffee,
his nerves became a little steadier, and the peculiar
haggard, exhausted expression, which all had noticed,
began to give way to a lively play of the features.
Soon after breakfast, he made an excuse to go down
to the village, half a mile distant from the dwelling
of Mr. Edwards. When he returned, he was in a
gayer humour than when he went away; and Mary
perceived that he had been drinking freely.
During the afternoon he went over to the village
again. He did not come back until some time after
night had closed in, and then he was so much under
the influence of liquor that he came in staggering,
and had to be guided by Mr. Edwards up to his
chamber, where he fell across the bed with all his
clothes on, and in this condition passed a greater part
of the night.
It seemed as if the young man was possessedto
make the very worst possible exhibition of himself.
The shock of all this to Mary was terrible. When
she saw her brother come reeling in after having long
waited for his return in a state of trembling anxiety,
the effect was so painful that she grew sick, and, in a
little while, fainted away. On the next morning she
did not come down to breakfast; and on going to her
room it was found that she was too ill to rise.
It was ten o'clock before Alfred joined the family.
Mr. Edwards met him, as he came down from his
room, with a grave face.
Good morning, said Alfred.
Good morning, returned Mr. Edwards, coldly.
I've rather overslept myself. said Alfred.
I don't much wonder at that! remarked his
uncle
,
in a voice that somewhat amazed the young man.
Why do you say that? he inquired, his brows
contracting as he spoke.
I hardly think my words require explanation!
said Mr. Edwards. But to speak plainly, I regret
exceedingly your present visit, seeing that it has
brought only pain to one for whom you profess to
cherish affection.
What do you mean, sir? exclaimed Alfred in a
stern voice.
Last night, replied Mr. Edwards, you came
home so much intoxicated that it was with difficulty
we could get you up to your bed. The shock to your
sister was so great, that she is seriously ill in
consequence
.
At these words Alfred sunk into a chair, nerveless,
his eyes drooping to the floor. There was silence for
nearly a minute, at the end of which time Mr.
Edwards
said
Alfred, it is plain that you have gone far in the road
to destruction. So young, and yet so abandoned to a
vice that ruins every thing! How could you come
here to blast, with your presence, the happiness of so
guileless, so innocent, so loving a creature as your
sister? It was not the act of a true brother.
The first part of this sentence touched the young
man's feelings; the last stung him to the quick, and
awoke his anger. Arising with some dignity of
manner
,
he replied in a cold, offended tone of voice
I will blast her happiness with my presence no
longer. Good morning, sir!
And he went hurriedly from the house, not
heeding
the voice of Mr. Edwards, who called after him.
It so happened that the voices of the two men were
louder in this exciting interview than either of them
supposed, and ascended to the room of Mary, who
heard distinctly nearly all that passed between them.
As Alfred left the house, she sprang from the bed
upon which she was lying, and throwing open the
window, called after him in a voice of anguish. Alfred
heard her, but he merely turned, without stopping,
and waved an adieu with his hand. Again she called,
leaning eagerly from the window; but he heeded not,
nor paused.
Ill with fever and nervous prostration, this sudden
excitement, followed by as sudden a reaction, sus
pended again the vital action in Mary's system. Her
uncle was still standing where Alfred had left him,
when he was startled by the jar of some heavy body
falling above. Ascending the stairs at a bound, and
opening the door of Mary's room, he discovered his
niece lying senseless upon the floor.
The effect of this added shock was of the most
serious
character. Mary was dangerously ill for a week.
Then she began to recover slowly, and nearly two
weeks more elapsed ere she was well enough to leave
her chamber. As she gained strength enough to sit
up, her mind began to turn, with a troubled interest,
to Alfred! Alas! how sadly had the fears of their
mother been realized!
One day (it was after her strength had sufficiently
returned to sit up most of her time) Mary took from
its place of deposit the letter of her mother, and read
it over again, weeping at every sentence. Then,
refolding
,
she placed it in her bosom, and clasping her
hands together, looked up and prayed audibly
Heavenly Father, call back my wandering
brother
!
O, save him from the direful evil into which
he has fallen! Give strength and intelligence of
purpose
to enable me to follow and win him from the
error of his ways!
In that moment of devotion, when the earnest love
of her pure heart went forth unselfishly towards her
brother, she resolved to save the erring one at any
sacrifice she dared to make.
From that moment Mary recovered rapidly. A
month afterwardsnot once in that time had she heard
from Alfredshe said to her aunt
I have, after much prayer and reflection, made up
my mind to do a thing that I know both you and
uncle
will disapprove.
What is that? inquired Mrs. Edwards, looking
surprised and alarmed.
I am going to New York.
What!
I am going to New York to see after Alfred.
Are you beside yourself, Mary? said Mrs.
Edwards
.
No, aunt. My mind was never clearer nor calmer.
You have never seen that!
And, as she spoke, she handed Mrs. Edwards her
mother's letter. After reading this over twice, the
aunt, who was a good deal affected by it, sat silent
for the space of many minutes. Some thoughts
passed through her mind that were far from being
pleasant. She it was who had caused so rigid a
separation
,
even from the first, between the brother and
sister; and this letter of the dying mother came to
her with a strong rebuke.
Mary, said she, at length, in a voice slightly
disturbed, you must not think of doing as you have
just said.
Aunt! returned Mary, speaking strongly, my
mother has spoken to me from the grave. Can I
disregard
her solemn injunction? No! If my own heart
did not prompt me to what I am about doing, this
17
weight of responsibility that she has laid upon me,
would be sufficient.
Mary, Mary! this cannot be. Some other means
must be adopted.
No influence as strong as mine can be brought to
bear upon him, quickly replied Mary. On me the
duty of reclaiming him devolves, and it must not be
delegated to another.
It was all in vain that Mrs. Edwards sought to
influence
the mind of her niece. Her resolution to do
what she said remained unaltered.
When the matter came before the uncle, he was
greatly excited about it, and said that he would
permit
no such ridiculous conduct on the part of Mary.
But he was not long in discovering that the maiden,
young as she was, had formed a resolution which
was not in the least to be shaken. Neither angry
denunciation, nor kind persuasion had the smallest
effect upon her. Being of legal age, she was now
free from all constraining influence. Reluctantly, at
length, the aunt and uncle were forced to let her go;
and she started, alone, on her mission of love. We
say alone, in the true sense. An escort was obtained
for her, and she was consigned to the care of some
friends of Mr. and Mrs. Edwards in New York; but,
so far as her mission was concerned, she was alone.
When Alfred Lovell went back, humbled,
mortified
,
and disappointed in the real object of his visit
to his sister, he felt like a criminal with the hounds
of the law upon his track. In the desperation of his
feelings, when ruin stared him in the face, he had to
escape that ruin, madly resorted to forgerynot with
the intent to wrong any one, but as a temporary
expedient
to obtain relief; and now, no way to escape
the dreadful consequences of that act presented
itself.
Accursed brandy! he muttered between his teeth,
as he sat in his room, with a bottle of the fiery poison
before him, on the night of his return to New York.
Accursed brandy! Once you came between me and
a fortune; and once between me and salvation from
ruin. Accursed thing!
Like a maniac he ground his teeth, while an insane
light flashed angrily from his eyes.
I shall go mad! he at length said, in a calmer
voice, mad! mad! And he poured a glass full of
brandy as he spoke. In my bane let me find an
antidote.
Eagerly he swallowed this large draught of spirits.
Then covering both hands over his face, he leaned
back in the large chair in which he was sitting, and
rocked himself with a quick, nervous motion. After
awhile, this motion ceased, and his heavy apoplectic
breathing told that he was asleep.
It was long after midnight when he awoke. The
lamp was flickering in its expiring pulsations, when
he started up from a terrible dream of the courthouse
and prison, and it was minutes before he was able to
comprehend his true position. Then, with a heavy
groan, he threw himself across the bed, and thus
passed the hours till morning.
Already Lovell had forged paper to the amount of
six thousand dollars, and still he was under a pressure.
The horrible fear that now came over him, in view of
the failure to make a right impression on his sister's
mind, prevented a further progress in that dungeon's
ward. To retrace his steps was now the most earnest
thought in his mind. But how was he to get back?
He might struggle on and keep afloat for a few months
longer, but when the forged paper came due, he would
have no means of protecting it. He shuddered, as a
thought of the consequences glanced through his
mind.
One day, a few weeks after Lovell's return from
his visit to his sister, he had just succeeded in raising
sufficient money to meet his payments, and was
begining
to turn his thoughts on the ways and means of
getting through the morrow, when a sheriff's officer
presented himself and arrested him. For some cause
the suspicions of the holders of one of his fictitious
notes were aroused, and, on taking it to the firm whose
endorsement it bore, it was promptly pronounced a
forgery.
So completely prostrated was the young man by
this event, that he made no attempt to get bail; but
went to the Tombs; and as he sat in despair in his
cell, hearkened to the suggestions of the tempter, and
meditated self destruction.
He had been for an hour within the prison's gloomy
walls. Thought had driven him almost to madness.
Hurriedly passed in review before him his brief
career
,
and he saw the follies of his life in all their
darker shades. I have dragged ruin down upon
my own head! he murmured, as he wrung his hands
in agony. Disgrace, exposure! He shuddered.
I cannot meet these!
There was a small knife in the pocket of the
wretched man, and his hand was upon it. He was
slowly drawing it forth, when a key rattled suddenly
in the lock of the door, which, in a moment after,
swung open and a woman closely veiled, entered.
My brother! she exclaimed, drawing aside the
veil, and showing the face of Mary. My brother!
and she sunk down beside him on the prison couch
where he sat, and, throwing an arm around his neck,
hid her face on his breast, and wept violently.
Oh Alfred! Alfred! she sobbed after the lapse
of a short time, why are you here?
And why are you here, Mary? asked the young
man, in as firm a voice as he could assumeyet its
steadiness did not conceal the agony that was in his
heart.
I have come to save you, Alfred; if that be
possible
,
It is too late, Mary, replied Alfred; too late!
Say not so, my brother. It is never too late while
life throbs in the veins.
It is too late, Mary, too late! repeated the young
man wildly.
Be calm, my brother, said Mary, herself
growing
calm, and speaking with a kind of enthusiasm.
Tell me why you are here?
Do you not know? quickly asked the brother.
I arrived in the city but an hour ago, and learned,
on inquiring for you, that you were here. But the
cause was not stated.
Seek no further knowledge on this subject, said
Alfred. Go home again, and forget that you ever
had a brother.
Alfred, replied Mary, with much feeling, I
came here to be to you a true sister; to make any
sacrifice
in my power to secure your good. Tell me,
then, why you are here, that I may procure your
release
.
Confide in me.
Go, Mary, go! said the young man, pushing
her away.
I will not leave you, Alfred, except to procure
your release.
I am a criminal! exclaimed the brother, with a
sudden energy of expression.
The face of Mary grew instantly pale, and a
shudder
passed over her. Seeing the effect of his words,
Lovell said
But not in heart, Mary. I did not mean to wrong
any one.
He then, in a calm voice, related to his sister all
the particulars of his case, concealing nothing in
extenuation
,
except his purpose to get the use of her
portion. When he had done, Mary arose from the
bed upon which she had been sitting.
I will see you again in a short time, said she,
moving towards the door, on the outside of which
stood the turnkey.
What are you going to do? asked Alfred.
Procure your release, replied Mary.
Mary but she was gone.
It was late in the afternoon, and an old gentleman,
senior member of a large importing house in Pearl
street, sat reading a newspaper, when the door of
his counting-room, in which he was, alone, opened,
and a young lady stepped in. As she drew aside her
veil, he saw that her face, which was pale, and had a
look of distress, was one of singular beauty. Not a
brilliant beauty, but one in which sweetness and
innocence
were leading features.
Mr. R? said she, in a low, unsteady voice.
My name, replied the old gentleman, as he arose
and offered her a chair.
She sat down, but was so overcome by her feelings,
that it was some time before she could utter any thing
further. At length she said
My brother is in prison at your instance.
Your brother! Who is he?
A young man who, in great extremity, madly
resorted to the forgery of your name, in order to
obtain
money.
Lovell?
Yes, Alfred Lovell. But he did not mean to
wrong you in the end, said Mary in a pleading voice.
It was only an expedient.
The merchant shook his head and looked serious.
I have just seen him in prison, and this to me is
his solemn asseveration. I believe it.
There was an air about the young lady that
inspired
Mr. R with a feeling of both interest and
respect.
18 M2
Your brother, he replied, is now in the hands
of the law. He is beyond my control.
I am just of legal age, said Mary, after a pause
of some moments, and am to receive ten thousand
dollars in my own right. This I will devote to the
safety of my brother. As orphan children we were
separated, and now, after many years, my heart turns
to him again, and I am ready to sacrifice every thing
for him. Have you a son and daughter, sir?
The tone and look with which this last sentence
was spoken, touched the merchant's feelings, and
softened his heart. Before Mary came in, he had felt
exceedingly angry towards Lovell, and was resolved
to let the law have full course, if it condemned the
unhappy young man to an expiation of his criminal
error within the walls of a state prison.
What can I do in the matter? he asked, in a
voice that was changed and much subdued.
If I meet all the loss that has been sustained, so
that harm comes to no one, will it not be in your
power to save my brother from the legal penalties of
his error?
The merchant cast his eyes to the floor, and
remained
for some time thoughtful.
I do not know you, said he, at length, looking
up.
Mary understood his meaning fully. A warm tinge
came to her cheeks, as she replied
True; but if I can bring you evidence to show
that what I say about having ten thousand dollars is
true, will you procure my brother's immediate
release
from prison?
Your friends may not permit you to use this
money in the way you propose.
It was my mother's before she died, answered
Mary, with a good deal of feeling, and I will use it
as she would do were she now living. No friends
can control its disposition. Do you know Mr.
Edward
P?
Very well.
Come with me to his house.
Are you in his family?
Yes, while I remain in the city.
You do not live in New York?
No sir.
The merchant was more and more favourably
impressed
with Mary every moment; and to this
favourable
impression was rapidly succeeding a feeling of
lively interest. After another long pause for
reflection
,
he said
And you will secure all parties from loss in
consequence
of your brother's unfortunate errors.
I willand you may trust my word.
But you do not know to what extent he has
committed
forgeries.
He has assured me, solemnly, that the whole
amount of money obtained by him in this way was
but six thousand dollars.
There was another long pause, and then the
merchant
said, as he arose
Remain here for a quarter of an hour, and I will
see what can be done.
How anxiously did the sister wait for Mr. R's
return! It was over half an hour before he came
back.
Take that to the keeper of the prison, said he, as
he came in, extending, as he spoke, a paper, and he
will set your brother free.
May the Lord bless you, and reward you a
thousand
fold, replied Mary, lifting her tearful eyes
upwards
,
as she seized the papers. Then turning quickly
away, she said, in a hurried voice, as she was leaving
the room,
I will see you again, sir.
For nearly an hour after Mary left his cell, the
unhappy
young man paced the narrow apartment in
which he was confined, his feelings alternating
between
hope and fear, shame, despair, and bitter
self-condemnation
.
In that short space of time was
recorded
the rebuking memories of years.
Oh! how madly have I pulled down ruin upon
my own head! he exclaimed, throwing his arms into
the air, soon after Mary had gone on her errand of
mercy. For the mere pleasure of sense, I have
sacrificed
my best interests on earth, and almost my
hopes of heaven.
Exhausted by the violence of his emotion, Lovell
at length dropped upon his bed, and burying up his
face, lay suffering most intensely for a time longer.
As he lay thus, the door of his cell opened. He heard
the key in the wards, and the noise of the door as it
turned upon its hinges; he heard, also, light feet upon
the paved floor, approaching him quickly, but he did
not look up. A hand was placed upon his arm. It
was that of his sister, and he knew the touch. Still,
he did not look up.
Alfred, said a low, eager voice, come! You
are free!
Free! returned the young man, now rising up,
but slowly. Free, did you say, sister?
Yes, Alfred, free. Come! let us hasten from this
dreadful place.
And you have done this, Mary?
Yes, Alfred, I have done it; or rather, it has been
done through my intercession. But come, brother,
come! I cannot bear to have you remain here a
single
moment longer.
God bless you, Mary! said Alfred, with deep
fervourGod bless you! I do not deserve such a
sister. You are my good angel. O, that you had
power to lead me from the labyrinth of evil into which
my feet have strayed.
The young man still remained sitting on the bed.
Come! repeated Mary.
I had better remain here, than go out and be as I
have been, murmured Alfred, half to himself.
Will you do one thing? asked Mary; one
thing for my sake. All that I possess have I pledged
for you. Will
Speak, sister! If it is my life, it is yours.
It is a little thing in itself, but great in its
consequences
.
I promise.
Will you abandon the cup of bewilderment? Will
you
Mary! said Alfred, interrupting herhe spoke
in a solemn voiceI promise, before Heaven, to do
this.
Then you are safe! Come! responded Mary, in
eager tones.
The young man arose, and followed his sister out.
A carriage awaited them, in which they drove to a
hotel. On the next morning they left the city. An
assignment of the business was then made in New
York for the benefit of his creditors. All the forged
paper was taken up by Mary, notwithstanding the
opposition of her unclewho was angry beyond
measure
at her conduct in the affairs of her brotherand
being destroyed, left no evidence against him. The
remainder of her property she placed in his hands as
a basis for new business efforts. In these, guided by
former experience, he was more successful than in
his former trial.
Five or six years have elapsed, and Alfred Lovell
is now an active member in a rapidly growing house
in Philadelphia, the senior partner of which is the
husband of his sister. Faithfully has he kept his
promise
to Mary, made in the gloomy cell of a prison.
And, verily, for her self-sacrificing, sisterly devotion,
she has had her reward.
CHARLEY RANDOLPH.
By Francis C. Woodworth
.
I do
not wonder that Fancy, when unchecked by
revelation, has so often represented this world as a
vast arena, on which two rival bands of genii, like
the gladiators of a former age, are constantly
contending
for the mastery. I do not wonder that in the
mythic poetry of that age, every man is supposed to
have attached to him a good demon and an evil one
the former prompting to noble, virtuous deeds, and the
latter leading the soul astray; for, after all, there never
was a scion of superstition engrafted on the
dismembered
trunk of truth, that had not its origin in truth
some truth or other. It must be so; else that scion
would not be homogeneous enough to grow there,
and ripen its fruit. Superstition is the poetry, the
romance
of the invisible world. In it, if we will seek
for them there, we may always find indexes of known
or probable truths. In many instances, indeed, it is
scarcely necessary to do more than render this poetry,
this
mythos
, into prose, to discover the truth. No one
I am sure, accustomed to habits of thought, especially
if he sets himself to work to trace the relation between
causes and effects in the moral world, whether or not
he receives the sentiment of Milton as something
more than a poet's imagery, that
Millions of spiritual creatures walk the earth,
Unseen, both when we wake and when we sleep
No such one, I am confident, can resist the conviction
that we are all surrounded by two opposite and
conflicting
classes of influences and motivesthe one
leading to virtue and holiness, the other to vice and
crime. One of the most fearful problems which the
lapse of years has eventually solved under my eye,
has been, whether, in the life of one whom I loved,
this class of influences and motives would prevail, or
that. And it is often not a problem, which, to the
human perception, is solved at once. Oh, what
struggles
have I seen between reason, conscience, religion,
on the one hand,and appetite, passion, and the syren
of vice, on the other!
Reader, will you listen to a little sketch from my
portfolio, of this character? It is a sad onetoo sad,
perhaps you will say. But it carries a lesson along
with it which is worth learning, and if learned, is
worthy of being engraved with the point of a diamond
on the memory of every one, and especially of every
young man. It is a sketch of a tempted, struggling,
falling, fallen man.
It was in the spring of 184-, that I last visited the
graveyard of the little village of C, some miles
inland from one of the most charming cities in
Connecticut
.
I love a country graveyard. I love to read
the inscriptions, rude and uncouth as many of them
are, upon the stones which mark the resting-place of
the departed. But I love this inclosure more than
any other. It is the graveyard of my native village.
Here rest the ashes of a mother whom I almost
worshipped
;
and here too is the form of a cherished
sister, a flower cut down while yet fair and lovely,
and transferred to heaven. Side by side they rest
all that is earthly of the mother and the sister; and
as I sit near the mounds above them, I seem to hold
a closer and sweeter communion with their spirits.
While I was wandering among the graves in this
inclosure, during the visit to which I have alluded,
my attention was directed to one evidently made but
a few months. The earth was fresh around it, and it
was plain that the chisel of the untutored sculptor
had just traced the words of a mourner's love upon
that humble headstone. I turned to read them:
Charles Randolph, died Feb. 22d, 184-, aged 31
years. It was the name of one whom I once loved
as a brother! Though somewhat my senior in years,
the closest intimacy and friendship existed between
us during the sunny period of boyhood. We shared
each other's little joys and sorrows. We sat side by
side in the village school. We gamboled in the woods
and meadows together. The sports of one were never
complete without the presence of the other. And
Charles was dead! His sun had gone down while it
was yet day. How did he fall? I must tell you.
I had not heard of my friend for several years
preceding the time when I first saw his tombstone.
I had not forgotten him. But amid the cares of my
19 N
profession, I gradually ceased to correspond with
him, and I at length lost the place of his residence.
The last time I saw him was at his wedding. Charles
married long after I left C for a distant home;
but I was summoned to witness his happiness. The
object of his choice was one with whom we had both
been familiar from childhood. She was a charming
girl. Often, at school, have I looked slyly at her
over the top of my spelling-book, from my seat across
the room, and thought there was no face so beautiful,
no form so graceful and fairy-like, as Emma's. I am
but an indifferent philosopher. I never made any
pretensions in that way. But since a riper manhood
has overtaken me, I have often stopped a moment or
two, with perchance a slight fluttering of the heart,
as my memory daguerreotyped anew the scenes of
my childhood, to inquire what was the meaning of
some of those earlier emotions. I have analyzed them
not a little, and endeavoured, though never so as to
satisfy myself, to place them under their appropriate
caption in psychology. Verily, love has some curious
and unaccountable phases, or there were ingenious
and well-executed counterfeits of it in circulation
among some of us, long before we had reached the
first of those broad stairs in our progress towards
maturity
,
called the
teens
. But I am a poor philosopher,
as I said before.
Charles and Emma were young when they met at
the altaryoung and happy. They were not rich.
Their parents did not entail on them the curse of a
fortune. They gave them a respectable setting
out, to use the stereotype expression current in our
neighbourhoodthey gave them that, and their
blessing
no
more. With that patrimony, Charles and
his bride, soon after their union, catching the
enthusiasm
of the enterprising sons and daughters of
Connecticut, left their pleasant home and emigrated
westward, to seek their fortune in the wilderness of
northern Pennsylvania. At this point I lost sight of
themwith one of them for everwith the other, till
I saw her a crushed and broken-hearted widowa
Naomi, returned to bury her husband, and to die
among her kindred. The important incidents in their
history subsequent to the period of their emigration,
I learned from a reliable source in C.
Charles was an industrious, ambitious mana
daring fellow he was, too. If there were any dangers
to be encountered in our youthful exploits, Charley
Randolph was always summoned to lead the way.
He carried this spiritso indispensable to a farmer
beginning his career in a forest where the axe of the
woodman had never been heardto his new home, if
home that spot could be called which had to offer
him only the logs for his cottage. He set resolutely
to work; the tall oaks and pines fell fast around him:
soon he had a housea log house, to be sure, but it
was comfortable enough, they thoughtand Emma
said, laughingly, that they would at least have a
practical
illustration of that very romantic scene, love in
a cottage. And so they did, without so much as
consulting a single fashionable French novel to learn
the art.
The detailed routine of an emigrant's lifehis
struggles with the giants of the forest, amid the
thousand
privations consequent upon a life so far removed
from the delights of refined societywould be tedious
enough. I shall be excused, if I pass hastily over
these matters. It will suffice to say that on the
banks of the Susquehanna, near one of those many
grand and glorious gorges between two contiguous
hills that mark that noble stream in its tortuous flow
towards the vale of Wyoming, there soon appeared a
farm, abundantly rewarding the labour of the
husbandman
,
and that farm was Charles Randolph's.
More than four years had passed. Other settlers had
arrived. It was not so lonely in that Pennsylvania
forest. God had prospered my friend. He was
happyso was Emma. Why should they not be
happy? Their hearts were intwined together as
closely as the tendrils of the ivy on the old oak which
they had left near their cottage door, to bless them
with its shade, and to be a home for the robin and
the bluebird. That was enough to make them happy.
But God gave them another blessing. Oh! what joy
there was in that cottage, as little Josephine passed
successively through the stages of frolicking, lisping,
creeping, walking, and, I scarcely know what besides.
Then heaven sent them another babe, and their cup
of joy was full. Did Charles forget God, then, as he
pressed his boy to his heart, and as he heard the idol
of his affections, his own Emma, call the little one
Charley? I know not.
Charles, my dear, you will not go out to night,
will you? It rains very fast, and I want you at
home. Did you know you had one of the most
selfish wives in the world, Charles? So said Mrs.
Randolph, perhaps less than a year after the event
just related; and, as she said it, she looked more sad
than usual, for she had observed a change in her
husband
,
a slight change, but it alarmed her a little. He
did not love home less, perhaps
perhaps!
but he
had learned to find pleasure in the bar-room of a
neighbouring tavern, which some Yankee settler, with
an enthusiastic desire to promote the public good, had
recently erected. The loving, trusting wife knew
that her husband went there simply for society; but
N2
she had a lurking, undefinable, almost prophetic fear
that it might not always be thus.
In a moment, Randolph determined he would stay
at home that night. But then he thought of an
engagement
might
not that engagement have been
innocently set aside?and he said, tenderly, I think
I must go, dear; but I will not stay long.Charles
Randolph! take care! Thou hast already placed thy
feet on one of the
steps to ruin!
Take care! Listen
to the voice of thy better genius. Hark! it whispers
to thee now. Nay, heed not that other voice. Let
not the tempter lure thee to thy ruin. Stop! thou
hast even now cause to tremble. Hast thou not
already
entered the wicket-gate that leads from the path
of virtue and peace, to the path of vice and sorrow?
Take care! think of thy wife, Charles, and of thy
dear little babes. Alas! he has gone, and the
partner
of his bosom is kneeling at the cradle of her boy,
and pouring out her heart to God for the tempted
man. Tears, bitter tears, roll down her cheeks. Can
it be?but no, nothat were impossible! and she is
calm again. Thus it is with the sorrow-stricken
woman
,
the victim of a grief she cannot reveal, and of a
fear she cannot acknowledge, even to herself. Love,
pure as an angel's and stronger than the grave; hope,
lighting up the darkest night; trust, that spurns every
suspicion, as the voice of the tempter; constancy, like
the everlasting hills;these nerve her arm, and
impart
to her a heroism a thousand-fold more worthy of
the world's applause than that which is exhibited on
the battle-field.
Charles Randolph, the devoted husband and fond
father, loved more and more the excitement of the
bar-room. Many, many times, when his wife
tearfully
remonstrated with him, he resolved to leave that
dangerous path. But his resolutions were broken. In
less than seven years from the day of his marriage,
he was a confirmed inebriate. Poverty stared that
family in the face. His grim visage entered the door
of their cottage, and became an inmate there.
Another year passedtwo, perhaps. One night,
a bleak, cold, stormy night in February, that poor
victim of intemperance sought his accustomed haunt,
the tavern. Like an insect that plays around the
flame which is consuming him, fascinated by the
blaze, Randolph, though sensible that he was
descending
the steps to ruin, was yet urged on by an
appetite
which he had not now the power to control. That
was a bitter cold night: fiercely howled the winds
around the once happy home of Charles and Emma.
The snow fell profusely, and was hurled into drifts as
it reached the earth. Long and anxiously the wife and
mother looked for the absent onebut he came not.
He left the inn late, with the bottle in his hand. Poor
man! His tale is soon told:
Nor wife, nor children, more shall he behold,
Nor friends, nor sacred home.
He was found, when the morning dawned, lying in
the road near his cottage, stiff and cold, with his dog
caressing him, and striving to rouse him from the
sleep of death!
A SINGLE GLASS OF WINE.
By Mrs. R. S. Harvey
.
I wouldn't
marry an awkward man, or one who
has a stoop in the shoulders, would you, Charlotte?
said the lively Sarah Cunningham, as a small party
of young ladies lingered over the dessert in Mr.
Cunningham's
dining-room. I don't think it likely I
shall ever marry, said Charlotte Ludlow, demurely
placing a nut between the nut-crackers. Oh no, of
course not, returned the first speaker, like all
proper young ladies, we all expect to be grave and
sorrowful old maids; but suppose such a thing were
to happen; wouldn't you like your husband to be
tall and noble looking, so that you could look up to
him admiringly? No, I don't think I care much
for personal appearance; but I should like him to be
wise as Socrates, and eloquent as Cicero. And
what would
you
like, sister Julia? said the youngest
of the party, addressing one whose earnest eye
betokened
a mind intelligent and reflecting beyond the
others. I should have no objection to personal
beauty or brilliant talents, certainly, replied Julia
Cunningham, with a smile; but oh, she added, in
a more serious tone, I could not love one that I did
not believe beyond the dominion of any vice. Vice!
why how came you to think of such a thing? asked
Sarah inquiringly. Who'd dream of marrying a
vicious man? None of us, I'm sure, replied her
sister; but the thought was suggested by passing
a person in the street this morning, of genteel
appearance
,
and so dreadfully intoxicatedI crossed the
street with an involuntary shudderbut, as I turned
away, I sighed to think, that perhaps some wife had
once loved him, some sister had had pride in him.
Once loved him! repeated Charlotte; why, if she
once loved him, she must love him yet; you know,
the old song says
`When once her gentle bosom knows
Love's flame, it wanders never;
Deep in her heart the passion glows
She loves and loves for ever.'
20
Songs are not always the best authority, even in
love matters, replied Julia; for my part, I think I
could love through every test of feeling but that. I
could endure disappointment, grief, and toilbut
degradation
never!
Well, if that's so shocking,
said Sarah, quickly, I'd better just tap William
Russell on the shoulder when I next see him
indulging
in a glass of wine. There's no knowing what
might come of it. A laugh all round followed this
sally, and Julia replied, smiling, Don't give
yourself
the trouble, sister dear, it would not be worth
while to trust one with aught else, that could not be
trusted to take a glass of wine
. A lively bantering
on the theme of William Russell now commenced, and
Sarah declared that he was to be the happy man from
four inferences which she was ready to demonstrate;
and the mirth was ringing some lively peals when
Julia interposedHush, you noisy ones; papa is
taking his after-dinner nap in the next room, and it is
the only indulgence, you know, which dear papa ever
allows himself. I wish papa would get rich, said
Sarah, with a half sigh, then he needn't wear
himself
out so in this everlasting
business!
I don't see
much chance of that, returned Julia, while
business
is so dull, and there are so many birds in the
nest which papa has to keep warm and comfortable.
Then suppose some of us take a fly, said Sarah;
you are the oldest, why don't you begin? This
renewed the easily-excited laughter, for youth waits
not for real wit to provoke the smile; and Julia,
shaking her finger admonishingly, arose to summon
the servant to remove the things. A promenade was
now arranged by the rest of the party, who ran rapidly
up stairs for the bonnets and the mantles, and Julia,
entering the room where her father was sleeping,
softly arranged the window curtain that the light
might not fall upon his face. She then gathered up
the music which had been littered about, and placed
it neatly in the music-rack: restored the room to its
wonted orderly appearance, and, drawing her
workstand
to the window, took up her needlework and
commenced sewing steadily. As she worked, some
sweet thought which had nestled in her heart
expanded
itself upon her expressive face. First the
dark eye lightened with a brilliant animation, and the
lips parted in a happy smilebut then came an
expression
of softened grief, and tears sprang to her
eyes.
Julia Cunningham was the eldest of a large and
lovely family, and both parents had ever turned to
her in the vicissitudes of their earthly career, as a
solace, and, in some sense, a support. Mrs
Cunningham
,
a woman of gentle and retiring spirit, feeble in
health, and worn down by the cares of a numerous
household, had gradually assigned to Julia a place
better becoming the head of a family, and had
delighted
to find refuge in her energy and promptitude
from those petty and harassing cares which follow in
the train of a large family and straitened means; and
Mr. Cunningham, suddenly plunged from apparent
affluence into a long and weary struggle with
embarrassed
circumstances, had found, in his intelligent
O
and thoughtful daughter, one always ready to listen
to his plansto sympathize in his disappointments,
and to inspire the heart anew with the sweet
encouragements
of hope. And Julia's was not a passive
sympathy with either parent. Most people in their
station of life thought it necessary to keep two or
three domestics, but Julia arose early to arrange the
breakfast-room, and see that all was comfortable for
her father's early meal; and then she was always
ready for the nursery, helping mamma with the little
ones, so that the Cunninghams were always neat and
orderly with but one servant. Dearly, too, as she
loved the indulgence of her own refined tastes, which
her parents had spared no pains to cultivate with
their then ample means, she was always ready to lay
aside the book, and put up the drawing to instruct
a little brother or sister who was too young to go to
school; and when new clothes were to be provided,
and seasonable arrangements made, none made the
purse hold out so well as Julia, and no fingers flew so
fast as hers in the domestic manufactory. What
wonder, then, that the parents sighed, as well as
smiled, at beholding not a few of the other sex ready
to lay the heart offering on the shrine of their fair
daughter! What wonder, while they watched with
anxious solicitude the choice that would bind up her
earthly destinies, they talked pensively to each other
of the blank that would follow in their household!
I cannot see any reason for haste in the matter,
said Mr. Cunningham to his wife, as they stole away
from the parlour to indulge in an hour of sober chat
in their own apartment. Hard as you toil and strive
for them, my dear, I think you will never see reason
to be in haste to part with any of your daughters,
replied Mrs. Cunningham. But Julia is only twenty,
and I don't wish any of them to marry before
twenty-five
;
that's young enough, in my opinion. Well,
dear, the hurry is this:William Russell is going to
the South to commence a new business, and he is
afraid of losing the treasure he covets. Mr. Graves
proposed last evening, and was refused, and William,
with a lover's watchfulness, suspects the truth, and
suspects, moreover, that yet another is ready, and
that's why, he told me this morning, he so urges the
matter. Well, I will not consent to his taking her
away, while he is uncertain as to his own success,
and permanent establishment. Let him try it a year,
and then there will be a better certainty for her.
No doubt there would, replied his wife; I think
you are very right; but you prefer William Russell,
do you not, to any of her admirers? Yes, I
certainly
do. William has struggled with the world,
and knows what it is; has long provided for a mother
and sisters, even before his prodigal father was taken
away, and I regard his character as so fixed, that I
would sooner trust my child to his care than to any
other's. Yet I have never seen a man I think worthy
of Julia! Nor ever would, said his wife, smiling,
should you live a hundred years! and, indeed, I do
not know how we shall do without her. Sarah, and
Emma, and all are good girls, but they are not Julia.
Just so thought William Russell, as most reluctantly
he subscribed to Mr. Cunningham's condition, and
wended his way without the companion he had hoped
would render it interesting. But the year, like other
years, rolled its steady round, and was gathered to its
progenitors beyond the flood; and the stated time had
come, and a few, but valued friends, assembled at
Mr. Cunningham's mansion to celebrate the happy
day. Strange, that so many tears should fall upon
a happy day! strange, that so many serious faces
should be seen in that cheerful home upon a happy
day! The parents looked grave, and even sadthe
bright, gay Sarah drenched her blonde with tears as
the ceremony proceeded, and even the little ones felt
that there was something in the scene more solemn
than they could penetrate, as the vow was spoken, to
be faithful, loving until death. Julia had struggled
nobly to preserve the usual composure of her
manner
had
kept down the choking heart, while her
mother
and sisters sobbed farewell; but on the bosom of
her father she wept so long and passionately, that the
bridegroom playfully remonstrated, and with gentle
force urged her to the carriage which was to convey
them away. Strange anomaly of human nature! As
the rapid movement hid the gaze of loving faces from
her view, she felt with the husband for whom she had
chosen to leave all sitting by her side, almost desolate
The parents of Julia Cunningham had concurred
in her choice, because they believed that the fine
person
and engaging manners of Russell were united to
a character beyond the power of circumstances to
change; and every possible support had been given
to this opinion, in all the years that he had mingled
as a man among his fellows. The fact of having a
mother and sisters depending on his exertions, had
poised the natural buoyancy of his temperament with
thoughtfulness and consideration: and straitened
circumstances
had rendered it necessary to deny himself
the indulgence of society. Now, his position was
greatly altered. His mother had been removed by
deathhis sisters well provided for by opulent
husbands
his
business was rapidly increasing, and with
no wants to provide for but his young wife's with her
domestic habits, William felt that his burden was a
light one. The society into which they were thrown
was a hospitable, and rather convivial one, and in the
admiration his beautiful and intelligent Julia excited,
the husband experienced a new source of delight,
and felt little inclined to limit any indulgence from
which she might derive gratification.
And thus are the avenues to temptation thrown
open! In the hours of ease and indulgence, in the
garb of brightness and beauty, the bosom's foe assails
us, and well for those who waken to resistance, before
the ruin is complete! Strong in the undoubting
confidence
of youth, Julia feared no evil; and three
years had flown away so pleasantly, she scarcely
knew them gone. Each year she had passed a few
weeks under the paternal roof, and the rejoicing
parents
united in the belief, that their daughter's
wedded
life was all that could be desired. A change was,
however, approaching! and William Russell informed
his wife, that the tide was setting against him.
Business
21 O2
falling off, losses here and there, had made a
serious diminution in their income, and he thought
they would try to live more economically.
Certainly
,
said Julia, readily, I remember well how
papa retrenched his family expenses, and it all came
right again; and he is so prosperous now. But I
am sorry you should go over again for me, said the
husband in a dissatisfied tone, the painful lessons of
your youth. They were not painful, replied Julia,
cheerfully; I never was happier in all my life, than
when, by some alteration or contrivance, I saved papa
a new expense. I am no admirer of small savings,
said William, with a faint smile. Then suppose
we save a large sum, right out, returned Julia
animatedly
.
If we decline Judge Hastings's party to
night, and attend no more large ones this fall, we shall
not need to give our own annual entertainment in the
winter, and that will save a heap of money, and a
world of trouble. Oh, that is looking too far ahead;
besides, we must go to-night, for I am anxious to see
a friend whom I promised to meet there; it will do us
good, too, Julia; I want cheering up. Julia thought
she had never seen her husband less cheerful, than
when they returned from the brilliant festivity. He
seemed so flushed, so feverish and weary, and she
wishedshe scarcely knew whythat he would
attend
no more parties. A few days after this, a letter
was received by Mr. Russell, imparting the
melancholy
intelligence of the very sudden death of Mrs.
Cunningham. He broke the news to Julia as
tenderly
as possible, and her father wrote almost
immediately
,
entreating her to come to him, for some time,
in this hour of his desolation. And how long will
you stay? said William, as Julia completed her
mournful preparation for the journey. I ought to
remain, dear William, at least three months, she
replied
.
They will need me now so much! Three
months is a long time, said the husband, but I must
try to do without you! When Julia returned, she
found things getting worse rather than better, with
her husband; and notwithstanding she practised every
possible self-denial for herself, and extended it to their
household in every way that he would permit, the
cloud gathered strength rather than dispersed. There
was an alteration in him, too, which occasioned her
deep anxiety. So uncertain and fitful in spirits, so
careless in management, so easily irritated. She
could not understand it, and she sought the reason
in the trials of his business, in the loss of quiet, in the
failure of health, in every cause but the right one.
Some days passed on, and a card of invitation was
sent, for another gay party. Julia handed it to her
husband, and asked if he would write an apology.
Why not go? he said, inquiringly. My black
dress is a sufficient excuse, if I needed one, she
replied
,
with a tear, but I do not; Mrs. Everett will
not expect
me
. Well, I will look in a little while,
perhaps, said William, and I can explain.
The evening came, and, saying he would return
early, as she did not accompany him, William
Russell
left his wife to a solitary evening. While she sat
plying her needle, her thoughts wandered to her
youthful home, her doating father, her affectionate
sisters; and while she paid a new tribute of grief to the
memory of the beloved mother so lately taken from her,
she felt that that home, even now, in its bereaved hour,
possessed the elements of a quiet comfort, of which
her own was destitute. The needle became a
dangerous
companion, and she took up a book; but it
failed to rivet her attention. She looked at her watch:
it was past eleven, and she became uneasy and
apprehensive
.
Twelve, one, and two followed slowly, and
she walked the floor to still the feverish beating of
her heart. He would not be so late at the Everetts:
something has happened: what, oh, what can it be!
At length came three o'clock, and with it came the
footstep it was always joy to hear. But it was not
like his, it was so heavy, so uncertain. She paused a
moment in dreadful doubt, and then sprang to meet
him. He staggered past her, and flung himself into
a chair. She followed him, and clasping his arm
wildly, almost shrieked, Tell me, William Russell,
tell me, husband, what is the matter? Leave me,
woman, he cried, in a voice of thunder, with a brow
black as the midnight sky; isn't there enough the
matter, without being tormented with your foolish
questions? and flinging off his coat, he gained the
bed, and throwing himself down, was soon in a
stupified
slumber, unconscious that the tears of his wife
were pouring on his face like rain. Well was it for
Julia Russell that she had obeyed the wise man's
injunction
,
to Remember her Creator in the days of
her youth, else where could her crushed and broken
heart, cast off by its dearest earthly refuge, have
made its appeal? Well was it for her, in this hour
of abandonment by him she had so loved and trusted,
that she could still stay herself on the everlasting
arm. In prayers and tears poor Julia passed that
night, and when the morning dawned, and her
wretched husband returned to consciousness, the
swollen eye and the pale cheek awoke his tenderness
and his remorse. In deep humility he acknowledged
all his fatal indulgences, and promisedah! the
spider's
thread on which that promise hungto give up
all, if his injured wife would restore him her
confidence
and love. And she! did she turn scornfully
away, with the assurance that she could not link
herself
to degradation? Ah, no! for the degraded was
precious, even as her own soul. In broken tones, she
prayed him to remember his weakness, that he might
gather strength to resist the enticing cup; begged
him to settle his affairs, that they might no longer
urge him to temptation: that if a crust alone was left,
she would eat it cheerfully with him, and toil with all
her powers for their support, so that he would be again
her blessed William Russell.
Years have passed since then, and Mr. Russell, so
influenced, so guarded, never became a confirmed
inebriate
;
yet a moral strength is wanting to break for
ever the fatal snare; and could you see Julia
Cunningham
now, my fair young readerher finely
rounded form so thin and wasted; her brilliant eyes
shaded with unceasing anxiety; her step tremulous
with sad foreboding when absence is too lengthened,
you would shrink with dread when you behold the
beloved of your heart lift to his lips
a single glass
of wine
.
The foregoing tale illustrates the immense
importance
of guarding against the small beginnings of
intemperance
.
From indulgence in a single glass of
wine, many weak-minded persons have been led on,
step by step, to their ruin. We knew one gentleman
of large fortune, who thus acquired so strong a taste
for Champaigne wine, that he actually indulged in
solitary drinking of this noxious beverage until it
killed him.
JOHN HINCHLEY.
By Mrs. C. M. Kirkland
.
The
artist has designed, under this head, a scene
which actually passed in our own neighbourhood, at
the West. As this is a mere coincidenceno word
having been said of our floating recollections of the
occasionwe are disposed to make the picture the
ground of a little homily we would like to deliver;
premising, however, that we are far from believing
such steps more characteristic of the West than of
the East. Like circumstances will assuredly
produce
similar results every where.
We see in the engraving four men amusing
themselves
in a barn; two at cards, (high-low-jack, we may
suppose,) another watching the game, and the fourth
raising to his lips a keg or canteen, which we may
take leave to fear does not contain any thing so
innocent
as Croton water. Through the open half door
we observe a church; and, upon the winding
pathway
which leads to the sacred edifice, a
funeral
procession
.
This scene was imagined and conceived by the
artist solely on the strength of his own knowledge
22 P
and observation of human life in general, and as the
first of a series expressive of the downward course
of him who begins by neglecting duty for amusement
and indulgence; yet it is, as we said before, an
actual
transcript of reality; and we must give our
recollections
of this one scene in advance of the recitals
which are to be illustrated by the series of pictures.
There was a youth in a certain Western district,
the son of very strict parents, who had brought him up
in what they certainly intended should be, the
nurture
and admonition of the Lord. They sent him
to school every winter, and charged the master not to
spare the rod if it was needed to make him a good
boy; they made him attend Sabbath-school with
unerring
punctuality, remember every sermon's text,
and commit to memory a certain portion of Scripture
every Sunday. While he was quite young, they
allowed
him to play, somewhat like other boys; but
when he began to call himself a young man, he found
his wish for amusement continually thwarted by his
father, whose notions grew more and more rigid with
the advance of years, and who was, moreover, under
influences which led him to the opinion that all gaiety
is sinful.
Now, we must pause ere we proceed, to enter a
caveat
against the imputation that we are inimical to
a
serious
life. It is our heartfelt opinion that
there is
no other happy life;
that no one has yet tasted
happiness
who doubts this, or has not tried it. What we
would hint is, that this life is an
inward
life, and that
to force the outward appearance of it while the heart
is unconvinced, is the way to make hypocrites and
haters of all good things. It is a contradiction to the
whole philosophy of human nature, to suppose that
virtue will be the result of force. Even the Almighty
Ruler has left the choice to our free will, giving us
at the same time the knowledge of good and evil. It
is the sacred duty of parents to guard their children
from habits which contravene the laws of God; but
when they set up severe and arbitrary rules of their
own in addition, they run the risk of such
consequences
as I am about to describe.
John Hinchley was a well-disposed boy, of
considerable
quickness of intellect; ruddy, bright-eyed,
handsome, and well-developed. He was a favourite
in the neighbourhood, and always invited to the
husking, the quilting, the raising, in short, all rustic
merry-makings. Contrary to custom, his father often
restrained him from accepting these invitations,
insisting
upon his accomplishing some piece of work
which was unfinished, and lecturing him severely
upon the feelings which he sometimes exhibited when
thus thwarted. Now John was a dutiful son, thus
far, and particularly fond of his mother, who, though
very strict, was milder than her husband, and would
sometimes intercede, on occasions when the old man's
objurgations bore too hard upon the son. John was
sometimes tempted to deceive both father and mother;
but to his credit be it spoken, his conscience punished
him so severely for this, that he found such
indulgences
cost more than they came to; and his thoughts
turned rather to the best and earliest means of getting
rid of parental restraint altogether.
When he was about nineteen, a blacksmith, who
lived at some distance, made him an offer of business,
which his father thought too advantageous to be
rejected
,
and John was sent to a new field of labour, with
many earnest charges as to his walk and
conversation
.
But there was a sad discrepancy between the
father's exhortations and denunciations, and the
circumstances
of the case; and John knew this. He
knew that his father was perfectly well aware that
the neighbourhood to which he was going was a
notedly vicious one, and that love of gain was the
sole inducement in sending him. This inconsistency,
alas! how common a one with the loudest talkers
about morals! completely neutralized the effect of the
solemn words with which old Hinchley dismissed his
son; and, although the mother's tears were more
effectual, she was weak in judgment, and so had not
commanded the respect of her children as much as
she had won their love.
The blacksmith with whom John was to live, was
a man of smooth outside, so smooth, indeed, that the
young man, whose brain had been almost turned by
the prospect of the boundless liberty for which he
had been sighing, feared at first that he had fallen
into hands no less rigid than his father's, spite of the
reputation of the place, which was called Hell-gate
by the whole neighbourhood. But it was not long
before
,
happening to go into the shop at a very early
hour, he found his employer and another man, with
haggard, anxious faces, and eyes bloodshot and fierce
with passion, liquor, and want of sleep, playing cards
on a block in one corner, while old Hills, and one
or two others who had been looking on, were lying
drunk in various positions on the earthen floor.
Disguise
was out of the question; the blacksmith was
not so much intoxicated as not to perceive that excuses
would be worse than useless; so he braved it out, and
invited John to join in the fun. John did not join
then
.
From this time the seduction of the unfortunate
young man became a settled object with the
blacksmith
and his companions; and to make his chance
the worse, it so happened that old Hillsthe most
abandoned drunkard in the whole placehad a pretty
daughter, whose sad and downcast eye interested John
Hinchley far more than the gayer glances of her
companions
.
He became a familiar visiter at her father's,
and soon found pity change to love as he witnessed
the sufferings of the young woman, who was really
exemplary, as if incited by the vices of those around
to practise the industry, self-denial, and reserve which
were so miserably deficient at Hell-gate.
It was not long before John and Mary were
promised
,
as they say in the country; and dire was the
wrath of John's father at the news. He recalled his
son, but it was too late. Home rule was over; new
associations had been formed; love exerted its all
powerful sway; and in spite of the tears of the
wretched mother, John Hinchley quarrelled with his
father, and left the house under his curse, to return
to Mary and liberty. Before he was of age he had
married Mary Hills, and become a partner of the
dissolute
blacksmith, who held out the only chance of
living at all, though at the expense of all that makes
life worth having.
The young couple were really attached, and had
good qualities enough to have made their affection
serve for a whole life's quiet happiness, if the bosom
talisman of fixed principle had not been wanting.
But children camemeans were scantyhome was
uncomfortableMary became cross under penury
and ill-health, while John's wicked companions
seemed
jolly, and declared that they took the world very
easy. The blacksmith was one of those sots who do
their work well, and who manage, by the aid of an
iron constitution, to keep up business and vice
together
,
for a time, deceiving both themselves and
others as to the final result. John imitated his
partner
,
but with inferior success. His health became
disordered
;
his hand was unsteady; his work did not
please; high words often arose between him and the
more robust sinner. Friendship, cemented only by
evil propensities, is fleeting as dew; and discord
added her fell torch to the remains of poor John's
happiness.
Behold him now the fit companion of his
father-in-law
him!
who had chosen Mary from all the world,
because he pitied the wretchedness and loved the
virtues
of the drunkard's daughter! From one degree
of neglect to anotherfrom unkind words to absolute
desertionfrom finding the children a plague, to the
loss of even instinctive affection for themhe fell
lower and lower; until, while his eldest child was in
the death-agony, he could not be persuaded to quit his
game of cards. She diedhe played on. In vain
did the neighbours persuade and shame him; he
turned the adder's deafness to their words. When
night came he drank deeper than usual, and slept,
the deep, swinish sleep of inebriation, on the floor of
the shop. The next day the funeral of his child
passed
on its way to the burial-ground. There were John
and his companions still at cards; there was old Hills
at his potations; and while every body was crying
shame upon them, they only clung the closer to the
indulgences to which alone their now degraded
natures
looked for happiness.
Happiness! oh profane estimate! fatuity
inconceivable
!
Guilt's blunder, and the loudest laugh of hell!
Wretchedness dogged the steps of John Hinchley
and his once lovely Mary; poverty came upon them,
and want like an armed man. They have long
ago ceased to take their place with others at meeting,
or at the social gathering. Their children cannot go
to school, for want of decent clothing; their dwelling
is falling down for very misery. Man can do
nothing
for them, since they have the art of turning
even benevolence to poison. May God have mercy
upon them, and upon all such!
If we should be asked, in reference to our
description
of John's early training, how we would have had
it changed; whether we think it better that the stern
father should have allowed his son to join in
amusements
that he disapproved, we replythat while we
believe it the bounden duty of parents to restrain
their children from participation in whatever
recreations
may seem to them likely to prove injurious, we
are sure it is equally incumbent on them
to provide
for them those which are innocent
. And again, while
parents are inexcusable if they allow disobedience in
their children, they sin deeply if they require this
obedience in any other than the spirit of love.
Sternness
,
want of sympathy, and too great rigor of habits
at home, drive many a youth to vice, who might have
been preserved by watchful love, the care which
springs from devoted affection, and the cheerfulness
which every young heart craves. Good humour,
vivacity, sympathy, benevolence, are not the fruits of
an ascetic life; and more especially is
compulsory
asceticism
unfavourable to the cultivation of those
amenities
on which so much of the comfort, happiness, and
safety
of life depends.
The inconsistency which we notice in the conduct
of John Hinchley's father, is a fruitful source of evil
in education. The parent who is strict to excess as
to many little outward conformities with the world,
will yet show himself to be the slave of mammon, or
the victim of evil tempers, or the petty tyrantbehind
the scenes. How much of the misconduct and
unhappiness
of young people is the direct fruit of a
deficiency of virtue, or sincere effort at virtue in
their parents, is an awful thought for many of us.
Let us never imagine that any outward strictness can
atone for the want of that deep-seated, and operative
goodness, which alone has the promise of Heaven's
blessing upon its efforts, its sacrifices, and its hopes.
We should always be ready to strengthen the in
fluence of precept by the force of example. The
parent, while pointing the way to Heaven, should
always evince a readiness to walk in the narrow path
that leads to eternal life.
23
THE LAST INTERVIEW.
By D. Strock, Jr.
One
afternoon, early in the autumn of 1845, a little
boy knocked at the door of an humble dwelling, in
one of the districts of Philadelphia. Is Mrs. Arnold
in? he inquired of the individual who answered his
summons.
She is in her room, was the reply; and the boy
was shown into it. A tall, sickly-looking woman
arose to meet him. He presented her with a piece of
paper, awkwardly folded, and soiled with finger-marks
and oil. She ran her eye hastily over it, and then,
pausing for a moment, told the boy that she could not
come. As he retired, she sat down by a table, and,
resting her head on her hand, appeared to relapse
into a train of sad thoughts which the boy's entrance
had interrupted.
Ten minutes had scarcely elapsed, before another
and heavier rap announced a second messenger. A
man entered, and inquired for Mrs. Arnold.
I am Mrs. Arnold, answered the woman.
Madam, said the man, let me entreat you, for
God's sake, to visit the individual who is called your
husband. He has not two hours to live, and during
his sane moments, he calls loudly on your name, and
inquires when you will come. I fear his death will
be an awful one if he does not see you.
I cannot come, the woman replied in a husky
voice.
Let me entreat you, the stranger persisted. I
know not what may be between your husband and
yourself, but do not refuse this request which I am
convinced will be his last. When the fit is on him,
he talks only of you, and of the hours of happiness
you once passed together. Do not refuse him this
small comfort in death's agonies.
Mrs. Arnold paused. There was, in her features,
the hardened expression which years of grief
sometimes
imparts even to the countenance of woman.
Yet beneath this might be seen an occasional gleam
of finer feeling, telling that the soul had not lost all
its sensitiveness for the woes of others. The
stranger
noticed the mental conflict, and renewed his
exhortation
.
Did he call me by name? asked Mrs. Arnold.
He did, replied the man. He denounced his
former life as the cause of all your misery, and spoke
of former times spent with you, in a manner that drew
a sigh from every heart. Shall I tell him you are
coming?
Yes, said Mrs. Arnold. I had thought never
again to see him; but I will go this once.
The man bowed, and departed; and, as the door
was heard closing upon him, a feeling, to which the
banished wife had long been a stranger, came upon
her. A chord strung in other days, but long since
neglected, had suddenly awoke to its former melody.
She seemed to move in the pastto hear the tones
of love, and see the smiles which were around her
when her children first learned to lisp her name, and
her husband was not a drunkard. Now she was
hastening to the last interview with the only one of
her kindred that still remained to her. The feeling
of estrangement, which, as she once supposed, had
stifled every other feeling, gave way in a moment
to an intense desire to see her husband.
Seizing the note, she hastily glanced at the
direction
,
and hurried into the street. After winding
her way along several narrow streets, the abodes of
wretchedness and crime, she stopped before a small
house, and, descending three steps, opened a door
which led into a gloomy and naked basement room.
It was destitute of furniture, unless we dignify by
that name a three legged stool, with the back broken
off, a rickety table, and some straw beds. Three or
four persons were moving about the room; and,
although the sun had not set, a candle was burning
on the window-ledge.
Death was busy in this dreary abode. Upon some
mattrasses in a corner, lay the once gay Albert
Arnold, writhing in the horrors of delirium tremens.
The first sounds heard by the wife on entering,
were the moans of her husband. During three years
she had lived estranged from him, neither hearing nor
seeing him. There was something fearful in the
accents with which the reconciliation had begun.
Pale with anxiety and terror, she paused at the door,
holding the latch in her hand. A man approached.
Are you Mrs. Arnold?
She replied in the affirmative.
You have come to speak with your husband?
She nodded assent.
It is too late. Look at him.
The woman turned in the direction indicated. A
poor maniac, tossing his hands, rolling from side to
side, and raving in a voice already rendered hoarse by
the touch of death. The candle shed sufficient light
upon his face, to render visible the eyes, bloodshot,
wide open, and staring; the muscles hardened to the
rigidity of iron, the distorted features, the teeth,
shining madman-like from between the severed lips.
Approaching, she kneeled beside him, but had no
Q
words suited to the intensity of feeling which such a
scene inspires.
Mr. Arnold, said the nurse, kneeling beside the
wife. He ceased raving, and turned his head with a
cold simple stare, in the direction of the sound. Your
wife is here, continued the woman, hoping that some
word connected with her name, might illumine his
mind with a ray of reason. But in his countenance
remained the same cold expression; while his hand
moved rapidly and ceaselessly, over his wretched bed.
Speak to him yourself, said the nurse.
Albert, whispered the wife, bending her head
towards
his, Have you forgotten your own Annie
Annie Campbell?
Suddenly he turned his head towards her, and
pressed together his parched lips, hard and rapidly.
Reason seemed struggling to regain her seat. But
the transient emotion departed, the eye and the lips
resumed their fixedness, and he stared again, the
terrible
stare of the maniac, more fearful from its silence
than his former ravings.
He cannot hear you, said the nurse.
Oh, it is dreadful, sobbed the poor wife as she
buried her face in her hands.
Albert, Albert, speak to me, she continued
leaning
over him. Do not die in this horrible manner.
He will never speak with you again, said the
nurse.
Ha! ha! ha! shouted the dying man, with a voice,
that made every one shudder. Ha! ha! ha! ha! I
remember her well, Annie Campbell, Annie Campbell,
my own dear Annie. Oh yes, oh yesI will sing
the song she used to sing to melisten, she is
singing
now. Oh enchanting, he continued clasping
his hands, with convulsive energy. But she is dead,
goneshe died a raving maniacI called her, and
she would not come to see mecruel Annieshe
died alone. All flesh is as grass. She died alone.
Speak to him again, said the nurse. The wife
whispered her name in his ear.
She died alone,alone! and his voice hung on
the word, as the departing soul to life. We sailed on
the river at nightso still and beautifulher song,
her song. There were bright eyes beaming on me
but I saw only Annie's. The moon too and the stars,
they were beaming. I see them, shining far down,
in the deep water. It is too muchtoo lovely. See
the green trees by the river's bank, and the glassy
waves, sparklingthe moonlight is chasing them
along. The sun is not there. He went down long
ago, among the dead people. Annie is gone too. She
would not come to me when I sent for her. I hear
her singing, but I'll never see her again. She died
alone.
The maniac rolled on his side, and clenching his
hands tightly, became again silent. One of the men
came near, and bathed his head with cold water.
There was a long pause, interrupted only by the
whispers of the attendants, the moans of the dying
man, or the sobs of his wife. A student of medicine,
who was in the room, stooped down and felt his pulse.
To Mrs. Arnold's eager inquiry he shook his head;
and when further pressed, he replied that he was
failing fast.
And must he die thus? said the wife.
The main disease has been broken, the student
replied, his case is now one of ordinary insanity.
Death is approaching; but a gleam of reason may
still illume his last moments.
Scarcely was this sentence uttered, when the
maniac
sprung suddenly to a sitting posture. His eyes
glared as though starting from their sockets.
I have been there, he said, in a tone whose
calmness
was terrible. It was horrible, horrible.
Where have you been? asked the student,
humouring
his madness.
To the regions of woe, continued the maniac,
while his frame shuddered with the remembrance of
the recent vision; and then, he poured forth words
wild and blasphemous, as if they had actually been
learned in the abodes of despair. Gradually, however,
he grew calmer, and at length sunk upon his bed
exhausted.
This painful scene was drawing to a close. For
more than an hour the wife had endured it; and now
some straggling rays of the setting sun, gleaming
through the window, fell upon her husband's face,
and showed the change which had been wrought
there, even in that short time. Amid all the
inexplicable
phases of that mysterious, mental wandering
which we call insanity, nothing is more wonderful
than the apparently trivial manner, in which its spell
is frequently broken, and reason restored. A word
a lookthe ticking of a clock, or the chirp of a
cricket, has restored those, over whom doctors knit
their brows and looked wise in vain. Was there that,
in the solitary sunbeam, which could harmonize the
deranged faculties of this poor maniac? It seemed
so; for as it played warmly on his cheek, he raised
his eyes suddenly towards it, and appeared to regain
some recollection, bright as itself. His fixed eyelids
relaxed and partially closed, his lips lost their
contraction
,
and his face its rigidity. Reason was
restored
.
He is sensible, said the student. Every one
started. The miserable wife once more gazed upon
her husband; and, for the first time, since many a
weary month had elapsed, their glances met. A
longing
gaze, and the quivering of his lip, told that she
was recognized, but there was no welcome of the
voice. Silence, which may not be broken this side
the grave, had sealed his lips. Bending over him,
she exclaimed, in a voice deepened by the solemnity
of the scene around
Albert! do you know me?
A faint smile illumined his countenance, and his
voice struggled for utterance. Even these poor marks
of recognition were precious in a last interview.
Will you speak to me? she continued, her
anxiety increasing as death came nearer. There was
no answeronly the smile hovering around the lips.
That, too, ceased at last, and even the tones of the
wife, begging her husband's farewell, were hushed.
The long pause that succeeded was broken by a deep
24 Q2
groan from the dying man. Stretching himself to his
full length, he rolled his eyes upward, and remained
motionless.
The student spoke first. He is dead, said he.
The nurse reached the candle from the
window-sill
.
Its light, falling upon his features, showed too
truly that death had indeed laid his hand there. She
touched his breast, but the fluttering of the heart had
ceased.
Poor man! said the nurse to Mrs. Arnold. He
had still some tender feelings left. He talked night
and day of you, whom he called his murdered Annie.
I wish the rumseller had but witnessed his death.
The wife, still kneeling beside him, held one of her
hands over his brow, while with the other she covered
her own. Oh! she exclaimed at intervals, while
tears came to her eyes, did I think, when we first
met, that our last interview would be like this!
The student stood talking with the other men
See, he said to one of them, the doings of Rum!
THE DRUNKARD'S DREAM.
From the Dublin University Magazine
.
About
the year 17, having been appointed to the
living of Ch, I rented a small house in the town
which bears the same name. One morning, in the
month of November, I was awakened before my usual
time by my servant, who bustled into my bed-room
for the purpose of announcing a sick call. As the
Catholic church holds her last rites to be totally
indispensable
to the safety of the departing sinner, no
conscientious
clergyman can afford a moment's
unnecessary
delay; and in little more than five minutes I
stood, ready cloaked and booted for the road, in the
small front parlour, in which the messenger, who was
to act as my guide, awaited my coming. I found a
poor little girl, crying piteously, near the door, and,
after some slight difficulty, I ascertained that her
father
was either dead, or just dying.
And what may be your father's name, my poor
child? said I. She held down her head as if ashamed.
I repeated the question, and the wretched little
creature
burst into a flood of tears still more bitter than
she had shed before. At length, almost provoked by
conduct which appeared to me so unreasonable, I
began
to lose patience, spite of the pity which I could
not help feeling towards her; and I said, rather
harshly, If you will not tell me the name of the
person
to whom you would lead me, your silence can
arise from no good motive, and I might be justified in
refusing to go with you at all.
Oh! don't say that, don't say that, cried she.
Oh, sir! it was that I was afeard of, when I would not
tell you: I was afeard when you heard his name you
would not come with me; but it is no use hidin' it
now: it's Pat Connell, the carpenter, your honour.
She looked in my face with the most earnest anxiety,
as if her very existence depended upon what she
should read there; but I relieved her at once. The
name, indeed, was most unpleasantly familiar to me;
but, however fruitless my visits and advice might
have been at another time, the present was too fearful
an occasion to suffer my doubts of their utility as my
reluctance to re-attempting what appeared a hopeless
task, to weigh even against the lightest chance, that a
consciousness of his imminent danger might produce
in him a more docile and tractable disposition.
Accordingly
,
I told the child to lead the way, and
followed
her in silence. She hurried rapidly through
the long narrow street which forms the great
throughfare
of the town. The darkness of the hour, rendered
still deeper by the close approach of the old-fashioned
houses, which lowered in tall obscurity on either side
of the way; the damp, dreary chill which renders the
advance of morning peculiarly cheerless, combined
with the object of my walkto visit the deathbed of a
presumptuous sinner, to endeavour, almost against my
own conviction, to infuse a hope into the heart of a
dying reprobate, a drunkard, but too probably
perishing
under the consequences of some mad fit of
intoxication
;
all these circumstances united, served to
enhance
the gloom and solemnity of my feelings, as I
silently followed my little guide, who, with quick
steps, traversed the uneven pavement of the main
street. After a walk of about five minutes, she turned
off into a narrow lane, of that obscure and comfortless
class which are to be found in almost all small
old-fashioned
townschill, without ventilation, reeking
with all manner of offensive effuvi, dingy, smoky,
sickly, and pent-up buildings, frequently not only in
a wretched, but in a dangerous condition.
Your father has changed his abode since I last
visited him, and, I am afraid, much for the worse,
said I.
Indeed he has, sir; but we must not complain,
replied she; we have to thank God that we have
lodging and food, though it's poor enough, it is, your
honour.
Poor child! thought I; how many an older
head might learn wisdom from thee! how many a
luxurious philosopher, who is skilled to preach but
not to suffer, might not thy patient words put to the
blush!
The manner and language of this child were alike
above her years and station; and, indeed, in all cases
in which the cares and sorrows of life have
anticipated
their usual date, and have fallen, as they
sometimes
do, with melancholy prematurity to the lot of
childhood, I have observed the result to prove
uniformly
the same. A young mind, to which joy and
indulgence have been strangers, and to which
suffering
and self-denial have been familiarized from the
first, acquires a solidity and an elevation which no
other discipline could have bestowed, and which, in
the present case, communicated a striking but
mournful
peculiarity to the mannerseven to the voice of
the child. We paused before a narrow, crazy door,
which she opened by means of a latch, and we
forthwith
began to ascend the steep and broken stairs,
which led upwards to the sick man's room. As we
mounted flight after flight towards the garret floor, I
heard, more and more distinctly, the hurried talking
of many voices. I could also distinguish the low
sobbing
of a female. On arriving upon the uppermost
lobby, these sounds became fully audible.
This way, your honour, said my little
conductress
,
at the same time pushing open a door of patched
and half-rotten plank, she admitted me into the squalid
chamber of death and misery. But one candle, held
in the fingers of a seared and haggard-looking child,
was burning in the room, and that so dim that all was
twilight or darkness except within its immediate
influence
.
The general obscurity, however, served to
throw into prominent and startling relief the
deathbed
and its occupant. The light was nearly
approximated
to, and fell with horrible clearness upon, the
blue and swollen features of the drunkard. I did not
think it possible that a human countenance could look
so terrific. The lips were black, and drawn apart;
the teeth were firmly set; the eyes a little unclosed,
and nothing but the whites appearing; every feature
was fixed and livid, and the whole face wore a ghastly
and rigid expression of despairing terror, such as I
never saw equalled. His hands were crossed upon his
breast, and firmly clenched; while, as if to add to the
corpse-like effect of the whole, some white cloths,
dipped
in water, were wound about the forehead and
temples. As soon as I could remove my eyes from
this horrible spectacle, I observed my friend Dr. D,
one of the most humane of a humane profession,
standing
by the bed-side. He had been attempting, but
unsuccessfully
,
to bleed the patient, and had now
applied
his finger to the pulse.
Is there any hope? I inquired in a whisper.
A shake of the head was the reply. There was a
pause while he continued to hold the wrist; but he
waited in vain for the throb of life; it was not there;
and when he let go the hand, it fell stiffly back into
its former position upon the other.
The man is dead, said the physician, as he turned
from the bed where the terrible figure lay.
Dead! thought I, scarcely venturing to look
upon the tremendous and revolting spectacle: dead!
without an hour for repentanceeven a moment for
reflection! Dead, without the rites which even the
best should have! Is there hope for him? The
glaring eyeball, the grinning mouth, the distorted
brow, that unutterable look in which a painter would
have sought to embody the fixed despair of the
nethermost
hellthese were my answer.
The poor wife sat at a little distance, crying as if
her heart would break: the younger children
clustered
round the bed, looking, with wondering
curiosity
,
upon the form of death, never seen before.
When the first tumult of uncontrollable sorrow had
passed away, availing myself of the solemnity and
impressiveness
of the scene, I desired the heart-stricken
family to accompany me in prayer; and all knelt down,
while I solemnly and fervently repeated some of those
prayers which appeared most applicable to the
occasion
.
I employed myself thus in a manner which, I
trusted, was not unprofitable, at least to the living, for
about ten minutes; and having accomplished my task,
I was the first to arise. I looked upon the poor,
sobbing
,
helpless creatures who knelt so humbly around
me, and my heart bled for them. With a natural
transition, I turned my eyes from them to the bed in
which the body lay; and, great God! what was the
revulsion, the horror which I experienced, on seeing
the corpse-like, terrific thing seated half upright
before
me. The white cloths which had been wound
round the head, had now partly slipped from their
position, and were hanging in grotesque festoons
about the face and shoulders, while the distorted eyes
leered from amid them
A sight to dream of, not to tell.
I stood actually riveted to the spot. The figure
nodded
its head, and lifted its arm, I thought, with a
menacing
gesture. A thousand confused and horrible
thoughts at once rushed upon my mind. I had often
read that the body of a presumptuous sinner, who,
during life, had been the willing creature of every
satanic impulse, after the human tenant had deserted
it, had been known to become the horrible sport of
demoniac possession. I was roused from the
stupefaction
of terror in which I stood, by the piercing scream
of the mother, who now, for the first time, perceived
the change which had taken place. She rushed
towards
the bed; but, stunned by the shock, and
overcome
by the conflict of violent emotions, before she
reached it she fell prostrate upon the floor. I am
perfectly
convinced, that had I not been startled from
the torpidity of horror, in which I was bound, by some
powerful and arousing stimulant, I should have gazed
upon this unearthly apparition until I had fairly lost
my senses. As it was, however, the spell was broken;
superstition gave way to reason: the man, whom all
believed to have been actually dead, was living. Dr.
D was instantly standing by the bedside, and,
upon examination, he found that a sudden and copious
flow of blood had taken place from the wound which
the lancet had left, and this, no doubt, had effected
his sudden, and almost preternatural restoration to an
existence from which all thought he had been for ever
removed. The man was still speechless, but he seemed
to understand the physician when he forbid his
repeating
the painful and fruitless attempts which he
made to articulate; and he at once resigned himself
quietly into his hands.
25 R
I left the patient with leeches upon his temples,
and bleeding freely, apparently with little of the
drowsiness
which accompanies apoplexy; indeed, Dr.
D told me that he had never before witnessed a
seizure which seemed to combine the symptoms of so
many kinds, and yet which belonged to none of the
recognized classes; it certainly was not apoplexy,
catalepsy, nor
delirium tremens
, and yet it seemed, in
some degree, to partake of the properties of all. It
was strange, but stranger things are coming.
During two or three days Dr. D would not
allow
his patient to converse in a manner which could
excite or exhaust him, with any one; he suffered him
merely, as briefly as possible, to express his
immediate
wants, and it was not until the fourth day after
my early visit, the particulars of which I have just
detailed, that it was thought expedient that I should
see him, and then only because it appeared that his
extreme importunity and impatience were likely to
retard
his recovery more than the mere exhaustion
attendant
upon a short conversation could possibly do;
perhaps, too, my friend entertained some hope that if,
by holy confession his patient's bosom were eased of
the perilous stuff, which, no doubt, oppressed it, his
recovery would be more assured and rapid. It was,
then, as I have said, upon the fourth day after my first
professional call, that I found myself once more in the
dreary chamber of want and sickness. The man was in
bed, and appeared low and restless. On my entering
the room he raised himself in the bed, and muttered
twice or thrice, Thank God! thank God! I signed
to those of his family who stood by, to leave the room,
and took a chair beside the bed. So soon as we were
alone he said, rather doggedly, There's no use now
in telling me of the sinfulness of bad ways; I know it
all; I know where they lead to; I have seen every thing
about it with my own eyesight, as plain as I see you.
He rolled himself in the bed, as if to hide his face in
the clothes, and then suddenly raising himself, he
exclaimed
,
with startling vehemence, Look, sir, there
is no use in mincing the matter; I'm blasted with the
fires of hell; I have been in hell; what do you think
of that?in hell! I'm lost for ever! I have not a
chance! I am damned alreadydamneddamned.
The end of this sentence he actually shouted; his
vehemence
was perfectly terrific; he threw himself back,
and laughed and sobbed hysterically. I poured some
water into a tea-cup, and gave it to him. After he had
swallowed it, I told him if he had any thing to
communicate
,
to do so as briefly as he could, and in a
manner
as little agitating to himself as possible;
threatening
at the same time, though I had no intention to do
so, to leave him at once, in case he again gave way to
such passionate excitement.
It's only foolishness, he continued for me to try
to thank you for coming to such a villain as myself at
all; it's no use for me to wish good to you; for such
as I have no blessings to give.
I told him that I had but done my duty, and urged
him to proceed to the matter which weighed upon his
mind: he then spoke nearly as follows:
I came in drunk on Friday night last, and got to my
bed here, I don't remember how; some time in the
night, it seemed to me, I wakened, and feeling unaisy
in myself, I got up out of the bed. I wanted the fresh
air, but I would not make a noise to open the window,
for fear I'd waken the crathurs. It was very dark, and
throublesome to find the door; but at last I did get it,
and I groped my way out, and went down as aisy as I
could. I felt quite sober, and I counted the steps one
after another, as I was going down, that I might not
stumble at the bottom. When I came to the first
landing-place
God
be about us always! the floor of it sunk
under me, and I went down, down, down, till the
senses almost left me. I do not know how long I was
falling, but it seemed to me a great while. When I
came rightly to myself at last, I was sitting at a great
table near the top of it; and I could not see the end
of it, if it had any, it was so far off; and there were
men beyond reckoning sitting down, all along by it,
at each side, as far as I could see at all. I did not know
at first what it was in the open air; but there was a
close smothering feel in it, that was not natural, and
there was a kind of light that my eyesight never saw
before, red and unsteady, and I did not see for a long
time where it was coming from, until I looked straight
up, and then I saw that it came from great balls of
blood-coloured fire, that were rolling high over head,
with a sort of rushing, trembling sound, and I
perceived
that they shone on the ribs of a great roof of
rock that was arched overhead, instead of the sky.
When I seen this, scarce knowing what I did, I got
up, and I said, `I have no right to be here; I must
go;' and the man that was sitting at my left hand only
smiled, and said, `sit down again; you can
never
leave
this place;' and his voice was weaker than any child's
voice I ever heard, and when he was done speaking
he smiled again. Then I spoke out very loud and
bold, and I said, `In the name of God let me out of
this bad place.' And there was a great man, that I did
not see before, sitting at the end of the table that I was
near, and he was taller than twelve men, and his face
was very proud and terrible to look at, and he stood
up and stretched out his hand before him; and when
he stood up all that were there, great and small, bowed
down with a sighing sound, and a dread came on my
heart, and he looked at me, and I could not speak. I
felt I was his own to do what he liked with, for I
knew at once who he was; and he said, `if you
promise
to return you may depart for a season;' and the
voice he spoke with was terrible and mournful, and
the echoes of it went rolling and swelling down the
endless cave, and mixing with the trembling of the fire
over head; so that when he sat down, there was a sound
after him, all through the place, like the roaring of a
furnace, and I said, with all the strength I had, `I
promise
to come back; in God's name let me go;' and
with that I lost the sight and the hearing of all that
was there; and when my senses came to me again, I
was sitting in the bed with the blood all over me, and
you and the rest praying around the room. Here he
paused and wiped away the chill drops of horror which
hung upon his forehead.
I remained silent for some moments. The vision
R2
which he had just described struck my imagination
not a little; for this was long before Vathek and the
Hall of Ebles had delighted the world; and the
description
which he gave had, as I received it, all the
attractions of novelty, beside the impressiveness which
always belongs to the narration of an
eye-witness
,
whether
in the body or in the spirit, of the scenes which
he describes. There was something, too, in the stern
horror with which the man related these things, and in
the incongruity of his description with the vulgarly
received notions of the great place of punishment, and
of its presiding spirit, which struck my mind with
awe, almost with fear.At length he said, with an
expression
of horrible, imploring earnestness, which I
shall never forget, Well, sir, is there any hope; is
there any chance at all? or, is my soul pledged and
promised away for ever? is it gone out of my power?
must I go back to the place?
In answering him I had no easy task to perform; for
however clear might be my internal conviction of the
groundlessness of his fears, and however strong my
skepticism respecting the reality of what he had
described
,
I nevertheless felt that his impression to the
contrary, and his humility and terror resulting from
it, might be made available as no mean engines in the
work of his conversion from profligacy, and of his
restoration
to decent habits, and to religious feeling. I
therefore told him that he was to regard his dream
rather in the light of a warning than in that of a
prophecy
;
that our salvation depended not upon the word
or deed of a moment, but upon the habits of a life; that,
in fine, if he at once discarded his idle companions and
evil habits, and firmly adhered to a sober, industrious,
and religious course of life, the powers of darkness
might claim his soul in vain; for that there were
higher and firmer pledges than human tongue could
utter, which promised salvation to him who should
repent and lead a new life.
I left him much comforted, and with a promise to
return upon the next day. I did so, and found him
much more cheerful, and without any remains of the
dogged sullenness which I suppose had arisen from
his despair. His promises of amendment were given
in that tone of deliberate earnestness which belongs
to deep and solemn determination; and it was with
no small delight that I observed, after repeated visits,
that his good resolutions, so far from failing, did but
gather strength by time; and when I saw that man
shake off the idle and debauched companions, whose
society had for years formed alike his amusement and
his ruin, and revive his long discarded habits of
industry
and sobriety, I said within myself, there is
something more in all this than the operation of an idle
dream.
One day, some time after his perfect restoration
to health, I was surprised on ascending the stairs for
the purpose of visiting this man, to find him busily
employed in nailing down some planks upon the
landing-place
through which, at the commencement of his
mysterious vision, it seemed to him that he had sunk.
I perceived at once that he was strengthening the floor
with a view to securing himself against such a
catastrophe
,
and could scarcely forbear a smile, as I bid
God bless his work.
He perceived my thoughts I suppose, for he
immediately
said
I can never pass over that floor without trembling.
I'd leave this house if I could; but I can't find another
lodging in the town so cheap, and I'll not take a better
till I've paid off all my debts, please God; but I could
not be aisy in my mind till I made it as safe as I could.
You'll hardly believe me, your honour, that while I'm
working, maybe a mile away, my heart is in a flutter
the whole way back, with the bare thoughts of the two
little steps I have to walk upon this bit of a floor. So
it's no wonder, sir, I'd thry to make it sound and firm
with any idle timber I have.
I applauded his resolution to pay off his debts, and
the steadiness with which he pursued his plans of
conscientious economy, and passed on.
Many months elapsed, and still there appeared no
alteration in his resolutions of amendment. He was a
good workman, and with his better habits he
recovered
his former extensive and profitable employment.
Every thing seemed to promise comfort and
respectability
.
I have little more to add, and that shall be told
quickly. I had one evening met Pat Connell, as he
returned from his work; and, as usual, after a mutual,
and, on his side, respectful salutation, I spoke a few
words of encouragement and approval. I left him
industrious
,
active, healthywhen next I saw him, not
three days after, he was a corpse The circumstances
which marked the event of his death, were somewhat
strangeI might say fearful. The unfortunate man
had accidentally met an early friend, just returned
after a long absence, and, in a moment of excitement,
forgetting every thing in the warmth of his joy, he
yielded to his urgent invitation to accompany him
into a public house, which lay close by the spot where
the encounter had taken place. Connell, however,
previously to entering the room, had announced his
determination to take nothing more than the strictest
temperance would warrant. But, oh! who can
describe
the inveterate tenacity with which a drunkard's
habits cling to him through life. He may repenthe
may reform; he may look with actual abhorrence
upon his past profligacy; but amid all this
reformation
and compunction, who can tell the moment in
which the base and ruinous propensity may not
recur
,
triumphing over resolution, remorse, shame, every
thing, and prostrating its victim once more in all that
is destructive and revolting in that fatal vice.
The wretched man left the place in a state of utter
intoxication. He was brought home nearly insensible,
and placed in his bed, where he lay in the deep, calm
lethargy of drunkenness. The younger part of the
family retired to rest much after their usual hour; but
the poor wife remained up, sitting by the fire, too
much grieved and shocked at the recurrence of what
she had so little expected, to settle to rest; fatigue,
however, at length overcame her, and she sunk
gradually
into an uneasy slumber. She could not tell how
long she had remained in this state, when she awoke,
and immediately on opening her eyes, she perceived
by the faint red light of the smouldering turf-embers,
two persons, one of whom she recognized as her
husband
,
noiselessly gliding out of the room.
Pat, darling, where are you going? said she,
There was no answerthe door closed after them;
but in a moment she was startled and terrified by a
loud and heavy crash, as if some ponderous body had
been hurled down the stairs. Much alarmed, she
started up, and going to the head of the staircase, she
called repeatedly upon her husband, but in vain. She
returned to the room, and with the assistance of her
daughter, whom I had occasion to mention before, she
succeeded in finding and lighting a candle, with which
she hurried again to the head of the staircase. At the
bottom lay what seemed to be a bundle of clothes,
heaped together, motionless, lifelessit was her
husband
.
In going down the stairs, for what purpose
can never now be known, he had fallen, helplessly and
violently, to the bottom, and coming head foremost,
the spine at the neck had been dislocated by the shock,
and instant death must have ensued. The body lay
upon that landing-place to which his dream had
referred
.
It is scarcely worth endeavouring to clear up a
single point in a narrative where all is mystery; yet
I could not help suspecting that the second figure
which had been seen in the room by Connell's wife
on the night of his death, might have been no other
than his own shadow. I suggested this solution of the
difficulty; but she told me that the unknown person
had been considerably in advance of the other, and on
reaching the door, had turned back, as if to
communicate
something to his companionit was then a
mystery
.
Was the dream verified?whither had the
disembodied
spirit sped?who can say? We know not.
But I left the house of death that day in a state of
horror which I could not describe. It seemed to me
that I was scarce awake. I heard and saw every
thing as if under the spell of a nightmare. The
coincidence
was terrible.
THE RAFTMAN'S OATH.
By D. Strock, Jr.
Well
, I'll never drink another drop of liquor
while on the water.
These words, uttered by a youth of not more than
twenty-three, yet apparently dissolute and
weather-beaten
,
seemed to accord ill with the place and the
circumstances under which they were uttered. He
was in a tavern, surrounded by companions hardened
as himself, and within hearing of the ringing of
glasses, which the landlord was circulating merrily.
Any one who has been in a tavern among the hills
of Vermont, must have been struck with the fact that
such an establishment occupies a far more important
position among the inhabitants of the Green state, than
taverns do in our large cities. There, after their daily
toil, the workmen collect to discuss matters of
business
,
or general news. There, politicians meet to
calculate
chances; and a motley group of travellers,
farmers
,
sportsmen, western men, Bosting men,
of both sexes, all classes, and every shade of character
below mediocrity, gather there to sing, carouse, and
get drunk. At such times, too, like vigilant soldiers
in a hard campaign, they criticise the movements of
their great enemies, the temperance men, and con
over with doleful voice and features, the names of
those unfortunate victims who, up to the latest
accounts
from town, have been caught.
When all these circumstances are kept in view, it
will not appear strange that the man who, in a
Vermont
bar-room, could muster sufficient nerve to utter
the sentence with which our sketch opens, would
soon find himself in a most ridiculous situation. Men
stared at him; beings, who scarcely retained even the
form of women, leered at him through their half shut
eyes; the landlord stopped short in the act of filling
a glass, and, holding the decanter horizontally in his
hand, peeped through his spectacles towards the
quarter from whence the voice proceeded. In less
than five minutes one half of the company were
around the young man, jesting, mocking, and laughing.
I say, he repeated slowly, I'll never again
drink liquor while on the water.
Ha! ha! ha! shouted a miserable being near
him. Tom's turned a temperance man! ha! ha!
ha! Stick to it, Tom!
You ain't going to sign the paper, are you, Tom?
whined a loafer, who sat in the window-sill, with his
knees as high as his head, and his hands in his
pockets.
I don't believe a word of it, said a third. The
first wind would keel him over high and dry, unless
he carries ballast. He'll drown like a land rat in the
first storm. Else he'll be thrown in a galloping
decline
.
Won't he landlord?
No doubt of it.
There was some laughing.
You may laugh as much as you please, said the
young man; but I'll do as I have said. I have just
been told that Jack Hall was drowned last night
before
his raft was three miles from the place where he
started.
Jack Hall drowned! shrieked a young woman,
clothed in rags, and with fiery, bloated eyes. Oh!
poor Jack is not dead! On receiving repeated
assurance
,
she rushed with wild cries from the tavern,
followed by two or three others, men and women.
There, said the first speaker, is some more of
rum's doings. Poor Lucy! Once she was a nice
girlshe loved her cousin, too. When I think of it,
I almost resolve never to taste liquor again. I wish
I could keep such a resolution.
Some chance for a temperance lecture, I see, said
the landlord.
I am not going to lecture, Tom replied. But
I'll tell you what it is, landlord, some of us here have
not yet forgotten what Jack was before he fell into
your clutches. A finer young man never climbed the
Green mountains. I went to school with him, poor
fellow, and we struggled hard with each other for the
head of the class. But there was no quarrelling. He
saved my sister, too, once, when our boat struck a
snag in the Onion river. I begged him not to go last
night, for I saw he was drunk, and something seemed
to tell me, that he would not return safe. Perhaps you
can tell us, landlord, who sold him the liquor.
There was a bitterness in Tom's expression which
roused the minute quantity of shame which still
hovered
about the rumseller's character. It was
perceptible
in his countenance as he said
Well, I'm sorry Jack was drowned, for he was a
good customer. But every man is free in this
country
;
and if he would get drunk, who's to blame?
Pretty times we'd have if we wouldn't sell liquor
except
to the temperance folks.
If every man is free, I'll be free too, replied Tom;
and remember, landlord, you finger no more coin of
mine. For I perceive now, that if any of us would
27 S2
meet with sudden death, you would care no more for
it than you do for poor Jack's death.
That's a fact, said a woman, who sat on a crazy
box, with her back against the wall. When Washy
died, poor soul, with the rheumatiz, who should come
next day for his bill, but Mr. Landlord. It made my
heart ache, though I said nothing. Washy was a
good husband, but he would drink. I wish I could
swear off.
Hold your tongue, old woman, said the landlord,
angrily. You are never done crying about that
drunken loafer.
I suppose it's a free country, landlord, said Tom,
in a tone of bitter irony.
Yes, it is a free country; and now I'll speak,
said a man who had hitherto been silent. He rose to
his full height, and strode towards Tom. Young
man, he said, in a tone of deep earnestness, stick
to your resolution.
I will stick to it, replied Tom.
Pledge me your hand.
Tom gave his hand.
Swear that you will stick to it.
I do swear.
That you will never break it.
I never will, said Tom, in a husky voice.
The landlord muttered something about fools.
Landlord, said the man, turning suddenly, I
have a few words for your ear.
I don't want to hear them, growled the landlord.
But you shall hear them, replied the other.
`For ten years I have been a drunkard, a low,
debased
,
degraded drunkard. Once I was a scholar
and a gentleman and could count my wealth by
thousands
.
Look at me to-day! all my fortune is before
you. Many times I have attempted to reform, and
each time failed, because I could not stay from such
places as you keep. To-day I struggled to abstain
from drink, even in the face of temptation, and I
succeeded
.
It is owing to this young man, and to your
unfeeling conduct. I could reveal a tale about one
who loved me, that would fill every one here with
horror; but I will not. But when you think of Jack
Hall, remember, that by sneering at his death, you
lost at least two customers to your traffic of iniquity.
Tom and his new friend left the tavern together.
Two days after this scene, Tom, with his
companion
,
and three other men, was descending the
Connecticut
on a raft. True to his resolution, he had
drunk nothing but water before starting. This
circumstance
without a precedent in Tom's previous
career, excited no little astonishment and speculation
among his fellow raftmen. Some thought he had
sworn off; others, that he had been caught by
the temperance men. There was much whispering
about colds, consumption, fool-hardiness, and the
virtues
of alcohol. The head raftman intimated, with a
sneer, that when they reached the rapids, Tom would
have to be tied, to prevent his falling overboard. To
all this the young man answered nothing; but, plying
his task industriously, he beguiled the hours by
conversation
with his friend, whose name was Wilson.
Gradually night drew on. The air was chill and
boisterous, and the heavy raft rocked like a cradle, as
the waves dashed against its sides, or broke under it.
All the men, except Tom and Wilson, buttoned great
coats tightly around them: they worked without coat
or jacket. As night advanced, and the moon sank in
the west, the joyous song and conversation, which had
hitherto relieved the dreary prospect, ceased, and each
man gave his whole attention to the management of
the raft. About ten o'clock the head raftman sat
downa circumstance which appeared to Tom most
ominous. In a few moments afterwards a loud
roaring
of water was heard.
Captain, said Tom, are we approaching the
rapids?
There was no answerTom repeated his question
with the same result. Much alarmed he leaped
forward
and laid his hand upon the raftman's shoulder.
A ferocious growl was the reply, and the drunken
man fell heavily upon the raft. A glance showed
Tom that the steersman was in the same situation.
The noise grew louder; and now, the young man
became conscious of their perilous condition. The
raft was driving headlong before the tide, the rapids
were close at hand, and two of the men already
useless.
For heaven's sake, Wilson, he exclaimed, lay
hold of the helm, and steer to shore.
Wilson jammed the helm completely round, so that
the heavy pile lay with its side against the tide. One
of the men was still able to row. Tom called to him
to work for his life; and dragging the captain to the
middle of the raft, he rowed with vigorous arm, to
reach the shore. But the helm, through bad
management
,
had been damaged; so that instead of
approaching
the land, the raft, drifted rapidly towards a pile
of rocks. Tom shuddered, as he saw, through the
darkness, the white foam boiling over the hidden reef.
The next moment the spray dashed over him
Turn from shore, he shouted.
Wilson jammed the helm with a force that made
the heavy logs start. It broke short in his hand.
There was not a moment to be lost. Seizing one end
of his pole, Tom planted the other against the rocky
ledge, and pushed with all his might from shore. His
two companions did the same; and by their united
efforts, the huge mass was swung round towards the
current. But as it passed rapidly down the stream,
a jutting rock struck the end on which Tom and the
captain were, and severed it from the main part. The
waves rushed through every part, tearing the logs
apart, and hurrying them down the tide. A wild
shriek arose from Wilson and his companions; but
with the promptitude, learned only amid dangers like
this, Tom sprang from the ruined mass, and lighted
upon the raft as it swept by. There was no time for
congratulation. Their frail bark sprung round and
round, and, meeting with a second reef, was shattered
and driven against the shore. Fortunately it here
became jammed between some rocks, and remained
immovable. Seizing the drunken steersman, the three
men clambered to the land, and took refuge under
some trees. Though cold, wet, and hungry, they
soon fell asleep overpowered by weariness.
The sun had risen before they awoke. In each
face, thankfulness for their escape was mingled with
sorrow. None inquired for the head steersman; for
he had been seen sweeping down the waves which
had broken the raft. They spent the day at a
neighbouring
village; and, in the afternoon, set out for their
homes. Tom and Wilson travelled together; and
their sad story revived in the minds of many the
words which the young man had spoken when he
heard about the death of Jack Hall. At Tom's house,
they renewed the oath which they had sworn before
setting out, and added to it anotherto abstain for
ever from all intoxicating drinks. It is needless to
remark that both of them have kept it to the present
time.
IT'S ONLY A DROP.
From Chambers Edinburgh Journal
It
was a cold winter's night, and though the
cottage
where Ellen and Michael, the two surviving
children of old Ben Murphy lived, was always neat
and comfortable, still there was a cloud over the brow
of both brother and sister, as they sat before the
cheerful
fire. It had obviously been spread not by anger,
but by sorrow. The silence had continued long,
though it was not bitter. At last, Michael drew away
from his sister's eyes, the checked apron she had
applied
to them, and taking her hand affectionately
within his own, said, It isn't for my own sake, Ellen,
though, the Lord knows, I shall be lonesome enough
the long winter nights, and the long summer days,
without your wise saying, and your sweet song, and
your merry laugh, that I can so well rememberay,
since the time when our poor mother used to seat us
on the new rick, and then, in the innocent pride of
her heart, call father to look at us, and preach to us
against being conceited, at the very time she was
making
us proud as peacocks by calling us her blossoms of
beauty, and her heart's blood, and her king and queen.
God and the Blessed Virgin make her bed in
heaven
,
now and for evermore, amen, said Ellen, at the
same time drawing out her beads, and repeating an
Ave with inconceivable rapidity. Ah, Mike, she
added, that
was
the mother, and the father too, full
of grace and godliness.
True for ye, Ellen, but
that's
not what I'm afther
now, as you well know, you blushing little rogue of
the world; and sorra a word I'll say against it in the
end, though it's lonesome I'll be on my own
hearthstone
,
with no one to keep me company but the ould
black cat, that can't see, let alone hear, the craythur!
Now, said Ellen, wiping her eyes, and smiling
her own bright smile, lave off; ye're just like all the
men, purtending to one thing when they mane
another
;
there's a dale of desate about themallevery
one of themand so my mother often said. Now,
you'd better have done, or maybe I'll say something
that will bring, if not the colour to your brown cheek,
a dale more warmth to yer warm heart, than would
be convanient, just by the mention of one Mary
Mary! what a purty name Mary it is, isn't it?its a
common name too, and yet you like it none the worse
for that. Do you mind the ould rhyme?
`Mary, Mary, quite contrary!'
Well, I'm not going to say she is contraryI'm sure
she's any thing but
that
to you, any way, brother
Mike. Can't you sit still, and don't be pulling the
hairs out of Pusheen cat's tail, it isn't many there's in
it; and I'd thank you not to unravel the beautiful
English cotton stocking I'm knitting; lave off your
tricks, or I'll make common talk of it, I will, and be
more than even with you, my fine fellow! Indeed,
poor ould Pusheen, she continued, addressing the
cat with great gravity, never heed what he says to
you; he has no notion to make
you
either head or tail
to the house, not he; he won't let you be without a
misthress to give ye your sup of milk, or yer bit of
sop; he won't let you be lonesome, my poor puss;
he's glad enough to swap an Ellen for a Mary, so he
is; but that's a sacret, avourneen; don't tell it to any
one.
Any thing for your happiness, replied the
brother
,
somewhat sulkily; but your bachelor has a
28 T
worse fault than ever I had, notwithstanding all the
lecturing you kept on to me; he has a turn for the
drop, Ellen, you know he has.
How spitefully you said that! replied Ellen;
and it isn't generous to spake of it when he's not
here to defend himself.
You'll not let a word go against him, said
Michael
.
No, she said, I will never let ill be spoken of
an absent friend. I know he has a turn for the drop,
but I'll cure him.
After he is married, observed Michael, not very
good naturedly.
No, she answered,
before
. I think a girl's chance
of happiness is not worth much who trusts to
after
marriage
reformation. I wont. Didn't I reform you, Mike,
of the shockin' habit you had, of putting every thing
off to the last? And after reforming a brother, who
knows what I may do with a lover? Do you think
that Larry's heart is harder than
yours
, Mike? Look
what fine vegetables we have in our garden now, all
planted by your own hand, when you come home
from workplanted during the very time which you
used to spend in leaning against the door cheek, or
smoking your pipe, or sleeping over the fire. Look
at the money you got from the agricultural society.
That's yours, Ellen, said the generous-hearted
Mike. I'll never touch a penny of it; but for you
I never should have had it. I'll never touch it.
You never shall, she answered. I've laid it
every penny out; so that when the young bride comes
home, she'll have such a house of comforts as are not
to be found in the parishwhite table-cloths for
Sunday
,
a little store of tay and sugar, soap, candles,
starch, every thing good, and plenty of it.
My own dear, generous sister! exclaimed the
young man.
I shall ever be your sister, she replied, and
hers too. She's a good
colleen
, and worthy my own
Mike; and that's more than I would say to ere
another
in the parish. I wasn't in earnest when I said
you'd be glad to get rid of me; so put the pouch,
every bit of it off yer handsome face. And hush!
whist! will ye? there's the sound of Larry's
footsteps
in the bawnhand me the needles, Mike.
She braided back her hair with both hands,
arranged
the red ribbon, that confined its luxuriance, in
the little glass that hung upon the dresser, and, after
composing her arch laughing features into an
expression
of great gravity, sat down, and applied herself
with singular industry to take up the stitches her
brother had dropped, and put on a look of right
maidenly astonishment when the door opened, and
Larry's good-humoured face entered, with the
salutation
of God save all here! He popped his head in
first, and after gazing around, presented his goodly
person to their view; and a pleasant view it was, for
he was of genuine Irish bearing and beautyfrank,
and manly, and fearless looking. Ellen, the wicked
one, looked up with well feigned astonishment, and
exclaimed, Oh, Larry, is it you? and who would
have thought of seeing you this blessed night? Ye're
luckyjust in time for a bit of a supper afther your
walk across the moor. I cannot think what in the
world makes you walk over that moor so often; you'll
get wet feet, and yer mother 'ill be forced to nurse
you. Of all the walks in the county, the walk across
that moor's the dreariest, and yet ye're always going
it! I wonder you haven't better sense; ye're not
such a chicken now.
Well, interrupted Mike, it's the women that
bates the world for desaving. Sure she heard yer
step when nobody else could; it's echo struck on
her heart, Larry,let her deny it. She'll make a
shove off if she can; she'll twist you, and twirl you,
and turn you about, so that you wont know whether
it's on your head or your heels ye're standing. She'll
tossicate yer brains in no time, and be as composed
herself as the dove on her nest in a storm. But ask
her, Larry, the straitforward question, whether she
heard you or not. She'll tell no lieshe never does.
Ellen shook her head at her brother, and laughed,
and immediately after the happy trio sat down to a
cheerful supper.
Larry was a good tradesman, blythe, and well to
do in the world; and had it not been for the one
great faultan inclination to take the least taste in
life more when he had already taken quite enough
there could not have been found a better match for
good, excellent Ellen Murphy, in the whole kingdom
of Ireland. When supper was finished, the
everlasting
whisky-bottle was produced, and Ellen resumed
her knitting. After a time, Larry pressed his suit to
Michael for the industrious hand of his sister,
thinking
,
doubtless, with the natural self-conceit of all
man
kind, that he was perfectly secure with Ellen; but
though Ellen loved, like all my fair countrywomen,
well
, she loved, I am sorry to say,
un
like the generality
of my fair countrywomen,
wisely
, and reminded her
lover that she had seen him intoxicated at the last fair
of Rathcoolin.
Dear Ellen, he exclaimed, it was `only a drop,'
the least taste in life that overcame me. It overtook
me unknowst, quite against my will.
Who poured it down yer throat, Larry?
Who poured it down my throat is it? why,
myself
,
to be sure; but are you going to put me to a
three months' penance for that?
Larry, will you listen to me, and remember that
the man I marry must be converted before we stand
before the priest. I have no faith whatever in
conversions
after.
Oh, Ellen! interrupted her lover
It's no use oh Ellening me, she answered
quickly; I have made my resolution, and I'll stick
to it.
She's as obstinate as ten women, said her brother.
There's no use in attempting to contradict her;
she always has had her own way.
It's very cruel of you, Ellen, not to listen to
reason
.
I tell you, a tablespoonful will often upset me.
If you know that, Larry, why do you take the
tablespoonful?
Larry could not reply to this question. He could
T2
only plead that the drop got the better of him, and the
temptation
, and the
overcomingness
of the thing, and
it was very hard to be at him so about a trifle.
I can never think a thing a trifle, she observed,
that makes you so unlike yourself; I should wish
to respect you always, Larry, and in my heart I
believe
no woman ever could respect a drunkard. I
don't want to make you angry; God forbid you should
ever be one, and I
know
you are not one yet; but sin
grows mighty strong upon us without our knowledge.
And no matter what indulgence leads to bad; we've
a right to think any thing that
does
lead to it sinful in
prospect, if not at the present.
You'd have made a fine priest, Ellen, said the
young man, determined, if he could not reason, to
laugh her out of her resolve.
I don't think, she replied, archly, if I was a
priest, that either of you would have liked to come to
me to confession.
But Ellen, dear Ellen, sure it's not in positive
downright
earnest
you are; you can't think of
putting
me off on account of that unlucky drop,
the least
taste in life
, I took at the fair. You could not find it
in your heart. Speak for me, Michael, speak for me.
But I see it's joking you are. Why, Lent will be on
us in no time, and then we must wait till Easterit's
easy talking.
Larry, interrupted Ellen, do not you talk your
self into a passion; it will do no good; none in the
world. I am sure you love me, and I confess before
my brother it will be the delight of my heart to return
that love, and make myself worthy of you, if you
will only break yourself of that one habit, which you
qualify to your own undoing by fancying, because the
least taste in life
makes you what you ought not to be,
that you still take it.
I'll take an oath against the whisky, if that will
plase ye, till Christmas.
And when Christmas comes, get twice as tipsy as
ever, with joy to think yer oath is outno?
I'll sware any thing you plase.
I don't want you to sware at all; there is no use
in a man's taking an oath he is anxious to have a
chance of breaking. I want your reason to be
convinced
.
My darling Ellen all the reason I ever had in my
life is convinced.
Prove it by abstaining from taking even a drop,
even
the least drop
in life, if that drop can make you
ashamed to look your poor Ellen in the face.
I'll give it up altogether.
I hope you will one of these days, from a
conviction
that it is really bad in every way; but not from
cowardice, not because you darn't trust yerself.
Ellen, I'm sure ye've some English blood in yer
veins, you're such a reasoner. Irish women don't
often throw a boy off because of a drop; if they did,
it's not many marriage dues his Reverence would
have, winter or summer.
Listen to me, Larry, and believe, that, though I
spake this way, I regard you truly; and if I did not,
I'd not take the throuble to tell you my mind.
Like Mick Brady's wife, who, whenever she
thrashed him, cried over the blows, and said they were
all for his good, observed her brother slyly.
Nonsense!listen to me, I say, and I'll tell you
why I am so resolute. It's many a long day since,
going to school, I used to meetMichael minds her,
too, I'm surean old bent woman; they used to call
her the Witch of Ballaghton. Stacy was, as I have
said, very old, entirely withered and white headed,
bent nearly double with age, and she used to be ever
and always muddling about the streams and ditches,
gathering herbs and plants, the girls said to work
charms with; and at first they used to watch, rather
far off, and if they had a good chance of escaping her
tongue and the stones she flung at them, they'd call
her an ill name or two, and sometimes, old as she was,
she'd make a spring at them sideways like a crab,
and howl, and hoot, and scream, and then they'd be
off like a flock of pigeons from a hawk, and she'd go
on disturbing the green coated waters with her crooked
stick, and muttering words which none, if they heard,
could understand. Stacy had been a well-rared
woman
,
and knew a dale more than any of us; when
not tormented by the children, she was mighty well
spoken, and the gentry thought a dale more about her
than she did about them; for she'd say there wasn't
one in the country fit to tie her shoe, and tell them
so, too, if they'd call her any thing but Lady Stacy,
which the
rale
gentry of the place all humoured her
in; but the upstarts, who think every civil word to
an inferior is a pulling down of their own dignity,
would turn up their noses as they passed her, and
maybe she didn't bless them for it.
One day Mike had gone home before me, and,
coming down the back bohreen, who should I see
moving along it but Lady Stacy; and on she came,
muttering and mumbling to herself, till she got near
me; and, as she did, I heard Master Nixon (the dog
man's
[1]
[1]
Tax-gatherers were so called some time in Ireland, because they
collected
the duty on dogs.
) hound in full cry, and seen him at her heels,
and he over the hedge encouraging the baste to tear
her in pieces. The dog soon was up with her, and
then she kept him off as well as she could with her
crutch, cursing the entire time; and I was very
frightened, but I darted to her side, and, with a wat
29
tle I pulled out of the hedge, did my best to keep him
off her.
Master Nixon cursed at me with all his heart;
but I wasn't to be turned off that way. Stacy,
herself
,
laid about with her staff; but the ugly brute
would have finished her, only for me. I don't
suppose
Nixon meant that; but the dog was savage, and
some men like him delight in cruelty. Well, I beat
the dog off; and then I had to help the poor fainting
woman, for she was both faint and hurt. I didn't
much like bringing her here, for the people said she
wasn't lucky; however, she wanted help, and I gave
it. When I got her on the floor,
[2]
[2]
In the house
I thought a drop
of whisky would revive her, and, accordingly, I offered
her a glass. I shall never forget the venom with which
she dashed it on the ground.
`Do you want to poison me,' she shouted, `afther
saving my life?' When she came to herself a little,
she made me sit down by her side, and fixing her
large gray eyes upon my face, she kept rocking her
body backwards and forwards while she spoke, as
well as I can remember, what I'll try to tell you; but
I can't tell it as she didthat wouldn't be in nature.
`Ellen,' she said, and her eyes fixed in my face, `I
wasn't always a poor lone creature, that every ruffian
who walks the country dare set his cur at. There
was full and plenty in my father's house when I was
young; but before I grew to womanly estate, its walls
were bare and roofless. What made them so?Drink!
whisky! My father was in debt: to kill thought, he
tried to keep himself so that he could not think: he
wanted the courage of a man to look his danger and
difficulty in the face, and overcome it; for, Ellen, mind
my words, the man that will look debt and danger
steadily
in the face, and resolve to overcome them,
can do so
.
He had not means, he said, to educate his children as
became
them. He grew not to have means to find them,
or their poor patient mother, the proper necessaries
of life; yet he found the means to keep the whisky
cask flowing, and to answer the bailiff's knocks for
admission by the loud roar of drunkenness, mad as it
was wicked. They got in at last, in spite of the care
taken to keep them out; and there was much fighting,
ay, and blood spilt, but not to death; and while the
riot was a-foot, and we were crying round the
deathbed
of a dying mother, where was he?They had
raised a ten-gallon cask of whisky on the table in the
parlour, and astride on it sat my father, flourishing the
huge pewter funnel in one hand, and the black jack
streaming with whisky in the other; and amid the
fumes of hot punch that flowed over the room, and the
cries and oaths of the fighting, drunken company, his
voice was heard, swearing `he had lived like a king,
and WOULD die like a king.'
And your poor mother? I asked.
Thank God, she died that night! she died before
worse came. She died on the bed that, before her
corpse was cold, was dragged from under her, through
the strong drinkthrough the badness of him who
ought to have saved her; not that he was a bad man,
either, when the whisky had no power over him, but
he could not bear his own reflections. And his end
soon came. He didn't die like a king; he died,
smothered in a ditch, where he fell; he died, and was
in the presence of Godhow? Oh! there are things
that have had whisky as their beginning, and their
end, that made me as mad as ever it made him! The
man takes a drop, and forgets his starving family; the
woman takes it, and forgets she is a mother and a
wife! It's the curse of Ireland! a bitterer, blacker,
deeper curse than ever was put on it by a foreign
power, or hard made laws!
God bless us! was Larry's half-breathed
ejaculation
.
I only repeat ould Stacy's words, said Ellen;
you see I never forgot them. `You may think,'
she continued, `that I had had warning enough to
keep me from having any thing to say to those who
were too fond of drink; and I thought I had; but,
somehow, Edward Lambert got round me with his
sweet words, and I was lone and unprotected. I
knew he had a little fondness for the drop, but
in him, young, handsome, and gay-hearted, with
bright eyes and sunny hair, it did not seem like the
horrid thing which
had made me shed no tear over my
father's grave
. Think of that, young girl: the drink
doesn't make a man a beast
at first
, but it will do so
before it's done with himit will do so before it's
done with him. I had enough power over Edward,
and enough memory of the past, to make him swear
against it, except so much at such and such a time,
and, for a while, he was very particular; but one
used to entice him, and another used to entice him,
and I am not going to say but I might have managed
him differently; I might have got him off itgently,
may be; but the pride got the better of me, and I
thought of the line I came of, and how I had married
him who wasn't my equal, and such nonsense, which
always breeds disturbance betwixt married people;
and I used to rave, when, may be, it would have
been wiser if I had reasoned. Any way, things didn't
go smoothnot that he neglected his employment;
he was industrious, and sorry enough when the fault
was done; still he would come home often the worse
for drinkand now that he's dead and gone, and no
finger is stretched to me but in scorn or hatred, I think
may be I might have done better; but, God defend
me, the
last
was hard to bear.' Oh, boys, said Ellen,
if you had only heard her voice when she said
that
,
and seen her facepoor ould Lady Stacy, no wonder
she hated the drop, no wonder she dashed down the
whisky.
You kept this mighty close, Ellen, said Mike;
I never heard it before.
I do not like coming over it, she replied; the
last is hard to tell. The girl turned pale while she
spoke, and Lawrence gave her a cup of water. It
must be told, she said; the death of her father
proved the effects of deliberate drunkenness. What
I have to say, shows what may happen from being
even once unable to think or act.
`I had one child,' said Stacy, `one, a darlint,
blue-eyed
,
U
laughing child. I never saw any so handsome,
never knew any so good. She was almost three years
ould, and he was fond of herhe said he was, but it's
a quare fondness that destroys what it ought to save.
It was the pattern of Lady-day, and well I knew that
Edward would not return as he went; he said he
would, he
almost
swore he would; but the promise
of a man given to drink has no more strength in it than
a rope of sand. I took sulky, and wouldn't go; if I
had, maybe it wouldn't have ended so. The evening
came on, and I thought my baby breathed in her
cradle
;
I took the candle and went over to look at her;
her little face was red; and when I laid my cheek
close to her lips so as not to touch them, but to feel her
breath, it was hotvery hot; she tossed her arms,
and they were dry and burning. The measles were
about the country, and I was frightened for my child.
It was only half a mile to the doctor's; I knew every
foot of the road; and so leaving the door on the latch,
I resolved to tell him how my darlint was, and thought
I should be back before my husband's return. Grass,
you may be sure, didn't grow under my feet. I ran
with all speed, and wasn't kept long, the doctor said
though it seemed long to me. The moon was down
when I came home, though the night was fine. The
cabin we lived in was in a hollow; but when I was
on the hill, and looked down where I knew it stood a
dark mass, I thought I saw a white light fog coming
out of it; I rubbed my eyes, and darted forward as a
wild bird flies to its nest when it hears the scream of
the hawk in the heavens. When I reached the door,
I saw it was open; the fume cloud came out of it,
sure enough, white and thick; blind with that and
terror together, I rushed to my child's cradle. I found
my way to
that
, in spite of the burning and the
smothering
.
But EllenEllen Murphy, my child, the
rosy child whose breath had been hot on my cheek
only a little while before, she was nothing but a
cinder
.
Mad as I felt, I saw how it was in a minute.
The father had come home, as I expected; he had
gone to the cradle to look at his child, had dropped the
candle into the straw, and, unable to speak or stand,
had fallen down and asleep on the floor, not two yards
from my child. Oh, how I flew to the doctor's with
what
had been my baby! I tore across the country
like a banshee; I laid it in his arms; I told him if he
didn't put life in it, I'd destroy him and his house.
He thought me mad, for there was no breath, either
cold or hot, coming from its lips
then
. I couldn't kiss
it in death;
there was nothing left of my child to kiss;
think of that! I snatched it from where the doctor
had laid it; I cursed him, for he looked with disgust
at my purty child. The whole night long I
wandered
in the woods of Newtownbarry, with that burden
at my heart.'
But her husband, her husband! inquired Larry
in accents of horror; what became of him?did
she leave him in the burning without calling him to
himself?
No, answered Ellen; I asked her, and she
told me that her shrieks she supposed roused him
from the suffocation in which he must but for them
have perished. He staggered out of the place, and
was found soon after by the neighbours, and lived
long after, but only to be a poor heart-broken man,
for she was mad for years through the country; and
many a day after she told me that story, my heart
trembled like a willow leaf. `And now, Ellen
Murphy
,'
she added, when the end was come, `do ye
wonder I threw from yer hand as poison the glass you
offered me? And do you know why I have tould
you what tears my heart to come over?because I
wish to save you, who showed me kindness, from
what I have gone through. It's the only good I can
do ye, and, indeed, it's long since I cared to do good.
Never trust a drinking man; he has no guard on his
words, and will say that of his nearest friend, that
would destroy him soul and body. His breath is hot
as the breath of the plague; his tongue is a foolish,
as well as a fiery serpent. Ellen, let no drunkard
become your lover, and don't trust to promises; try
them, prove them all, before you marry.'
Ellen, that's enough, interrupted Larry. I
have heard enoughthe two proofs are enough
without
words. Now, hear me. What length of
punishment
am I to have? I won't say that, for, Nell,
there's a tear in your eye that says more than words.
LookI'll make no promisesbut you shall see; I'll
wait yer time; name it; I'll stand the trial.
And I am happy to say, for the honour and credit
of the country, that Larry did stand the trialhis
resolve was fixed; he never so much as tasted
whisky
from that time, and Ellen had the proud
satisfaction
of knowing she had saved him from
destruction
.
They were not, however married till
after
Easter. I wish all Irish maidens would follow Ellen's
example. Woman could do a great deal to prove that
the least taste in life
is a great taste too much!
that ONLY A DROP is a temptation fatal if unresisted.
CHARLES CLIFFORD.
By D. Strock, Jr.
Travellers
tell us of a serpent which hides among
the sands of the Eastern desert, and bites the weary
limbs of him who approaches the fountain to slake
his thirst. Intoxication is such a serpent. It lurks
in the paths of usefulness and honour, and stings,
with its envenomed fang, the youth who, with heart
bounding with hope, is beginning to tread the arena
of life. Our story is a tale of one of these victims.
One cold evening in November, a young man,
named Charles Clifford, sat alone in a small room of
a house in Philadelphia. The furniture and tasteful
decorations showed that it was the abode of luxury;
while the masses of books piled upon the shelf, and
strewing a table near which he sat, told that the
young man could appreciate the higher sources of
pleasure, which too many of the wealthy neglect.
Clifford was, in every sense of the term, a student.
A college life had merely developed his love of
knowledge
;
and, since returning home, he had applied
himself to study with the ardour of one inspired by
true genius. Young, accomplished, and wealthy,
society had many claims upon him; but he neglected
them almost entirely, that he might pursue his
favourite
studies alone.
He was engaged in these during the evening of
which we have spoken. The subject seemed difficult
and important. Sometimes he carefully turned over
the leaves of a heavy folio, bound in thick leather,
with massy clasps; then he compared one or two
passages
in it with some in other volumes, or traced, with
a rapid hand, his thoughts upon paper; and at times
he arose, and, folding his arms, walked slowly over
the floor.
A loud knock at the door interrupted him. The
servant announced Mr. Greene.
Robert Greene had been a student at the college
with Clifford. His appearance and manners were of
the class which excite involuntary disgust, when
beheld
for the first time. The cadaverous countenance,
almost buried in hair, an eye, whose clouded and
sickly colour told that the system had been ruined by
abuse, and an assumption of affability in voice and
gestures, were too conspicuous to pass unnoticed, even
by the dullest observer. He was somewhat older than
Clifford, and they had been in the same class at
college
.
They had conversed together, studied together,
passed much time together; yet they had never been
real friends. There was no similarity in character
which might unite the affections of the two hearts
into one. During the year that had elapsed since
leaving college, they had met only occasionally, and
in the street. Their acquaintance was about to be
renewed. After his usual rude salutation, Greene
said
Still at your books, Charley? Study, study night
and day, as though college lasted for a lifetime,
without holiday. Are you writing a history of the
world, or learning to simplify the Chinese grammar?
Neither, answered the other. I study because
I find pleasure in studying.
Pleasure! Well, Charley, that beats all yet. You
used to say funny things at college, but nothing
equal to that. And do you enjoy such pleasure every
night?
I do not often go out, replied Clifford.
But you can go with me to-night, said his visiter.
A few of us college chaps are about to have a little
social fun to ourselvesthat is, in plain terms, a
supper
.
There will be fine eating, finer drinking, and
no scarcity of chatting and singing. We concluded
we could not do without you, so you must give up
the pleasures of study for one night. It will be rare
sport.
I shall ask to decline, answered Clifford.
We will hear of no declining. Do you not wish
to keep alive old acquaintances?
But I am very busy this evening. Besides, I
never go to evening suppers.
Not conscientious, I hope, said Greene, with a
chuckling laugh.
Clifford answered that he was not.
Then you must come. As to your objection of
rarely going out, I remember seeing a young man
about Clifford's size, walking very complacently from
church last Sunday eveningin company, too. The
cool, clear air seemed quite refreshing to him.
During the greater part of this conversation,
Clifford
had appeared listless as one in a revery. The
last sentence roused him. He looked at Greene with
a keen and half irritated gaze, as though he would
read the thoughts of which these half bantering
words were an index. Greene, discovering this,
changed his tone and continued
Come, Charley, we want you with us. You will
see more there than you are aware of. Many whom
you will be glad to take by the hand, are this moment
waiting to greet you. It will be mortifying, indeed,
if you are so ungenerous as to refuse, after receiving
a formal invitation.
Clifford was overcome by these words, urged in
a persuasive tone. Notwithstanding his studious
habits, he had always been fond of company; and the
singular invitation which Greene had extended to
him made him suspect that there might be, in this
evening party, more than at first appeared. It must
be added, also, that his main defect of character was
timidity, which led him to yield obedience to others,
even when his judgment opposed such concession.
Such was the case in the present instance.
The supper was held in a hall which Greene's
friends had rented for the occasion. At entering,
Clifford was greeted with a round of applause, for
many there were sincerely glad to see him. Amid
the flow of voices, the hilarity of those who had once
been schoolboys, the exchange of repartee, and an
occasional song, Clifford forgot his studies, and
mingled freely with his companions. During the
entertainment wine was introduced.
Now, Clifford, said a young man named Reed,
you and I will drink each other's health. Fill your
glass. Clifford shook his head, saying that he never
drank wine.
Never drink wine! exclaimed Reed, as a
number
of eyes turned towards Clifford, Never drink
wine! You are not a tee-totaller, I hope.
No, he repliedbut the blood mounted to his
cheek, on seeing that he had become an object of
wonder to his companions.
But you must drink to night for company's sake,
Reed answered. We shall be offended if you refuse.
Clifford shook his head. Many voices urged him,
some in a pleasant tone, others with suppressed
contempt
.
This time, however, the young man appeared
firm in his refusal; for from conscientious motives he
had, since leaving college, abstained from the use of
wine. But at this moment Greene exclaimed, in an
ironical tone,
Don't force him to commit wrong. He's afraid
that he'll get drunk. A shout of laughter from
many of the half intoxicated group followed.
Clifford's
firmness gave way. He raised the glass, and
drained it to the bottom. Loud acclamations rose
from every side; and before they subsided, the young
man had emptied another glass and another. It is
needless to say that before leaving the hall he was
intoxicated.
It was with trembling hand that Clifford applied,
that night, the dead-latch of his door. During his
walk home, the cool air had somewhat sobered him,
so that he felt ashamed and degraded. It being late,
all in the house were asleep. With as little noise as
possible he passed into his room, closed the door, and
throwing himself upon the bed, was soon asleep.
Before daylight, he awoke cold, sick, and with a
violent
pain in the head. A few moments' reflection
brought before his memory, in vivid colours, the
scenes of the preceding evening. He shut his eyes
to the truth, he tried to believe it all a dream; he
arose and paced the floor, repeating with vehement
gestures,It cannot beit cannot be.
Sometimes he stopped suddenly, and raising his
clenched hands, he cursed the one who had led him
into temptation, and his own weakness which had
made him willing to yield. He longed for the
appearance
of daylight when he might go into the open air.
The night seemed endless; and at last, though
shivering
with cold, he sat down by the window, and
clasped his throbbing head in his hands. While
there, an hour passed away. It was one of those
hours of terrible agony, when a youth of generous
feelings, and hitherto unspotted character, feels, for the
first time, the consciousness of his own degradation.
The scene that morning at the breakfast-table of
Mrs. Clifford was a sad one. He who had hitherto
supplied the loss of the husband and father, was
reserved
31 X
and gloomy. His mother and sisters felt that
something unusual had occurred; none suspected
what it was. Clifford passed directly from the table
to his study. As this was his usual custom it
excited
no suspicion; but when, after partaking of no
dinner, the afternoon wore away without his
appearing
,
the family became alarmed. Annette, his
youngest
and favourite sister, stole silently to the door of
his room, where she paused to listen. No sound
came from it. She knocked; but still there was no
sound. With a convulsive effort, she pushed open
the door and entered. Her brother was sitting on a
chair by the window, with his arms folded, and his
chin sunk upon his breast. He appeared unconscious
of any thing around, and his eyes, swelled with
inflammation
,
were bent upon the floor. Annette, much
frightened, laid her hand upon his shoulder.
Brother, what is the matter? she exclaimed.
Clifford started to his feet. Emotions of sorrow,
humiliation, and anger flitted across his face, and he
fixed his eye, in a manner that he had never done
before, on his sister. It was some moments before
the trembling girl could repeat her question.
Nothing, he replied. Leave meI want to
be alone.
There was something in his tone which made her
shudder.
Oh, brother, she said, approaching and laying
her hand on his arm, why do you speak so to me?
It is Annette, your own sister. I will soothe and
comfort you.
Leave me, Annette! he exclaimed wildly. I
want no comforter. Who told you to interrupt me in
my own study?
Brother, brother! she sobbed, clasping his arm
tighter; but he tore it from her grasp, and seizing his
hat, hurried out of the door and down the steps. She
heard the hall door open and close again.
There are those in society, noisy, talkative, and
eager to display all the talents, natural or acquired,
which they possess, who are, notwithstanding, slow
and undecisive in action. Fortunately, the same
traits of character which prevent them from advancing
in a good cause, keep them from any great degree of
depravity in a bad one. On the other hand, there are
a few who, silent, observant, and industrious, do much
in a little time, and who form the real support of the
cause in which they may be engaged. If right, their
influence is powerful for good; but if once they turn
into the path of evil, they rush to ruin headlong.
Charles Clifford was one of these. A few hours had
deranged the good habits of years. He was no longer
the calm and cheerful student that he had been the
day before. During the morning he had made
repeated
attempts to study, but his mind seemed
confused
,
and a cold, sad feeling gathered round his
heart as he turned over the dull pages; and he seemed
still to be amid the revelry of the previous evening.
His conduct to the sister whom he tenderly loved
showed how wide was the chasm which the
commission
of the first degrading act had thrown between his
present feelings and his former life.
After leaving his home, Clifford walked rapidly
along, sometimes crossing from one side to the other,
or turning into a cross street like one who wanders
at random. To abate, in some measure, the
acuteness
of his feelings, he walked rapidly, and
endeavoured
to drive from his mind the impression of the
last scene with his sister. He was unequal to such a
task. Her look, her tones of affection, the words that
she had used to soothe him, rose before his sight and
rang in his ears. In mental anguish, he pressed his
lips together, and hurried on with uneven step, until
the veins of his forehead swelled almost to bursting,
and strangers stared at him from the windows and
sidewalks. He could not shake off the memory of
Annette's words.
Wretch that I am! he at length exclaimed, half
aloud. Oh, that I could live last night over! He
paused, and turned as if to see where he was. The
air was cold, but he stood with folded arms for nearly
ten minutes, apparently lost in thought. He was
interrupted
by feeling some one grasp his arm.
Why, Clifford! exclaimed a low voice, are you
mad to night? I have followed you for a half hour,
and really no man in his senses could act more like a
madman than I have seen you do.
I'm a wretch! the young man said, involuntarily.
Nonsense. Don't you know me?
No! I have never seen you before! leave me.
Clifford, said the other, half solemnly, I hope
you are only joking. Surely you know the brother
of Mary Sanderson.'
`Is it you, Harry? exclaimed Clifford, as the name
of her he loved fell on his ear. Excuse me, he
continued, clasping his hand. I believe I am
upside
down to night; but it was only for a moment,
while I was thinking about something. I was rude,
Harryvery rude.
I'll tell you what I think, Charley, Sanderson
said, in his straight-forward manner. Study is
killing
you. You have wasted almost to a skeleton
and take care that the waste of mind does not follow.
What good will it do you to know more than a whole
college of professors? Or, if it will do you good, be
generous enough to wait a little while until some of
us ignorant ones catch up with you.
What you say may be true, returned Clifford;
but
But what?
I hardly know what I would say. Let us change
the subject.
Well, you must go with me to night, Charley.
Where?
Where do you suppose, if not to the house? Mary
will rejoice to see you.
At any other moment Clifford would have lost no
time closing with this invitation. Now, a change
was upon him. He felt that degradation was written
upon his brow too plainly to escape observation. He
hesitated and was silent. Sanderson again invited
him.
I must be excused to night, he said, in a sad
tone.
Well, this is strange! exclaimed his friend. Do
I speak with Charles Clifford, or not? But you must
come, he continued, after a pause; and, placing his
friend's arm within his own, he drew him gently
along.
They were soon at Sanderson's house. The misery
depicted on Clifford's countenance was palpably
visible
to blinder eyes than those of Harry's sister. Her
first salutation was an involuntary inquiry into the
cause of his unusual appearance. He returned
an evasive answer, but Sanderson exclaimed,
suddenly
I found him wandering in the street in a
brown-study
,
telling nobody that he was a wretch. He is
either planning a tragedy, or going mad. So I
concluded
to bring him where he might find a remedy.
There was but one person to whom Clifford did
not seem an inexplicable problem. That one was
Mary Sanderson. She had learned to know and to
love him, and she, too, appeared to him as the bright
personification of the dreams of innocent loveliness,
which had occupied many an hour of his college days.
He had become acquainted with her through Harry,
and to her he devoted almost all the time spared from
study. Often, when fatigued with mental labour, he
repaired to her house, and found in her conversation
the relief which no mere amusement can afford.
Mutual esteem ripened into a holier feeling; and the
brother beheld with pride the affections of her whom
he was proud to call sister, concentrating upon one
so worthy of her.
With the quick feeling of intuition, Mary perceived
that something more than the effects of study ailed
Clifford. Hearts which have long been in unison
are skilled to detect the slightest cause for
derangement
.
In the haggard countenance, the shrinking
eye, the inconsistent replies, she read enough to alarm
and shock her. The interview was reserved and
painful. Harry, who entered towards its close,
perceived
that something was the matter, greater than
he had at first anticipated. He inquired if his friend
was sick; to which Clifford replied that he did not
feel well.
Shall I pour you out a glass of wine? said
Harry.
It might be expected that the unhappy young
man would reject the offer almost with abhorrence.
In the morning this would have been the case; but
to the first powerful energy of wounded character
had succeeded a passive apathythe recklessness of
despair, which rendered him careless even of evil.
He felt degradeddegraded, too, in the presence
of her who loved him to adoration. No depth of
misery now appeared low. Silently he accepted the
offered glass, and, nerving himself for the effort, drank
its contents in silence. He returned home an altered
man. The first step to ruin had already hurried him
a fearful distance down its broad path.
The wine drank in the presence of Mary
Sanderson
had produced upon him an effect far different
from that of the evening previous. It seemed to
remove
the weight of grief from his mind, and to inspire
him with a delirium of delight. He walked home
with a buoyant step, and, on reaching his study, rang
for a servant. Though late at night, he demanded
wine; drank three or four glasses, and retired to bed
intoxicated!
One afternoon, about three weeks after this
occurrence
,
Clifford sat alone in the large parlour of his
mother's house. A fire was burning brightly in the
grate. In the short time we have mentioned, a
change had come over the members of this once
happy family. There was sadness on every brow;
but the true cause of this change had not yet been
discovered. On the above-named day, Clifford had
been alone since noon; about four o'clock, he was
interrupted by the entrance of Annette. Her face was
pale, but her red and swollen eyes showed that
she had been weeping. In her hand was a basket,
containing several fine oranges, of which her brother
was immoderately fond. She advanced towards him,
and said
I have brought these for you, Charles.
He gazed at her for a moment with a look of deep
melancholy. Annette again offered the fruit.
I do not want them, Annette, he said.
Shall I sing to you, brother?
He shook his head.
Will you go with me, this evening, to Miss
Campbell's
party?
Still he was silent.
Then let me play on the piano for you. Oh,
brother, do not refuse me this.
Tears started to the poor girl's eyes, as she thus
pleaded for the privilege of making another happy.
For a moment, Clifford's feelings were touched. He
longed to unburden his heart to her, but the transient
repentance passed away; for degradation had already
blunted his feelings, and rendered him selfish. In a
tone of impatience he replied that he did not want to
hear music. Annette placed her basket upon a table
and burst into tears.
What is the matter? he said, with cruel
calmness
.
She could not reply; but, burying her face in her
hands, she sobbed aloud. This was more than he
could bear. Ashamed of his behaviour, he seated
himself
by her side, and attempted to soothe her injured
feelings. An hour of wretchedness followed, during
which Annette gradually recovered her
self-possession
.
Clifford spoke first.
I will take these oranges to my study, sister.
I did not bring them as a present, Charles, she
said calmly. It was merely as a token of affection.
But you do not love me now as you did once.
Do not say so, Annette, he replied, drawing her
closer to him, you are still dear to me as ever.
Oh brother, she answered, if you knew what I
have suffered for more than two weeks, you would not
refuse the pledge of reconciliation which I brought
you.
Let us forget it, sister. The cause is with me,
but it shall exist no longer. You do not know all,
Annetteno, nor never will; but let us forget the
32
past and again be happy. I know you will forgive
me.
A glad smile illumined her features as she heard
these words, uttered in the kind tone of former days.
Charles, too, was happy. A sudden impulse of virtue
had made him confident of his ability to reform; so
that the gloom which had hung heavily around him,
all at once dissipated, the evening passed as though
the week had not been one of sorrow; and for several
days Charles abstained altogether from wine.
But the resolutions formed through impulse are
quickly broken. Only two weeks after Clifford had
resolved to abstain from wine, Annette sat alone in
the parlour waiting for her brother's return. It was
night, and her mother and sisters had retired to bed.
Until long after midnight she watched for him,
sometimes
hurrying from room to room, at others listening
by the window to hear his footstep. A vague dread
of some unknown evil haunted her mind, and
prevented
weariness or sleep. They who under like
circumstances have held their vigil hour after hour,
may tell how much the heart, on such occasions,
endures
.
But at length the fearful pause was broken.
The brother came, and Annette flew to meet him.
To her eager questions he returned some gruff
unintelligible
reply; and shaking her hand from his
arm, stumbled into his sitting-room, which was on
the same floor as the parlour. In a short time all
was silent. Annette waited a few minutes, until sure
that he was not moving about the room. Then, with
as little noise as possible, she glided through the
entry
,
unlatched the door, and entered the sitting-room.
Charles had thrown himself upon a sofa and was
breathing heavily. The confined air was already
tainted with the odour of wine; and as Annette
approached
and bent over him, the truth flashed upon
her mind. That moment afforded her an index to
the cause of her late wretchedness.
The sight of her brother, drunken, changed,
degraded
,
was a terrible blow to Annette. At first the
shock seemed overpowering; but she did not yield to
it. Woman sinks before little distresses; she braves,
with nerve of steel, calamities which seem
overpowering
.
Before she retired to her couch, Annette had
resolved to hide from the family, the knowledge of
her brother's fall, and to attempt his reformation.
From that night she appeared cheerful and happy
as formerly, skilfully eluded all reference to his
altered
appearance, and openly construed his
momentary
fits of repentance into proofs of a disposition
still loving and affectionate. At the same time she
laboured with her brother to inspire his mind with
its former sense of honour and dignity. But an
unlooked-for
accident defeated these efforts.
Clifford's downward course was, as we have said,
rapid. In a little more than two months he had
imbibed
an intense thirst for ardent spirits, and had
often appeared in the streets intoxicated. On one of
these occasions he suddenly met face to face with his
friend Sanderson. To the latter, such a meeting
imparted
a shock which he could scarcely sustain.
Grasping Clifford's hand, he looked earnestly in his
face and said,
Where are you going, Charles? Clifford's
answer
was unintelligible. Will you go to your house
with me? continued Sanderson; for he dreaded lest
his friend might be recognized in the street.
Clifford
replied with a volley of jests, songs and
incoherent
exclamations. At length Sanderson succeeded
in conducting him, without much trouble, to Mrs.
Clifford's residence. He then disappeared, unwilling
to witness the meeting which would ensue at
Clifford's
entrance. That meeting destroyed in a
moment
Annette's hope of concealing her brother's
shame, and revealed to the widow, that her only son,
he of whom so many hopes had been formed, was a
drunkard.
Perhaps no one felt this fact more keenly than did
Harry Sanderson. His personal esteem for Clifford,
the intimacy of their families, the relation which he
sustained to Mary, all tended to enhance this
sympathy
for his friend. It will not appear strange,
therefore
,
that during his walk home, and during the
remainder
of the evening, he thought over the painful
subject, with a view of devising some plan for his
friend's reformation. That the habit was a confined
one he did not doubt. It enabled him to explain
many circumstances in Clifford's conduct hitherto
inexplicable
;
but he had forgotten the fatal glass which
he had administered to his friend three months
before
.
At length, he determined not to reveal what
he had seen to Mary, but to invite Clifford to a
personal
conference, at which he might frankly state the
incident of the preceding evening, and endeavour to
ascertain the feelings of his friend with regard to the
future.
The interviewa painful onetook place.
Sanderson
stated, as delicately as he could, what he had
witnessed. He spoke some words about his friend's
condition only a few months previousand now, how
altered! With shame and contrition, Clifford
acknowledged
his fault. Oh! does Mary know it?
he added, in a tone of agony.
Sanderson shook his head.
And she will not? he inquired, with a look of
sorrow.
Y
Sanderson was silent until the question was
repeated
.
Then he replied
Need I tell her, Charles? Will she not discover
it?
Harry, said the young man, rising, and pacing
the floor, why did you offer me that fatal glass of
wine?
Sanderson started. As his friend walked backward
and forward, with every feature distorted by the
intensity
of his feelings, the remembrance of the
intimated
event flashed across his mind, and with it the
fearful consciousness that he had been an agent in
his friend's degradation. A long silence followed; at
the end of which Sanderson advanced towards his
friend, and, taking him by the hand, exclaimed
Charley, swear, before you leave the room, that
you will renounce wine for ever. I know you hate a
drunkard as much as I do. Make but a vigorous
effort, and you are safe.
I cannot, replied Clifford; it's useless to try.
The habit has, in three months, become a monster. I
am already old in misery.
Why, Clifford, exclaimed his friend, do not
give way to feeling in this manner. Remember you
are a man; remember your station in society, and
your hopes as a student. Meet the danger at once,
and conquer it.
Clifford shook his head.
Then promise to meet me again to-morrow
night, continued Sanderson. His object was to
afford
his friend time to reflect, and he succeeded. The
two young men partedone, at least, in better hopes
than he had entertained in the early part of the
evening.
We need not state that the following day was, to
Clifford, one of mental anguish. In the evening, he
repaired to the house of his friend. There they both
agreed to renounce, entirely, the use of wine, or any
intoxicating drink. The past was thrown to oblivion,
the future seemed to promise only years of prosperity.
One month after, Clifford was intoxicated!
And during this period, where was Mary
Sanderson
?
The shade which hung on the brow and the
heart of Clifford had darkened her own; and she had
already begun to feel the sorrow which wastes more
surely, because endured in secret. For several weeks,
mere casual circumstancesthe tone of voice, a
gesture
,
or a glance, had revealed to her the change in
Clifford's character. Then followed proofs, at first
obstinately rejected, then endured with feelings which
found utterance only in tears; so that, even before
the fact was known to her brother, Mary was fully
apprised of it. She, like Annette, formed a resolution
that none should know it but herself; but the secret,
hidden in her bosom, gnawed upon its frail tenement,
until the flush of health fled from her cheek, her step
fell heavy and uncertain, and round her eye a dull
green shade gathered, which told that the mind itself
had grown sickly.
We would not repeat the oft-told tale of a
drunkard's
courseof the tears shed over the memory of
departed worth; of the gentle ones, by necessity made
courageous, who cling to him through sorrow, and
want, and shame, with affection which glows brighter
and holier as the dark vortex of sin draws him within
it; of the hopes departed, the hours clouded, the
wretched ones that, one by one, go down to the tomb,
unhonoured and unpitied, because they have been
related to the drunkard. Let us, reader, pass over
two years of such scenes, and behold one in which
the inebriate and his victim were brought together.
One day in the spring of 184-, a funeral procession
moved slowly from the city towards a small but
beautiful
burying-ground, in a pleasant part of the country.
The air was chill, from a recent shower; and over the
face of the sky heavy clouds still hung in masses,
through which the sun darted only a few straggling
rays. The long line of black carriages dragged
laboriously
through the half-frozen road; the silencethe
gloomy day, accorded well with the hour when all that
remains of departed friendship, is to be consigned to
the tomb. As they approached the village, near which
was the burial-place, some persons, touched by the
scene, opened their doors to gaze upon it; a few boys
threw stones at the muddy carriages; while from a
tavern, whose sign swung listlessly in the wind, two
miserable creatures issued, and joined in the
procession
with mock solemnity, followed it to the
graveyard
.
In strange contrast to mourning wealth, they
walked over the damp sods, and stood with the
company
,
while a few words were spoken by a
clergyman
over the grave. Before the coffin was lowered
into the grave, one of them again directed his steps to
the tavern. But some who were glancing suspiciously
at the other, thought they could detect in his
countenance
an expression not inconsistent with the
solemnities
to which they had been listening. The spirit
of better times seemed suddenly to gleam from his
bloated countenance.
In a few minutes the carriages, with their train of
mourners, had driven away. The chill air and the
damp earth had prevented even the relatives from
remaining
.
The sexton plied in silence his task of
filling
the grave. The man who had followed the
procession
was still there. For a time he watched the
motions of the spade without speaking. Then
approaching
the sexton, he inquired the name of the one
who had been buried.
Her name was Mary Sanderson, said the
gravedigger
.
Mary Sanderson!not Sanderson? said the
other.
Yes, Sanderson. Why do you stare at me in that
wild manner?
And did you know her?
Yes; and a sweet girl she was. It is said she
broke her heart, poor thing! She loved one who
deceived
her, and afterwards no one ever saw her smile.
Many a one who knew her, will be sad enough to hear
that she is gone.
But this is not Mary Sanderson's graveis it?
said the stranger.
To be sure it is. Do you take me for a knave?
The stranger tore the ragged sleeve of his coat, and
33 Y2
loosened something from his arm. It was a bracelet
of hair, with a golden clasp. He held it towards the
sexton, and on the bright plate the latter read the
words, Mary Sanderson. The man started, and
asked where he got it.
Do not ask me, replied the other. Will you
place the headstone over this grave?
The sexton nodded assent.
Then put this under it. I will not carry it to
mock and torture me. Let the pure one who gave it
to me, receive it from him who proved unworthy of
her gift. Remember, if you keep it, you will have to
answer to a Higher Power than yourself or me. He
left the bracelet and disappeared.
It was Charles Clifford.
We have compared the effects of intoxication to the
sting of a serpent. May we not liken those who go
among the haunts of vice to rescue the helpless
inebriate
,
to those who pass their lives in the desert,
that they may relieve the weary and the wounded?
Clifford met with such. He became a member of the
order whose thousands are extending over our land,
and the world. He remained firm to their principles,
and was most active in their cause. But he never
regained
his former cheerfulness. When seated in the
Division room, or in the society of his companions, a
shade of sorrow was often observed to pass across his
brow. Many thought that his health had been
impaired
;
but those who knew him best, believed, that
at such times he was thinking of his mother who had
ong since died, and of Mary Sanderson.
JAMES BLAIR;
OR,
LOVE IN THE VALLEY OF THE JUNIATA.
By Grace Greenwood
.
CHAPTER I.
Scene First
.A
moonlight night,
in a forest, in the
northern part of
Virginia; many
lights gleaming in
the distance. But
what am I about!
I beg your pardon, my sober
minded reader, for any
theatrical
commencement. The
truth of the matter is, I just
dropped in at the play, the
other night, and my head is
even now full of the vain
things which I there saw and heard. But I should
not seek to give stage effect to the really authentic
tale which I am about to relate to you, and which
I only desire to Tell as it was told to me. So, to
begin again, soberly and in order;it was a glorious
June night, some fifteen years ago, when Henry
Elbridge, the younger son of a rich and aristocratic
Virginian family, rode up a rocky pathway, which
wound through one of the magnificent forests of the
Old Dominion. He was superbly mounted, and
followed, at a little distance, by a black groom.
Suddenly
,
at a turn of the road, he checked his horse,
and an exclamation of wondering delight escaped his
lips. The forest far around him was lit up as for a
festival; and a multitude of snowy tents were pitched
beneath the trees, gleaming through the
over-hanging
branches. A crowd of people, of all ages and
conditions, were lifting up the voice of prayer and
praise in that grandest cathedral of nature's God
the gorgeous wood, with its lofty, rugged pillars, and
its thousand sounding aisles.
It was that most unique, that most wildly-beautiful
of scenes, a methodist camp-meeting at night. It was
entirely a new spectacle to our hero; for, though
born in Virginia, he had been educated in New
England
,
having but just graduated at Harvard. He was
an ardent, enthusiastic, intellectual young man, with
a heart peculiarly impressible in matters of love and
religion. He had been led by curiosity alone to
witness
the scene which he now contemplated with so
lively an interest.
At the close of the prayer and hymn he dismounted,
and approached nearer to the preacher's standa rude
platform erected on the highest part of the grounds.
Taking rather a retired position, he stood carelessly
leaning against a patriarchal oak, and awaited the
evening's discourse. The preacher, the celebrated
B, had not yet arrived; but presently a hush of
respectful expectation fell upon the assembly, as a
man of imposing form, and massive features, ascended
the platform. He commenced in a manner calmly
impressive, but soon his impassioned and
o'ermastering
eloquence a woke within him, in might and
grandeur
.
His dark eye flashed with fervid zealhis
every word seemed freighted with solemn meaning
the very tones of his voice pierced the heart,
sword-like
,
through the double armour of pride and unbelief.
His theme was the crucifixion of our Lord; and, as
he proceeded, the groans of the strong man, and the
cries of women, attested the power of the orator and
the subject. Bound by the mighty spell of truth,
genius-revealed, stood young Elbridge, the burning
exhortations of the speaker falling like a storm of fire
on his overwhelmed and shrinking spirit. Every sin,
every error, every unworthy act of his life, seemed
passing in dread review before himhis features
became
convulsed, his head bowed, and his breast
heaved tumultuously. He seemed to behold the
mocking trial of our blessed Masterthe crown of
thorns, the crimsoned scourge, the spear, the cup of
gall;all the human suffering, and divine meekness
of that life-giving death; and, while his heart was
rent with anguish unspeakable, a flood of despair, like
a wave from the sea of eternal wrath, swept over his
soul; he raised his clasped hands, cried frantically,
For
me
He died! for
me
, for
me!
and fell prostrate.
He had swooned.
When he revived, he was lying in a tent, his head
supported by his servant; and beside him stood the
preacher, whose exhortations had so stirred up the
great deeps of his soul. Then followed words of hope,
and peace, and pleading prayer; and, ere the
morning
dawned, a new life, mystical and holy, awoke
within the bosom of the young convert; a sweet,
confiding
,
childlike sense of reconciliation with the
father
,
thrilled his heart; and the joy of the saint,
sudden
,
unutterable, and full of glory, burst upon him
like a tropical day.
CHAPTER II.
I will
not dwell on the storm of opposition which
was raised in the proud family of the Elbridges,
when, a few weeks subsequent to the event narrated
in the foregoing chapter, Henry announced his
intention
of preparing for the ministry, after having been
admitted to the church. The young enthusiast mildly,
but firmly, resisted both entreaty and ridiculehis
patrician mother's and sister's reproaches, and the
sneers of his father and brothers, at ranting, canting,
beggarly, methodist parsons. With a strength and
determination which amazed those who would deter
him, he resolutely trod the rugged and undeviating
path of duty. Diligently and prayerfully he fitted
himself for his sacred office; and at the age of
twenty-three
was stationed as a regular preacher, in a
romantic
part of the valley of the Juniata. He had heard
much of the natural beauty of that portion of the
country, and was all ardour and hopefulness in
contemplation
of his pleasant duties, as the shepherd
who should watch and lead the flock of the faithful,
scattered through those wild regions. But alas! he
soon found that he had dropped down among a set of
semi-barbarians, in manners, prejudices, habits, and
religion. Sensitive and refined, reared in luxury,
and of a delicate physical organization, what course
did the young clergyman pursue, when made aware
of the erroneous ideas he had formed of the location
to which he had been appointed? Why, he made
up his mind to labour
as a missionary
, ceaselessly, and
ardently, until a better state of things was established,
in his congregation at least. This he found to
consist
almost altogether of the ranting methodists, whose
fits of religious feeling were accompanied by
shoutings
and violent convulsions. In their meetings it
was not deemed out of order for singing, praying,
and exhorting, to go on simultaneously; and he or
she was the better saint, whose voice rose loudest or
shrillest. Gently and gradually, by the influences
of love and reason, did Elbridge bring about his
much-needed reform; and before a year had passed, a
decent quietness reigned over his religious meetings.
There was one female preacher, however, whose
frequent and singular exhortations continued a source
of considerable annoyance to Elbridge. In her
holdings
forth, she invariably began by a powerful
appeal
to the world's people, expressing a fervent desire
to behold a harpoon from the quiver of gospel truth
piercing their stubborn hearts, and closed with an
admonition to the brethren and sisters never to turn
aside to pluck the flowers that grow in
nater's
garden
,
but to persevere until they should land on the
other side of everlasting deliverance, &c., &c.
Poor Elbridge found it vain for him to attempt
putting a spell upon a woman's tongue when set on
fire of zeal.
There was also one of the brethren, who offered a
stout breast to the flood of innovation. This was a
good old father in Israel, who had for many years
been a class-leader, and was, therefore, a privileged
person. He rejoiced in a
bon-vivant-ish
rotundity of
figure, and a round, funny face, irresistibly laughter
exciting in one of his calling. His seat was directly
in front of the desk, whence his responses were most
frequent and inopportune. At every Amen which
he uttered with a loud, sonorous voice, he brought
his heavy walking-stick to the floor, in a most
striking
and emphatic manner. Having been
interrupted
and confused until his patience was exhausted,
our hero of the white neck-cloth sought his hearer,
and, with kind persuasion, and by reasoning against
his mal-apropos responses, wrung from him a promise
of future forbearance. It happened that Elbridge's
next discourse was a remarkably fine one, and it was
with evident difficulty, from the first, that the stout
gentleman controlled his
amenity
. Warmer and
warmer waxed the preacher, more and more eloquent,
until it was too much for methodist nature to bear,
and the old man brought down his stick, louder than
ever, and shouted boldly, Amen, hit or miss!
I need hardly say that Elbridge did not attempt to
deal with his unruly member.
CHAPTER III.
When
Elbridge had been a few months in the
valley
of the Juniata, he was called to administer
spiritual
consolation to a woman dying of consumption.
A small lad, with a slight Irish brogue, and eyes
swollen with weeping, poorly but cleanly dressed,
conducted
him two or three miles up the valley, to a house
built of logs, but as neat as a cottage
ornee
, and nested
in the most luxuriant shrubbery. Elbridge could
scarcely believe this to be the home of James Blair, the
wretched inebriate, whom he had often remarked
staggering from bar-room doors, or lying by the
way-side
in a state of brutal intoxication.
When he entered, the dying woman was sitting
upright
in bed, supported by a young girl, whom he had
before seen at his meetings, and noticed for the Ma
donna-like sweetness and purity of her countenance.
This was Elizabeth Blair, the eldest daughter of the
house. Her sister, an exceedingly beautiful girl of
sixteen or seventeen, stood at her side, weeping
passionately
.
The husband and father, for once in his
right mind, was kneeling at the bed-side, his face
buried in his hands, and his whole frame quivering
with convulsive sobs. Opposite stood Dr. N, a
young physician, late from Harrisburgh, already
partially
known to Elbridge.
To his joy, the clergyman found that his
ministrations
were only needed by the husband and children;
the wife and mother awaited with fearless and
saintlike
serenity the swift coming of the angel of death.
In the brief conversation which he was enabled to
have with her, he saw that she was remarkably
intelligent
for one of her station, and possessed of the
clearest
and truest understanding of spiritual things.
At the close of a simple and fervent prayer, the
sufferer
beckoned her younger children to draw nearer,
kissed them tenderly, and faintly murmured,
Elizabeth
,
your mothernow. Then, for the first time,
James Blair looked up, and, in a voice husky with
remorseful
anguish, exclaimed, Forgive me, Mary,
before you go!
Alas! the power of speech had left the poor, wronged
wife, but she stretched out her thin hand, and laid it
tenderly on the head of her repentant husband, and
then let it glide down upon his neck. He understood
the action, and drew closer to her; she bent forward,
pressed her cold lips to his, and so died.
On his return to his boarding-house, Elbridge,
ascertained
,
to his surprise, that the family with whom
he was domesticated were nearly related to the Blairs.
Philip Denny, his host, the only brother of the late
Mrs. Blair, was one of the wealthiest men in the valley;
but, though violently religious, had the reputation of
great penuriousness. He had but one child, a
daughter
,
and, as she is to be no unimportant character in
this simple story, it is time she was known to
my reader. So, my dear sir, or madame, allow me
to present to you Miss Katherine Denny,
the
beauty and belle for many miles up and down the
valley of the Juniata. She was a superb creature
a perfect Irish Junowith the queenliest of forms,
the haughtiest of gaits, and the blackest eyes
conceivable
,
out of which flashed a fire, beautiful but
dangerous, like lightning from a midnight cloud.
Katherine had been for some while the leader and life
of
gay society
in that region, and had won for herself
the name of being an arch-coquette. But soon after
the advent of that
rara avis
, a minister, young, rich,
and handsome, she became, to the great dismay of
her worldly admirers, suddenly
serious
. She cut the
vain bows from her bonnet, and the equally vain beaux
at her side; she joined the class spiritual in the
conference room, and forsook the class Terpsichorean,
in the ball-room of The Golden Horn. She walked
demurely to meeting, and sung hymns, and talked
theology with the young minister, until his
susceptible
heart was affected to the degree that he found
himself
preaching with her commendations in view, and
Z2
yet blushing and stammering painfully when he
marked her great black eyes fixed upon him in
sermon-time
.
She was thus in the full tide of successful
experiment
,
when, with the strange want of tact which the
most artful women often display when their hearts are
touched, she grew impatient of the slow-and-sure
policy
,
and, resolving to conclude her conquest by a
coup-de-main
, she suddenly made her
debut
as an
exhorter
!
She proved herself possessed of rare talent, of
absolute
genius as a speaker. She talked like an inspired
prophetess, and electrified her audience with her
wonderful
bursts of eloquence. Her warnings and
denunciations
were at times fearfully grand, and produced
the most striking effect upon her impressible hearers.
But, as for Elbridge, she had mistaken her man.
Though, as an orthodox methodist, he advocated
women's
religious rights, and believed in the spiritual
equality of the sexes, his natural delicate
sensitiveness
,
and his early prejudices, were certainly opposed
to the unmaidenly course which Katherine Denny
was pursuing. He was pained, disappointed, ill at
ease every way, but did not presume to advise against
that which he believed the result of an imperious
sense of duty on the part of the beautiful religious
enthusiast
.
One Monday, while taking his morning
walk, musing on these things, and striving to
reconcile
old tastes with newly formed-principles, he
overheard
part of a conversation between two of his
church-members
,
who were at work in a field by the
road-side
.
There had been a meeting of exciting interest
the night previous, and one of the men said to his
companion
Did you know that Tom Henderson had got
religion?
You don't say so! How?
Why, he happened in at the meeting last evening,
just for deviltry; but when Katherine Denny come
to free her mind, he grew dreadfully religious, and lay
in the power all night long.
Now Tom Henderson was known through all
that region as the wildest, profanest jockey and
frolicker
;
and though good-natured and good-looking
withal the plague and pest of the honest and
peacefully-inclined. Here was, indeed, cause for
rejoicing
,
and Elbridge felt rebuked for his little faith,
and worldly fastidiousness. Dear Katherine, he
soliloquized
,
why should I question your right to
exercise
all
your gifts in doing good! If your words have
carried conviction to the heart of this one sinner, great
is your reward for the sacrifice of your womanly
delicacy
.
But poor Henderson may be standing in want
of spiritual consolation: I will go to him.
On reaching the abode of the Hendersons, the
clerical
visiter was directed by a staring, red-haired girl,
to a back yard, where he found the young convert
seeking consolation in a cock-fight.
CHAPTER IV.
Before
progressing with my story, I must tell my
reader something more of the Blairs. So,
reculer pour
mieux sauter
, James Blair, an Irishman of education,
and some property, married the girl of his heart, and
came immediately to this country. Having an eye
for the picturesque, he purchased a farm on that
loveliest
of American rivers, the Juniata. But James
Blair, bred to a mercantile life, had no faculty for
farming; then he met with sickness, losses, and
discouragements
,
andoh, 'tis the old, old story, became
a drunkard, and all was over with him. But Mary,
poor Mary Blair, was a jewel of a wife, for a saint or
a sinneronly she would have lasted longer if her
Jamie had had more of the former, and less of the
latter in his composition. But, as she wasted away
in her patient broken-heartedness, there was one to
take her place. Elizabeth Blair was one of those
rare characters of whom the world is not worthy.
A spectacle for angels was her life of unobtrusive,
unwearying
,
unmurmuring goodness. From the age
of eighteen, when her mother's health failed utterly,
to her twenty-first year, the period when she was in
troduced to my reader, she had, by her own labours,
clothed and fed her father and his family. In
household
duties, and the care of the invalid mother, she
was assisted by her sister somewhat; but she alone
was the hope, the dependence, the light in a dark
place, the sustaining pillar, the animating soul of
that sad, neglected family. She was school-teacher,
mantua-maker, milliner, tailoress,- all things for the
good and comfort of those she loved. Dear Elizabeth!
when I remember your meek piety, your energy,
patience, sweetness, and courage, I were humbled at
the very thought of you, did I not know that there is
no reproach in your goodness.
But in her mother's last illness the noble girl had
over-tasked herself; and, after hard struggling against
disease, she became alarmingly ill, with a nervous
fever. Again, weeping more bitterly than ever, went
little Jamie for the minister, whom he met returning
from the parochial visit narrated at the close of the
last chapter. Elibridge turned pale at the
intelligence
which the boy sobbed forth, and accompanied
him immediately home. He found Elizabeth
manifesting
the same serene resignation which had
hallowed
the deathbed of her mother. Before he left,
however, Dr. N arrived, and pronounced her
better, and the angel of hope revisited that desolate
home. Slowly, very slowly, came back strength and
health to that overwrought spirit and frame; and
pleasant and profitable were the young clergyman's
frequent visits to the interesting invalid. He was
sometimes accompanied by Katherine, who professed
to love her cousin fervently; and he did not fear for
his heart, because he constantly encountered there
the young physician, to whom it was rumoured
Elizabeth
Blair was betrothed.
35
At last, the invalid had so far recovered as to appear
at meeting. Pale, very pale, she was; but lovelien
than ever thought those who loved her.
Elbridge saw that it now would be but proper for
him to make his visits less frequent, and he did so.
Then was he haunted by a strange feeling of unrest
he forgot his engagementshe talked to himselfhe
grew careless of his dresshe lost his appetite;in
short,
he was in love;
but not with Katherine Denny;
oh no, not with Katherine Denny.
When our hero became aware of his dangerous
malady, he began treating it with promptness and
severity. He first prescribed for himself
total
absence
from a certain abode of beauty and worthlove's own
log temple, built in the wilderness.
A dead failure! for did he not see
that
face,
delicately
flushed with returning health, looking up to
him with sweet seriousness, every blessed Sunday?
Matters were in this interesting state when, while
returning one Sabbath evening from a neighbouring
town, where he had been preaching, a storm
compelled
him to seek a night's shelter in a farmhouse
by the way. Soon after, who should ride up but
Dr. N. He came in, dripping with the rain, and
laughing in his own peculiar and joyous manner.
The doctor, now one of my most valuable and
reliable of friends, was one you might see once and
remember always. His frank, handsome,
heart-beaming
countenance daguerreotyped itself inevitably
upon the memory. He was the prince of good felt
lows, in the very best sense of the term. With his
freedom of mind, warm, unchecked affections, and
hopeful, cheerful philosophy, he lived up to the full
measure of life. Once or twice during the evening,
as his fine face glowed with the inspiration of some
thought, flashingly beautiful, or exquisitely grotesque,
Elbridge was slightly conscious of a certain
unministerial
feeling, known to the world as jealousy; but
he coughed it down, as out of order, being the sug
gestion of a gentleman in black,
not
in good and
regular standing.
When the hour for retiring came, as there was but
one spare bed, Elbridge was obliged to turn in
with his unconscious rival. Some time in the night
the doctor awoke. The storm had passed, and the
moon was shining purely pale through the
uncurtained
window. Above him bent Elbridge, with his
large, luminous eyes, fixed with a peculiar and
searching expression upon his face, and his hand
pressed closely against his heart.
What the deuce! cried the startled doctor.
Hush, said the clergyman, in a solemn tone, I
want you to tell me the truth.
Well, do you think you have got to take a fellow
by the heart before you can get that!
Pardon me, said Elbridge, but without
removing
his hand, I have to ask you a question on which
my life's happiness depends. Will you answer me
truly?
I will, if it is in my power.
Do you love Elizabeth Blair?
Yes.
That is sufficient, said Elbridge, falling back
upon his pillow.
Sufficient, is it? said N, and he turned
himself wall-ward. But, presently, his good feelings
getting the etter of his waggery, he continued: I
do love Lizzie Blairthat's a stubborn factlove her
as a sister; but if it will be any comfort to you, my
dear sir, to know it, long before I ever saw her, I
bargained myself off to just the finest girl in the
Union. So, if you can win Elizabeth's love, and
deserve it
, I bid you God-speed!
In the morning, Elbridge unfortunately found
himself
oppressed with a heavy cold, in consequence of
his exposure to the preceding evening's storm. He
was really ill, grew rapidly worse, and the next day
was prostrate with inflamed lungs. He recovered, of
course,I would not have the heart to choose a Paul
Dombey for a herobut only after weeks of severe
suffering; and then, Dr. N, who had been his
physician and constant nurse, gravely assured him
that he must abandon preaching altogether, for years
to come. Oh, it was a bitter moment to the young
clergyman! He groaned deeply, and bowed his face
on his almost transparent hand; and, when he at last
looked up, his dark eye-lashes were glistening with
tears. Had all his intense longings, his hungering
and thirsting after opportunities of greater usefulness
in that most holy of professions, come to this!
While yet suffering from this unexpected trial, a
letter was brought in, which he read aloud to the
doctor
.
It was from his parents, and urged, in
affectionate
terms, his immediate return home. Their eldest
sons were travelling, their daughter was married, and
they were left quite alone.
Really, this reconciliation at this time, seems
providential, remarked the doctor, and you will
surely return to Virginia as soon as you have
sufficient
strength.
Yes, but I must see Elizabeth before I goI
cannot endure this terrible suspensemy life seems
balancing on a thread.
Well, go to her, rejoined the doctor, she is a
frank, straight-forward girl, and will tell you the truth
without your taking the trouble to lay your hand on
her heart.
But, my dear N, should I succeed in
winning
her love, I sometimes fear I shall be doing her an
unkindness in taking her from the social sphere in
which she has always moved; that she will be but ill
at ease in the society of my family and friends.
I tell you, Elbridge, exclaimed N, you
either don't half deserve our Elizabeth, or you don't
half know her. As your
wife
, believe me, you will
have reason to be proud of her in any circle of
American society. With the highest natural grace,
elegance, and dignity, she has any amount of tact
and adaptedness, and is fitted for any sphere,
however
exalted, to which the man she loves may raise
her. So don't fear introducing her to your
aristocratic
connections, she will make her own way
bravely. But here we are, coolly discussing these
2A
matters, when heaven only knows whether the girl
will have you at all, at all.
And it seemed a doubtful matter for some time
after. As soon as Elbridge was strong enough, he
rode up to the Blairs', and day after day repeated his
visit. But there was Mary Blair, a laughing,
teazing
,
gipsy of a creature, always at her sister's side,
and Elbridge was suddenly the most bashful of men.
Finally, calling up all his courage, he begged her to
join him in a walk. Certainly, if you desire it,
she calmly said, and tying on her neat sun-bonnet,
was soon strolling by his side. For some moments
the poor fellow could not utter a syllable, but at last
let his warm, honest heart speak for itself in these
simplest of words:
Elizabeth, I love you, ardently, devotedly;do
you return my affection?
Mr. Elbridge, she rejoined in a voice slightly
tremulous, though I have admired and revered, I
have never yet
presumed
to love you; but if the
grateful affection of a poor, uncultivated girl like me
can add to your happiness, I do not think it will be
long withheld.
And thus they parted.
At their next meeting, Elizabeth, suffering her
lover to retain her coy, little hand in his, said with an
enchanting smile, and in the sweetest of tones, I
have been thinking over our last evening's
conversation
,
and looking closely into my heart, and I find
that I have been loving you all along
.
CHAPTER V.
When
Elbridge sought James Blair, to ask of him
his greatest treasure, an affecting scene occurred.
The father wept tears of mingled joy and sorrow.
He grieved to resign his noble daughter, but was
proud of the honourable connection she was to form.
To one thing I will pledge myself, he said,
grasping
the hand of Elbridge, your wife henceforth
shall never be ashamed of her father and his home.
I have not been intoxicated since Mary left me, and
from this day, not one drop of my bane shall pass my
lips. And he kept his word.
On account of the necessity of Elbridge's
immediate
return to Virginia, an early period was fixed for
the wedding.
One morning, a day or two previous to that
decided
upon as the day of days, Elbridge was riding
slowly home from a visit to his lady-love, his thoughts
winged with golden fancies, and his heart steeped in
sweet recollections. In passing through a wild and
rocky glen, he was startled by the sudden appearance
of Katherine Denny. She was deathly pale, and her
eye was blacker and more fearfully brilliant than
ever. Elbridge dismounted, hung the bridle on his
arm, and walking up by her side, pleasantly passed
the usual compliments. To these Katherine made no
reply, but turning abruptly, and fixing a gaze of
intense
meaning on his face, said, calmly
And so you are to marry Elizabeth Blair?
I am, he replied, smiling.
It is a happy and a
fortunate
circumstance to
her
, she rejoined.
But most of all to
me
, added the lover. A pause
of some moments. Then Katherine continued, in a
deep, impressive tone
Mr. Elbridge, I love my cousin, Elizabeth, as an
own sister, but, stronger than my love for her, than
my family pride, is my sense of the duty I owe to
my pastor, to my church, to religion itself, and I
must
warn you before it is too late.
Good heavens! cried Elbridge, what do you
mean?
Tell me, she replied, did not Dr. N
advise
you to this marriage?
Yes.
Strongly?
Very strongly.
Then, are you blind? are you mad? she
exclaimed
.
Can you not see the trap laid for you?
He
would not marry the poor girl, the drunkard's
daughter, and puts her off upon you in his calculating
villany. Bewaro!
She then turned and ran swiftly up the hill-side at
her left. Once she paused on a rock, many feet above
him, and while the wind bore back the dark hair from
her white cheek and brow, she stood like a very
sibyl,
[3]
[3]
See Initial Letter to Chapter I.
and, stretching her hand towards him, cried,
solemnly, you are warnedremember! and
disappeared
amid the thick brushwood.
Elbridge stood transfixed with amazement and
horror, while the blood ran cold through every vein.
A faintness came over him, and he leaned for support
against his horse. But presently he lifted his head
and smiled a proud, happy smile. I will believe in
my Elizabeth, he murmured, as I believe in that
heaven whose own goodness and purity are written
in every line of her sweet face. And he went his
way with a heart strong in faith, and richer than ever
in love.
Dear Elizabeth, said Elbridge, at their next
meeting, if you have not yet invited the guests to
our wedding, there is one of your relatives I must ask
you to excludeKatherine Denny.
What! dear Kate, my only cousin! Why is this,
Henry?
I will tell you some time,at present grant my
request, and trust me for my reasons.
If it is your wish, I promise, she said, turning
aside to hide her emotion.
I will not bore my reader with a description of the
wedding, They were married, and started directly
for Virginia.
Mary Blair, who seemed to possess a goodly
portion
of her sister's spirit, cheerfully took charge of
her father's family.
Great was the grief of Elbridge's attached
parishioners
at the loss of their faithful pastor, and he is yet
remembered by them with reverence and affection.
36 2A2
The morning after his marriage, Elbridge
acquainted
his wife with his memorable interview with
her cousin in the glen.
It is well you did not tell me this at the time,
she said.
Why, my love?
I never should have married you, had you done
so.
As for Katherine Denny, she soon after lost,
unaccountably
,
her religious zeal, backslid to her
bellehood
,
and finally astonished the natives by a
run-away
match with Tom Henderson.
I think I cannot better close my story, than by
quoting part of a letter from my friend Dr. N, to
whom I had applied for information of the after-fate of
some of my characters.
The Elbridges had been married some four or
five years, he writes, when I visited them with
my wife, at their home in Virginia. We found them
living happily and harmoniously with the parents,
brother, and widowed sister of Elbridge, in the very
midst of his aristocratic connexions. Without
being essentially changed, Elizabeth Elbridge had
become truly a magnificent woman. Her beauty was
heightened to greater delicacy by habits of elegance
and rendered striking by rich and tasteful attire. Her
sweet face was softly shadowed by a constant care
for poor Henry's health, which I found was not yet
firmly established. She had then one child, a boy,
and her brother Jamie, grown a tall, fine looking
lad, was with her. She was an admirable hostess, and
I met many agreeable and distinguished people at
her dinner-parties. There was Senator , and
Judge , and a batch of lesser honourables.
She informed me (for I had been some time
absent
from my old location) that her sister Mary had
married an intelligent young farmer, and was living
with her father in a neat white cottage on the old
place.
Elbridge informed me that his rustic bride had
won the love and respect of his relatives at once;
that she had applied herself diligently to study, and
had already made up for the deficiencies in her early
education.
`And I have found,' continued Elbridge, `that all
things are possible to woman, when she loves with
fervour and devotion.'
Moore, in one of his poetical romances, places his
princely hero amid roses and enchantments, in the
vale of Cashmere,but for a simple methodist
parson
,
I think I have had my share of romance and
poetry,Love in the Valley of the Juniata.
KARL AND CORINNE.
By Mrs. Mary B. Horton
.
All
are merry, all are happy, all are loved, in
this great city, but one unfortunate! All happy, all
gay! And I, with spirit loving all things beautiful,
longing for companionship with the gentle and
refined
,
with the knowledge burning within, that I
might adorn the circle of intelligence, so distant from
the sphere I move in, I must live, and grieve and die,
in this pent-up atmosphere, with no name in the
world's history, no place in any mortal's memory!
Oh! the bitterness of that gifted mindthe
crushing
hopelessness of that lonely lot! Worse than the
bed of languishing was the sickness which filled that
soul; worse than death, far worse, the coldness which
was creeping over that rich heart!
A young girl sat by the window of a low dwelling,
in a crowded street. She was a foreigner, with the
dark rich beauty of her native land triumphant through
the gloom of heavy sadness which rested on her
eloquent
face. She sat with her head drooping, and her
beautiful hands claspeda picture of hopelessness,
lovely even in its colouring of abandonment to the
bitter hour.
Lonely and touching was that sorrowing one; and
when a voice from a bed in one corner of the room
faintly called Corinne, the struggle she made to
overcome the oppression of her spirit, so she might
answer the call, composedly gave her high brow a
holier charm, and made her seem, in that poor
dwelling
,
like a mortal type of those who are the invisible
agents of heavenly mercy.
That was indeed an humble rooma very humble
room for genius and beauty to make a home of! No
birds were thereno flowersno music from hearts
or lips! Sickness was there, and gloom, old age, and
fretfulness, shadows and sighs! The only sunshine
there, was the young girl, in her patient care of her
sick mother: she never complained of that. The
greatest shadow on the hearth, was that of an old
man, sullenly brooding over by-gone days; an old
man withered by the going out of fiery youth, when
there was no other, inner life, to give a charm and
freshness to the aged brow. That shadow was ever
on the hearthher mother's wandering words ever
in her ear. Why wonder that the lonely girl gave
vent sometimes to the bitter tide flooding her heart;
that she pined for sympathy, as a weary and fainting
traveller in a strange land?
The morning upon which that sad soliloquy was
breathed, when the heart of the spiritually-longing
girl seemed weighed down with a new heaviness,
was New Yearhappy New Year; and she had
felt anew how little she was cared forhow little the
world possessed of gladness to her, as she heard the
noisy greeting of children in the street, and saw the
little gifts shown proudly around. She passed from
childish joy to the pure pleasure of older minds,
rejoicing
in tokens of affection on this day of festival;
and, in her solitude and sadness, envied all sinlessly
the blessedness of those remembered by the loving.
Yes, 'twas New Year's day in gay New York.
The air was clear and coldthe heavens in a most
favourable state for communicating the bright
morning
greeting of gay, generous Old Sol, to our fair
Mother Earth. The streets of the famed Gotham
rested from the constant pressure of loaded drays
upon their stony breasts, (forgive me! that I make
them so cold-hearted,) and the closed shutters of the
legion merchants on Broadway gave silent notice,
that young clerks dealt with more animated things
that day than measuring-sticks and silks, and were
not at home to never so anxious customers.
All over the great city, fair maidens and plain,
high-born and lowly, were preparing for calls
expected
.
All over the great city, creation's lords looked in
their mirrors anxiously, and put the finishing grace
to whiskers as carefully turned as a lady's curl.
All over the great city, white gloves and
well-brushed
hats lay upon bachelors' tables, ready for the
hour which Fashion had said was the proper one to
commence congratulations.
And all over the great city luxuries were laid out,
as if the slaves of Aladdin's lamp had been called
upon for a universal feast.
Door-bells rung; servant men and maids
answering
them, received large packages and small, all
eloquent
with compliments and gifts.
Fifes were played, drums were beaten, trumpets
made their loud alarum through the nurseries of all
homes, where baby-boys played war with their new
toys; and wonderful was the birth of waxen beauties,
with marvellous blue eyesout of order soon, from
constant usingwhich made the hearts of baby-girls
bound with the embryo emotions of motherly joy.
Some young ladies' hearts were dancing, some
trembling hopefully. Some young men's hearts were
delightfully calm and firm, some dreadfully
undermined
by diffidence and doubt. But all had hope!
All?
There was no rich table spread in the close room
called Corinne's home. No toilette received
her
thoughtno gift came, with its voice of love, or
friendly interest. She listened to no footstep, for
there was none but would pass by. She waited for
no fond kiss, for the lips of brother and sister in the
wide world's family were, to her, as if they had been
of ice; they were deadly cold to the stranger in the
low dwelling!
Alone upon the sea of life! with no star in the
heaven of hopeno voice on the dreary waste of deep,
dark water, to soothe! Poor girl! Poverty in gold
was very light to bear, compared to that dread
poverty
the soul was crushed by! Her duty was the
one object of her life. She freely gave her youth and
strength to it; but it made her eye dim sometimes.
Her mother, beautiful but weak, had, after her first
widowhood, been bought by an old man's gold. The
wealth which bribed her to forget the dead was lost;
and she soon sank into a languor of the heart and
mind, that made her child's life a constant sacrifice.
The husband, stunned by the fall from affluence to
poverty, and with no heart of youth to win back by
patience his lost riches, became morose and sullen,
leaving to his step-daughter the miserable effort to
gain their daily bread.
Was not this a home to break the young spirit
down? No comfort in her mother's smile, for there
was scarcely a ray of reason in it; and the shadow
of that old man, a stranger, as it were, even on her
hearth! She must not leave
her
to die, or
him
to
starve, and so she poured the wealth of her gifted
intellect
out lavishly for their sakes, coining her lofty
thoughts for food.
A few months ago, and they had lived in a sunny
land, a land of poetry; had looked upon a landscape
of vineyard, stream, and wood, which they could call
their own. And now they were the tenants of a low,
mean dwelling, across the waters, over which they
had fled in pride and poverty. The mother sickened
with the change, and became as helpless as a child;
but the old man's nature turned to hate, for the
beautiful
Corinne had been, innocently, the ruin of his
house.
A young Italian count, wanting in all things
honourable
,
had offered the noble girl indignities, which
she resented so proudly, with such galling contempt,
that his evil nature was excited almost to frenzy, and
he determined to bring her down to poverty, if not to
shame. It was an important crisis in the stepfather's
affairs, when this bad purpose was resolved upon;
and its accomplishment brought bitter trial to the
virtuous Corinne. The old man cursed her often as
the destroyer of his fortunesthe dark shadow upon
his life.
She
a shadow of evil! Old man, look upon the
hearth!
Before the noon of that New Year's day, a clearer
37 2B
paleness stole over the mother's facea stranger
brightness filled the wandering eye. What can it
mean? whispered Corinne's heart.
It means, poor orphan child, that the Author of the
life to you so burdensome, is nearing her reward
that the old man brooding selfishly will soon be left
a griefless widower, the solitary sharer of your
unhappy
destinythat while you gaze, the spirit of one
that has been immortal is filling with immortality
with visions all too wonderful for speech!
And gently, peacefully, the spirit passed from the
earthly to the heavenly. Corinne stood by the bed
of death, moved by its sanctity, but more envying
than grieving, as she saw the calmness settling on
those features, so lately troubled with the expression
of a fading mind's unquiet. When her father left her
for his better home, Corinne had needed every
consolation
;
for to him she owed all the cultivation of her
intellectthe best affections of her heart. But her
mother's beauty had been her only dower; and when
disease came to her, the weakness of her mind
became
more distinct with fading loveliness. Alas!
that one who had received the precious gift of an
immortal
child, should ever neglect devotion to it, for
fond attentions to charms not half so beautiful as a
mother's love!
Yet, as Corinne gazed on her beautiful parent, no
longer restless with life, she trusted that the
weakness
she had mourned over would be most mercifully
dealt with in the great judgment court; for her
mother
had been a petted, darling child, and the sin of
selfish vanity must fall more heavily on other heads
than hers.
Until sunset, the orphan was busy round the dead,
who slept so peacefully. The old man made no sign
that he was moved by his bereavement, but sat with
his forehead upon his hand, as he always sat, and his
voice muttering, as it always muttered, dark words
against the virtue whose keeping had cast him from
his place of honour downdown to the wretched
fortunes
of that hour.
The beauty which he had sought with childish
eagerness to win, was like the loveliness of the child
whose purity had ruined him; and so it became
hateful
to him. Death upon that white brow could not
soften him, for the armour of his soul was of the steel
of selfishness; and no dart but that which would
destroy
his own mortal nature could pierce it.
Corinne had finished the duties which are called
sadshe had shrouded the still waving lines of
beauty in the last robewhen a knock startled her.
It was a strange sound in that dull place, and Corinne
hastened to answer it as speedily as if it had been the
voice of an angel visitant, whispering Let Hope
in!
There was no angel visiter upon the threshold as
she opened the door; but Hope
did
come in. A gift
was handed herher, the lonely, the uncared-for!
A New Year's gift! of a valuable Italian work,
elegantly
bound, A tribute from a friend, who
respected
talent and great fidelity. And the note
which accompanied ithow kind, how
loving:
full
of warm interest in her history, hinting at present
necessity of the writer's remaining unknown to her;
but breathing throughout a half-veiled passion, very
like a lover's.
The old man had raised his head anxiously at the
sight of the unexpected package; but had bent it
again, with something like a groan, as a richly
ornamented
book alone repaid him for the effort. He
thought it might be gold.
Oh! it
was
gold to one poor heart there! It was
a voice from a human soula bright link thrown to
her from the social chain, binding her anew to the
outer world. It was a gleam of light dancing through
all the dark chambers of her soul, giving her new life
even in that visiting-place of death. It was true, that
she had on that New Year's day lost all sympathy of
blood with the race her mother sprung from; but the
long-chilled current of heart had been warmed, and
began to flow, as the youthful tide ever should. The
icy crust at the fountain head of joy gave way at
the warm touch of friendliness. Even her eye was
moistened with the sweet waters, so refreshing to her
thirsty soul.
And when she sat down by her mother's bed again,
she almost trembled at the power a new hope had
over her; she almost saddened again, in believing she
was cruel to her mother's memory, in filling her place
so soon with a new image.
But her parent had been dead to her for months;
and the joy of being thought of, loved, had been born
to her since the sun rose. We cannot wonder that
the day of festival did not end in such tears as it had
opened with.
Passionate, gifted, spiritual Corinne Gietti, gave
the rich treasure of her unshared thoughts to the
author
of the earnest note lying now close to her heart;
and that New Year's evening, by the departed,
remained
for ever clear in the young girl's memory
when time and happiness had faded the impressions
of her other lonely hours.
My poor, poor Karl! What gladness can all this
wealth and brightness give me, when my only son,
my darling boy, is losing all his nobleness in the love
of wine?
Was there any cause for sorrow on this New Year's
evening in the rich dwelling of Peter Van Schenck?
Was the heart of a millionaire troubled as one crushed
by poverty?
Brilliant were the rooms, and gay the meeting of
young friends, in this mansion of a father grieving
for his first born. The New Year's tables were
loaded with delicate confections; the fanciful Chinese
and antique stands were burdened with costly gifts;
dazzling light fell all around, illuminating curtained
recesses, rich in cunning bijouterie; and music
was there, with flowers, smiles, and their mother
Hope.
But a
shadow
was there; and although the blaze
of light might fall directly on that father's brow, it
could not take the shadow off. And though the
mother's
eye sparkled sometimes at one joy left, the light
2B2
could not put out the glimmering of a tear, which
trembled on the lashes, dropping often and heavily
upon the cheek. And, although the sister shone a
gem of beauty beneath the brilliant ray, it could not
pierce the inner temple, where lay the ruins of strong
affections, and gild them joyfully.
A son, an only sona brother, an only brother
with a warm heart, and intellect refined by a
student's
life, had given idolizing friends a taste of sorrow
more bitter than that the death-call brings. For many
years, young Karl Van Schenck had loved the
wine-cup
better than the peace of hearts; and on this
annual
festival had ever returned at a late hour, and
with a polluted brow, to his aristocratic home. The
anxious ear of father, mother, sister, had ever caught
his well-known sound of the uneven step, as it
approached
their door, and listened, as it slowly,
stumblingly
passed over the stairs which led to the erring
one's room. The New Year's night was sure to
bring the trembling form, the wandering eye; for the
many calls during the exciting day brought many a
draught of poison to Karl's lips.
Oh! away with this red snare of wine, which evil
lurks in, because it cannot linger amid the fruits and
flowers which innocence loves so well! Let it no
longer fascinate, with its glowing eye and biting
tongue, the sons and brothers, who pass from house
to house with the New Year's congratulations! Let
Nature's unpolluted gifts, the varied confectionary
of ingenious Art, and the cheering contents of the
smoking urn, be enough of hospitality, without the
luxury which a mistaken generosity offers too easily
excited lips!
But what light stronger than the brightness of that
artificial daywhat joy greater than the youthful
hope upon the faces of that gay companyhas cast
suddenly away the shadow from the father's brow
has quenched the tear in the mother's eyehas
gilded the ruins in the sister's heart? Nothing more
bright than the presence of a young man, who,
presenting
a beautiful boquet to Kate Van Schenck,
kissed her cheek lovingly.
It was the sonthe brother! His eye was clear,
his fine form erect, his hand firm and warm, as he
grasped his sister's, with an emphasis that had a
world of meaning in it. He met his mother's eye
with the consciousness of its joyful wonder glowing
in his face; and sought her side, after due attention
to his sister's guests, with the fervour of a prodigal.
He had a gift for both his parents; but what were
gifts compared to his dear presence, as he stood there
in manly beauty, with reason unwaveringwith
intellect
unquenched by wine? And oh! how merrily
to them now passed the hours! All was shadowless,
now that the light of Karl's clear eye fell upon the
scene.
A gleam of joy had come to the rich dwelling,
while the beautiful watcher by the untroubled couch
dreamed of new life.
That night, a strong man bent his knee for the first
time before the throne, and asked for strength to
overcome
a foe. It was Karl Van Schenck, sanctifying
by earnest prayer his vow of reformation.
'Twas New Year's evening again. Twelve months
had passed since Hope had sent her angles to the
poor dwelling of Corinne, and the young Karl's
luxuriant
home. The lowly room was desolate now; but
again the rich mansion of Peter Van Schenck was
dazzling with lightagain a gay company was
assembled
in the spacious rooms. But the rooms were
crowded now, and more lavishly adorned with the
rare embroidery of flowers. Jewels flashed, feathers
kissed snowy necks, rich dresses added grace to lovely
forms. All was life, all flutter, all animation. It was
a bridal! Whose?
Who was the bride? The very beautiful, whose
romantic story was on all lips? Who was it, that
bore herself so gracefully, so nobly, before a
multitude
of eyes? What made all hearts acknowledge
there was worth enough under that gifted brow to
equal rank; and wonder not, that the passionate love
of such a creature had won a victim from
fast-strengthening
chains?
It was Corinne!Corinne, the lonely orphan girl!
who stood now by the side of Karl Van Schenck,
the wife, the idol of his soul! It was Corinne! raised
from the darkness of her low home to this brilliancy of
fashion and wealth! Corinne! the dreaming watcher
the labourer for breadnow petted by a happy
familynow the object of such love as she had longed
for in heavily-burdened hours!
And never was there a happier bridal; never was
there a lovelier bride known in the proud circle in
which the Van Schencks moved. Even the old man,
whose shadow had been upon the hearth so long,
caught the admiration of the crowd; and made
himself
useful now in telling how wealthy he had been!
and ennobling his beautiful step-daughter's purity by
giving it as the cause of their changed fortunes. The
old man's heart was softened wonderfully by the
homage Corinne was now the object of.
But how came this all about?
One little year ago, and the unknown friend sent
his first token of interestay,
love
to the young
foreigner
.
One little year ago, that affection was first
acknowledged, which had the power to raise the lover
from the downward way to the glorious height of
temperance and prayer. It had proved a more
persuasive
guide than filial or fraternal love; and led
him to his home a changeda liberated man. All
unconsciously Beauty and Genius in Obscurity had
brought light and joy to high places clouded by grief.
Karl had first seen Corinne in the office of the
publisher, who accepted her articles to his own profit
more than hers. Struck by her peculiar beauty, he
had sought all means to know her history, watching
her secretly in her regular visits to the publisher,
(the only visits she seemed to make,) and
strengthening
at every sight of her the interest which had
been awakened in his heart.
He read her eloquent appeals to the wayward, the
sinning, the uncharitable of the earth, with
wondering
39
admiration and delight. But just before that
memorable New Year's day, he had been touched to
his very soul by one of her womanly defences of the
weak and erring, in which she had declared she
would sooner trust the being whose leading passion
was the love of wine, than one whose spirit had
untruth
for its foundationwho steeped his words in
sweet deceit, and smoothed his brow with falsehood.
There was no hope where beautiful Truth was not
permitted to be a guest; but the strong draught did
not always or speedily drown the noble sentiments of
the soul.
Karl felt that she was rightthat notwithstanding
his years of weakness, the heavenly whisperers were
not all hushedthat the refinement of his mind was
not yet made gross by the companionship of those
who spurned all moralities. There was hope for him;
and on the morning of that first New Year, he
earnestly
resolved to keep his lip from touching the glass,
which might be offered to him during his many calls.
When evening came, his lip was pure of the red
stain; and with a hopeful heart he sent his first
offering
to the gentle girl whose image had strengthened
him.
Corinne was too holy in her loneliness and trials
for him to bring shame or sorrow to her, and Karl
determined to make her his own wedded wife, if he
could win her, after a trial of his vow of temperance
for half a year.
He still remained unknown; but the solitary
Italian
constantly received some earnest token that the
one heart in the gay outer world still beat warmly for
hersoon would pray for a gift coveted beyond all
things else. He
must
have intercourse with her thus
to keep his spirit strong.
The six months passed away, and the unknown,
treasured so faithfully in fancy, had not long to wait
for the devoted girl's declaration that she was indeed,
in her loneliness,
all
his own. Her proud spirit
could not brook, however, the contempt or
condescension
she might reasonably expect from the wealthy
family she must enter, if she wedded Karl; and it
was not until the loving Kate warmly claimed her as
sister, and the parents of her lover blessed her for
the joy she had brought their aching hearts, that she
was convinced her dower of purity was more costly
in their eyes than lands or gold.
Corinne would wait until the anniversary of the
day so memorable to her, before she gave her hand to
Karl, and so on New Year's night she became a bride.
Her husband always blessed her, and turned not back
from the upward and onward way she had pointed
out.
Oh! let not the lowly and the gifted, sorrow that
they act no part in the world's history! Some
pitying
,
softening word, dropped on man's heart, may
melt it to good deeds, giving new music to the spirit
of some loving one, and a new song to angels.
THE DRUNKARD'S DEATH.
By Charles Diokens
.
We
will be bold to say, that there is scarcely a
man in the constant habit of walking, day after day,
through any of the crowded thoroughfares of London,
who cannot recollect, among the people whom he
knows by sight, to use a familiar phrase, some
being of abject and wretched appearance, whom he
remembers to have seen in a very different condition;
whom he has observed sinking lower and lower by
almost imperceptible degrees, and the shabbiness and
utter destitution of whose appearance, at last, strike
forcibly and painfully upon him, as he passes by.
Is there any man, who has mixed much with society,
or whose avocations have caused him to mingle, at
one time or other, with a great number of people, who
cannot call to mind the time when some shabby,
miserable wretch, in rags and filth, who shuffles
past him now in all the squalor of disease and poverty,
was a respectable tradesman, or a clerk, or a man
following
some thriving pursuit, with good prospects,
and decent means?or cannot any of our readers call
to mind from among the list of their
quondam
acquaintance
,
some fallen and degraded man, who
lingers
about the pavement in hungry miseryfrom
whom every one turns coldly away, and who
preserves
himself from sheer starvation, nobody knows
how? Alas! such cases are of too frequent
occurrence
to be rare items in any man's experience; and
but too often arise from one causedrunkenness,
that fierce rage for the slow, sure poison, that
over-steps
every other consideration; that casts aside wife,
children, friends, happiness, and station; and hurries
its victims madly on to degradation and death.
Some of these men have been impelled by
misfortune
and misery, to the vice that has degraded them.
The ruin of worldly expectations, the death of those
they loved, the sorrow that slowly consumes, but will
not break the heart, has driven them wild; and they
present the hideous spectacle of madmen, slowly
dying by their own hands. But, by far the greater
part have wilfully, and with open eyes, plunged into
the gulf from which the man who once enters it never
rises more, but into which he sinks deeper and
deeper down, until recovery is hopeless.
Such a man as this once stood by the bedside of
his dying wife, while his children knelt around, and
mingled low bursts of grief with their innocent
prayers. The room was scantily and meanly
furnished
;
and it needed but a glance at the pale form
from which the light of life was fast passing away, to
know that grief, and want, and anxious care, had
been busy at the heart for many a weary year. An
elderly female, with her face bathed in tears, was
supporting
2C
the head of the dying womanher daughter
on her arm. But it was not towards her that the
wan face turned; it was not her hand that the cold
and trembling fingers clasped; they pressed the
husband's
arm; the eyes, so soon to be closed in death,
rested on his face, and the man shook beneath their
gaze. His dress was slovenly and disordered, his
face inflamed, his eyes bloodshot and heavy. He had
been summoned from some wild debauch to the bed
of sorrow and death.
A shaded lamp by the bedside cast a dim light on
the figures around, and left the remainder of the room
in thick, deep shadow. The silence of night
prevailed
without the house, and the stillness of death
was in the chamber. A watch hung over the
mantelshelf
;
its low ticking was the only sound that broke
the profound quiet, but it was a solemn one, for well
they knew, who heard it, that before it had recorded
the passing of another hour, it would beat the knell
of a departed spirit.
It is a dreadful thing to wait and watch for the
approach
of death; to know that hope is gone, and
recovery
impossible; and to sit and count the dreary
hours through long, long nightssuch nights as only
watchers by the bed of sickness know. It chills the
blood to hear the dearest secrets of the heart, the
pent-up, hidden secrets of many years, poured forth
by the unconscious, helpless being before you; and
to think how little the reserve and cunning of a whole
life will avail, when fever and delirium tear off the
mask at last. Strange tales have been told in the
wanderings of dying men; tales so full of guilt and
crime, that those who stood by the sick person's
couch have fled in horror and affright, lest they
should be scared to madness by what they heard and
saw; and many a wretch has died alone, raving of
deeds, the very name of which has driven the boldest
man away.
But no such ravings were to be heard at the
bed-side
by which the children knelt. Their half-stifled
sobs and moanings alone broke the silence of the
lonely chamber. And when at last the mother's grasp
relaxed, and turning one look from the children to
their father, she vainly strove to speak, and fell
backward
on the pillow, all was so calm and tranquil that
she seemed to sink to sleep. They leaned over her;
they called upon her name, softly at first, and then in
the loud and piercing tones of desperation. But there
was no reply. They listened for her breath, but no
sound came. They felt for the palpitation of the
heart, but no faint throb responded to the touch.
That heart was broken, and she was dead!
The husband sunk into a chair by the bedside, and
clasped his hands upon his burning forehead. He
gazed from child to child, but when a weeping eye
met his, he quailed beneath its look. No word of
comfort was whispered in his ear, no look of kindness
lighted on his face. All shrunk from, and avoided
him; and when at last he staggered from the room,
no one sought to follow, or console the widower.
The time had been, when many a friend would
have crowded round him in his affliction, and many
a heartfelt condolence would have met him in his
grief. Where were they now? One by one, friends,
relations, the commonest acquaintance, even, had
fallen off from, and deserted the drunkard. His wife
alone had clung to him in good and evil, in sickness
and poverty. And how had he rewarded her? He
had reeled from the tavern to her bedside, in time to
see her die!
He rushed from the house, and walked swiftly
through the streets. Remorse, fear, shame, all
crowded
on his mind. Stupified with drink, and
bewildered
with the scene he had just witnessed, he
reentered
the tavern he had quitted shortly before.
Glass succeeded glass. His blood mounted, and his
brain whirled round. Death! Every one must die,
and why not
she
? She was too good for him; her
relations had often told him so. Curses on them!
Had they not deserted her, and left her to whine away
the time at home? Well; she was dead, and happy,
perhaps. It was better as it was. Another glass
one morehurrah! It was a merry life while it
lasted; and he would make the most of it.
Time went on; the three children who were left to
him, grew up, and were children no longer;the
father remained the samepoorer, shabbier, and more
dissolute-looking, but the same confirmed and
irreclaimable
drunkard. The boys had, long ago, run
wild in the streets, and left him; the girl alone
remained
,
but she worked hard, and words or blows
could always procure him something for the tavern. So
he went on in the old course, and a merry life he led.
One night, as early as ten o'clockfor the girl had
been sick for many days, and there was, consequently,
little to spend at the public househe bent his steps
homewards, bethinking himself that if he would have
her able to earn money, it would be as well to apply
to the parish surgeon, or, at all events, to take the
trouble of inquiring what ailed her, which he had not
yet thought it worth while to do. It was a wet
December
night; the wind blew piercing cold, and the
rain poured heavily down. He begged a few
half-pence
from a passer-by, and having bought a small
loaf (for it was his interest to keep the girl alive, if he
could) he shuffled onwards, as fast as the wind and
rain would let him.
At the back of Fleet street, and lying between it
and the water-side, are several mean and narrow
courts, which form a portion of Whitefriars; it was
to one of these that he directed his steps.
The alley into which he turned, might, for filth
and misery, have competed with the darkest corner
of this ancient sanctuary in its dirtiest and most
lawless
time. The houses, varying from two stories in
height to four, were stained with every indescribable
hue that long exposure to the weather, damp, and
rottenness can impart to tenements composed
originally
of the roughest and coarsest materials. The
windows were patched with paper, and stuffed with
the foulest rags; the doors were falling from their
hinges; poles with lines on which to dry clothes
projected from every casement, and sounds of
quarrelling
or drunkenness issued from every room.
2C2
The solitary oil lamp in the centre of the court had
been blown out, either by the violence of the wind
or the act of some inhabitant who had excellent
reasons
for objecting to his residence being rendered too
conspicuous; and the only light which fell upon the
broken and uneven pavement, was derived from the
miserable candles that here and there twinkled in the
rooms of such of the more fortunate residents as could
afford to indulge in so expensive a luxury. A gutter
ran down the centre of the alleyall the sluggish
odours of which had been called forth by the rain;
and, as the wind whistled through the old houses,
the doors and shutters creaked upon their hinges, and
the windows shook in their frames, with a violence
which every moment seemed to threaten the
destruction
of the whole place.
The man whom we have followed into this den,
walked on in the darkness, sometimes stumbling into
the main gutter, and at others, into some branch
repositories
of garbage which had been formed by the
rain, until he reached the last house in the court.
The door, or rather what was left of it, stood ajar, for
the convenience of the numerous lodgers; and he
proceeded to grope his way up the old and broken
stair, to the attic story.
He was within a step or two of his room door, when
it opened, and a girl, whose miserable and emaciated
appearance was only to be equalled by that of the
candle which she shaded with her hand, peeped
anxiously
out.
Is that you, father? said the girl.
Who else should it be? replied the man gruffly.
What are you trembling at? It's little enough that
I've had to drink to-day for there's no drink without
money, and no money without work. What the
devil's the matter with the girl?
I am not well, fathernot at all well, said the
girl, bursting into tears.
Ah! replied the man, in the tone of a person
who is compelled to admit a very unpleasant fact, to
which he would rather remain blind, if he could.
You must get better some how, for we must have
money. You must go to the parish doctor, and make
him give you some medicine. They're paid for it,
damn 'em. What are you standing before the door
for? Let me come in can't you?
Father, whispered the girl, shutting the door
behind her, and placing herself before it, William
has come back.
Who? said the man with a start.
Hush, replied the girl, William; brother
William
.
And what does he want? said the man, with an
effort at composuremoney? meat? drink? He's
come to the wrong shop for that, if he does. Give
me the candlegive me the candle, foolI ain't
going to hurt him. He snatched the candle from
her hand, and walked into the room.
Sitting on an old box, with his head resting on his
hand, and his eyes fixed on a wretched cinder fire
that was smouldering on the hearth, was a young
man of about two-and-twenty, miserably clad in an
old coarse jacket and trousers. He started up when
his father entered.
Fasten the door, Mary, said the young man
hastilyFasten the door. You look as if you
didn't know me, father. It's long enough since you
drove me from home: you may well forget me.
And what do you want here, now? said the
father, seating himself on a stool, on the other side of
the fireplace. What do you want here now?
Shelter, replied the son, I'm in trouble: that's
enough. If I'm caught I shall swing: that's certain.
Caught I shall be, unless I stop here; that's
as
certain.
And there's an end of it.
You mean to say, you've been robbing, or
murdering
,
then? said the father.
Yes, I do, replied the son. Does it surprise
you, father? He looked steadily in the man's face,
but he withdrew his eyes, and bent them on the
ground.
Where's your brothers? he said, after a long
pause.
Where they'll never trouble you, replied his
son. John's gone to America, and Henry's dead.
Dead! said the father, with a shudder, which
even he could not repress.
Dead, replied the young man. He died in my
armsshot like a dog, by a gamekeeper. He
staggered
back, I caught him, and his blood trickled down
my hands. It poured out from his side like water.
He was weak, and it blinded him, but he threw
himself
down on his knees, on the grass, and prayed to
God, that if his mother was in heaven, He would hear
her prayers for pardon for her youngest son. `I was
her favourite boy, Will,' he said, `and I am glad to
think, now, that when she was dying, though I was
a very young child then, and my little heart was
almost bursting, I knelt down at the foot of the bed,
and thanked God for having made me so fond of her
as to have never once done any thing to bring the
tears into her eyes. Oh, Will, why was she taken
away, and father left!' There's his dying words,
father, said the young man; make the best you
can of 'em. You struck him across the face, in a
drunken fit, the morning we ran away; and here's
the end of it.
The girl wept aloud; and the father, sinking his
head upon his knees, rocked himself to and fro.
If I am taken, said the young man, I shall be
carried back into the country, and hung for that man's
murder. They cannot trace me here without your
assistance, father. For aught I know, you may give
me up to justice; but unless you do, here I stop until
I can venture to escape abroad.
For two whole days, all three remained in the
wretched room, without stirring out. On the third
evening, however, the girl was worse than she had
been yet, and the few scraps of food they had were
gone. It was indispensably necessary that somebody
should go out; and, as the girl was too weak and ill,
the father went, just at nightfall.
He got some medicine for the girl, and a trifle in
the way of pecuniary assistance. On his way back,
he earned sixpence by holding a horse; and he turned
homewards with enough money to supply their most
pressing wants for two or three days to come. He had
to pass the public house. He lingered for an instant,
walked past it, turned back again, lingered once
more, and finally slunk in. Two men whom he had
not observed, were on the watch. They were on the
point of giving up their search in despair, when his
loitering attracted their attention; and when he
entered
the public house they followed him.
You'll drink with me, master, said one of them,
proffering him a glass of liquor.
And me too, said the other, replenishing the
glass as soon as it was drained of its contents.
The man thought of his hungry children, and his
son's danger. But they were nothing to the
drunkard
.
He
did
drink, and his reason left him.
A wet night, Warden, whispered one of the men
in his ear, as he at length turned to go way, after
spending in liquor one-half of the money on which,
perhaps, his daughter's life depended.
The right sort of night for our friends, in hiding
Master Warden, whispered the other.
Sit down here, said the one who had spoken
first, drawing him into a corner. We have been
looking arter the young un. We came to tell him
it's all right, now, but we couldn't find him 'cause
we hadn't got the precise direction. But that ain't
strange, for I don't think he know'd it himself, when
he come to London, did he?
No he didn't, replied the father.
The two men exchanged glances.
There's a vessel down at the docks, to sail at
midnight, when it's high water, resumed the first
speaker, and we'll put him on board. His passage
is taken in another name, and what's better than that,
it's paid for. It's lucky we met you.
Very, said the second.
Capital luck, said the first, with a wink to his
companion.
Great, replied the second, with a slight nod of
intelligence.
Another glass here; quick! said the first speaker.
And in five minutes more, the father had
unconsciously
yielded up his own son into the hangman's
hands.
Slowly and heavily the time dragged along as the
brother and sister, in their miserable hiding-place
listened in anxious suspense to the slightest sound.
At length a heavy footstep was heard upon the stair;
it approached nearer; it reached the landing, and the
father staggered into the room.
The girl saw that he was intoxicated, and advanced
with the candle in her hand to meet him; she stopped
short, gave a loud scream, and fell senseless on the
ground. She had caught sight of the shadow of a
man reflected on the floor. They both rushed in,
and in another instant the young man was a prisoner,
and handcuffed.
Very quietly done, said one of the men to his
companion, thanks to the old man. Lift up the
girl, Tomcome, come, come, it's no use crying,
young woman. It's all over now, and can't be
helped.
The young man stooped for an instant over the
girl, and then turned fiercely round upon his father,
who had reeled against the wall, and was gazing on
the group with drunken stupidity.
Listen to me, father, he said, in a tone that made
the drunkard's flesh creep. My brother's blood,
and mine, is on your head; I never had a kind look,
or word, or care from you, and alive or dead, I never
will forgive you. Die when you will, or how, I will
be with you, I speak as a dead man now, and I warn
you, father, that as surely as you must one day stand
before your Maker, so surely shall your children be
there, hand in hand, to cry for judgment against
you. He raised his manacled hands in a threatening
attitude, fixed his eyes on his shrinking parent, and
slowly left the room; and neither father nor sister
ever beheld him more, on this side of the grave.
When the dim and misty light of a winter's
morning
penetrated into the narrow court, and struggled
through the begrimed window of the wretched room,
Warden awoke from his heavy sleep, and found
himself
alone. He rose and looked around him; the old
flock mattrass on the floor was undisturbed; every
thing was just as he remembered to have seen it last:
there were no signs of any one, save himself, having
occupied the room during the night. He inquired
of the other lodgers, and of the neighbours; but his
daughter had not been seen or heard of. He
rambled
through the streets, and scrutinized each wretched
face among the crowds that thronged them, with
anxious eyes. But his search was fruitless, and he
returned to his garret when night came on, desolate
and weary.
For many days he occupied himself in the same
manner, but no trace of his daughter did he meet
with, and no word of her reached his ears. At length
he gave up the pursuit as hopeless. He had long
thought of the probability of her leaving him, and
endeavouring to gain her bread in quiet, elsewhere.
She had left him at last to starve alone. He ground
his teeth, and cursed her!
He begged his bread from door to door. Every
halfpenny he could wring from the pity or credulity
of those to whom he addressed himself, was spent in
the old way. A year passed over his head; the roof
of a jail was the only one that had sheltered him for
many months. He slept under archways, and in
brick-fieldsany where, where there was some
warmth and shelter from the cold and rain. But in
the last stage of poverty, disease, and houseless want,
he was a drunkard still.
At last, one bitter night, he sunk down on a
door-step
faint and ill. The premature decay of vice and
profligacy had worn him to the bone. His cheeks
were hollow and livid, his eyes were sunken, and
their sight was dim. His legs trembled beneath his
weight, and a cold shiver ran through every limb.
And now the long-forgotten scenes of a misspent
life crowded thick and fast upon him. He thought
of the time when he had a homea happy, cheerful
homeand of those who peopled it, and flocked about
him then, until the forms of his elder children seemed
to rise from the grave, and stand about himso plain,
so clear, and so distinct they were that he could touch
and feel them. Looks that he had long forgotten
were fixed upon him once more; voices long since
hushed in death sounded in his ears like the music
of village bells. But it was only for an instant. The
rain beat heavily upon him; and cold and hunger
were gnawing at his heart again.
He rose, and dragged his feeble limbs a few paces
further. The street was silent and empty; the few
passengers who passed by, at that late hour, hurried
quickly on, and his tremulous voice was lost in the
violence of the storm. Again that heavy chill struck
through his frame, and his blood seemed to stagnate
beneath it. He coiled himself up in a projecting
doorway, and tried to sleep.
But sleep had fled from his dull and glazed eyes.
His mind wandered strangely, but he was awake, and
conscious. The well known shout of drunken mirth
sounded in his ear, the glass was at his lips, the
board was covered with choice, rich foodthey were
before him; he could see them allhe had but to
reach out his hand and take themand, though the
illusion was reality itself, he knew that he was sitting
alone in the deserted street, watching the rain-drops
as they pattered on the stones; that death was
coming
upon him by inchesand that there were none
to care for or help him.
Suddenly, he started up, in the extremity of terror.
He had heard his own voice shouting in the night
air, he knew not what, or why. Hark! A groan!
another! His senses were leaving him; half-formed
and incoherent words burst from his lips, and his
hands sought to tear and lacerate his flesh. He was
going mad, and he shrieked for help till his voice
failed him.
He raised his head, and looked up the long, dismal
street. He recollected that outcasts like himself,
condemned to wander day and night in those
dreadful
streets, had sometimes gone distracted with their
own loneliness. He remembered to have heard many
years before that a homeless wretch had once been
found in a solitary corner; sharpening a rusty knife to
plunge into his own heart, preferring death to that
endless, weary, wandering to and fro. In an instant
his resolve was taken, his limbs received new life; he
ran quickly from the spot, and paused not for breath
until he reached the river-side.
He crept softly down the steep stone stairs that led
from the commencement of Waterloo bridge down to
the water's level. He crouched into a corner, and
held his breath as the patrol passed. Never did
prisoner's
heart throb with the hope of liberty and life
half so eagerly as did that of the wretched man at the
prospect of death. The watch passed close to him,
but he remained unobserved; and after waiting till
the sound of footsteps had died away in the distance,
he cautiously descended, and stood beneath the gloomy
arch that forms the landing-place from the river.
The tide was in, and the water flowed at his feet;
the rain had ceased, the wind was lulled, and all was,
for the moment, still and quietso quiet that the
slightest sound on the opposite bank, even the
rippling
of the water against the barges that were moored
there, was distinctly audible to his ear. The stream
stole lanquidly and sluggishly on. Strange and
fantastic
forms rose to the surface, and beckoned him to
approach; dark gleaming eyes peered from the
water, and seemed to mock his hesitation, while
hollow
murmurs from behind urged him onwards. He
retreated a few paces, took a short run, desperate
leap, and plunged into the river.
Not five seconds had passed when he rose to the
water's surfacebut what a change had taken place
in that short time, in all his thoughts and feelings!
Lifelife, in any form,poverty, misery, starvation
any thing but death. He fought and struggled
with the water that closed over his head, and screamed
in agonies of terror. The curse of his own son rang in
his ears. The shorebut one foot of dry groundhe
could almost touch the step. One hand's breadth
nearer, and he was savedbut the tide bore him
onward, under the dark arches of the bridge, and he
sank to the bottom.
Again he rose, and struggled for life. For one
instant
for
one brief instantthe buildings on the
river's banks, the lights on the bridge through which
the current had borne him, the black water, and the
fast flying clouds, were distinctly visibleonce more
he sunk, and once again he rose. Bright flames of
fire shot up from earth to heaven, and reeled before
his eyes, while the water thundered in his ears, and
stunned him with its furious roar.
A week afterwards the body was washed ashore,
some miles down the river, a swollen and disfigured
mass. Unrecognized and unpitied, it was borne to
the grave; and there it has long since mouldered
away.
THE PLEDGE BY MOONLIGHT.
By Amerel
.
There
are scenes of but a few hours' duration
which foreshadow a whole life; and sometimes words
spoken carelessly, and in jest, are an index to years
of future misery or pain.
One evening a small boat, containing six persons,
was descending the Delaware. It was an excursion
for pleasure; and amid the soft influence of a
summer's
moonlight evening, this partyyoung, gay, of
both sexes, and released, for a few hours, from the
cares of life, abandoned themselves to unrestrained
enjoyment. Many a merry song floated on the air,
as their boat glided on; and, at intervals, the wild
laugh of the heart which has thrown off its care, arose
while they listened to a story, or a well told
anecdote
.
Those usually timid or reserved felt at home;
and some of those choice spirits, who are the soul of
a social party, gave themselves to unrestrained
enjoyment
.
Give us another song, Mary, said one of them,
to the favourite songstress of the party. Dojust
one; something lively, and none of those that make
one feel as though he was in the land of darkness and
melancholy.
Urged by the others, she complied, and sang a song
of her own composing, beginning with the words,
Come, pledge me now thy hand and heart,
That changeless still through weal or woe, &c.
All applauded this song except her brother.
Feeling
mischievous, he said
Why, Maryafter all, this is a sad song. Every
note rings with the sad changes of life, among which
you wish us to pledge ourselves changeless. Give us
a really pleasant one.
I'll sing no more, answered his sister.
Dojust a little one.
Don't gratify him, said a young man, named
Rubicon If that song can't please him, none ever
will.
I like to hear about the changes of life, said
another young man.
The others laughed at this apparently silly
expression
;
but, without heeding their mirth, the speaker
leaned upon his arm at one end of the boat, and
continued
I don't believe in the philosophy which would
teach us to sigh because we are older to day than we
were yesterday; or, forsooth, that we do not dream
about fairy-land, as we did at sixteen. Go ahead,
without looking behind, is my motto. I'll pledge a
glass of wine with any one here, that ten years from
to-night, if living, I'll be wiser, more contented, and
wealthier than I am now, leaving losses by accidents
out of the question.
What do you call accidents? said Rubicon.
Fire, freshet, thieves, and such like.
Better include life itself among them, said
Mary's brother, named Morris.
That's no accident, replied the other. You
are always turning things into ridicule, Morris. But
permit me to explain. I say, that if allowed to
pursue
the even tenor of my way, for ten years, I will
be better, in all respects, than I am at present. Who'll
pledge with me?
All of us, exclaimed the group, delighted at so
novel a proposition.
Let's understand what we are going to do, Smith,
said Rubicon. Let each one wish for the greatest
good which he hopes to attain in ten years; and then
our pledge will be a kind of vow that we are resolved
to have it.
Agreed, agreed! exclaimed the others. Bring
out the wine. Glasses and decanters were soon
produced
.
Harriet must pledge first, said Morris, handing
her the wine.
I don't know what to say, exclaimed the girl,
holding the glass in her hand, and laughing.
Say any thingtell us what you wish to be ten
years hence.
Well, I wish I was a fairy.
There was a shout of merriment.
You are spilling the wine in my boots, Smith
said, dolefully.
Ha! ha! ha! laughed Morris. That's a fine
commencement for your project, Smith.
Come, pledge, Harriet; give us a sensible wish.
Haven't I? said the gay girl. I wish to be a
fairy ten years from this, and be no older than I am
now, and roam all day among sunshine and flowers,
and hear the little slave fairies singing round me, and
never have a shade of sorrow on my brow, and
That's enough, groaned Morris.
Is that your pledge? asked Smith.
To be sure it is.
It won't be realized.
I don't care.
Well, you're a curious girl. Let's hear Miss
Southey's wish.
She took the proffered glass, and, raising it to her
lips, said, I wish for wealth. I pledge to night for
future affluence.
I was thinking about that myself, Alice, said
Morris, laughing.
Now for Mary's wish! exclaimed Smith,
rubbing
his hands.
Excuse me, she said, with evident
embarrassment
;
I do not use wine.
Don't use wine! cried Rubicon. Why, what's
the matter, Mary?
Neither wine nor strong drink, replied her
brother
,
ever passes those pure lips. They are an
abomination to her. She's a Rechabite. It would
astonish you to hear her lecture against
tavern-keepers
and rum-drinkers.
I do not lecture, brother, Mary said.
But you will pledge with us? exclaimed Smith.
Without drinking?
If you prefer doing so.
Well, I wish to be happy.
We all wish that, Mary. Try again.
I wish we all may be happy.
That's the same wish, multiplied by six. Try
again.
There was a pause. The girl, still embarrassed,
appeared to be summoning courage for another effort.
In this interval, her brother leaned over to Smith, and
whispered, loud enough to be heard by all
You don't know how clear her intellect is when
she ain't on a
batter
.
Nonsense, Morris, said his companion. Do
quit your mischief.
I wish, said Mary, that we may all meet
together
at the end of ten years, and be as happy as we
are now.
Ha! ha! ha! shouted Morris. Ain't that a
bright thought! Can't leave the happy off, you see.
I think it's a very good wish, exclaimed
Rubicon
.
Smith said the same.
Now for our pledges, added the latter, offering
the glass to Rubicon.
I wish, said the young man, to become the
first in my profession. He was a lawyer.
And a seat in Congress? asked Morris.
That may be included.
I wish, said Morris, as the wine was offered to
him, that I may always be as merry as I am now.
And laugh at people as you do now? asked
Smith.
Certainly. That's part of the wish.
It's a very bad one, said Rubicon.
Do not wish that, brother, Mary said, laying her
hand on his shoulder.
Well, for your sake, Mary, I will leave the
laughing
out. Now Smith, for yoursit will be a grand
one, too.
I wish for success in business, he replied,
emptying
his glass.
2E
Why, that's the same as Rubicon's, only
substituting
merchant for lawyer.
It's the one I started with, replied Smith, and
the only one I intended to give. And now, as we are
all through, let us mark the wish, the day, and date,
in our journals when we get home, and look at it
every year, when the same day comes round.
A grand way to keep up old acquaintance,
answered
Rubicon.
Why have none of you wished for a good wife?
exclaimed Alice Southey.
Because we can get one without wishing,
replied
Morris. There was a faint laugh.
I wonder what the man in the moon would wish
if he saw us to-night, said Smith.
He would wish, answered Rubicon, that that
little party down there in the boat were not so deeply
under lunar influence.
I think he would wish, said Mary, that we
might not be disappointed in our wishes.
Such, in substance, is a portion of the conversation
with which the little party beguiled the time as their
boat floated down the Delaware. It may be trifling
or sillyand how often is the conversation of young
persons, during a whole evening, supremely silly
yet it at least originated in a solemn feelingthe
desire
prevalent in every one's bosom, to catch a glimpse
of the future, and, if possible, read concerning what
is still to befall him in life. And may we crave the
reader's indulgence while, in a few words, we tell
how the wish of each was accomplished?
The times of 1837 is an expression which, in
this country, conjures up to thousands of families,
spectacles of distress and ruin. During the four years
in which the great financial embarrassment continued,
merchants failed under heavy liabilities, professional
men were dismissed from office, wealthy men, of
long standing, became poor in a day, mechanics
roamed despairing from town to town, begging for
employment. Business and credit were equally
stagnated.
In the summer of 1840, during the great
presidential
canvass, which signalized that year, a small
steamboat
started from Philadelphia, having on board a
number of plainly dressed men, most of them
mechanics
.
Some held in their hands fishing lines, others
baskets, with various kinds of wares, and a few
carried
bundles of the daily papers. One man, who had
evidently seen better days, stood with his arms folded,
looking out upon the river. He spake at intervals
with a friend who sat beside him. After the boat had
been out about half an hour, he turned to the other
and said
Twelve years ago, while on a sailing party, in this
same spot, I wished for success in business.
And with every prospect of success? said his
friend.
Yes; I was sure of ittoo sure. And see what
I am to-day.
Other words of conversation followed. Two or three
men who sat near, overheard them, and appeared to
listen. Both the speakers resumed their silence, and
the boat moved on. At length the man who had
first spoken, passed to another quarter of the boat,
and, seating himself, began to arrange some fishing
tackle.
At that moment, a man, whose countenance
exhibited
fine intellectual features, though evidently
abused by indulgence in drinking, approached, and
sat down beside him.
Is your name Smith? inquired the stranger.
Yes, sir.
Mine is Rubicon.
The man dropped his lines. John Rubicon? he
inquired, with a wild expression of countenance.
Yes, replied the other, seizing the proffered hand.
I am one of those who pledged their wishes with
you, twelve years ago.
And is Morris still living? Smith asked.
No; he died miserably, in an almshouse.
Poor fellow! He was a merry soul. I loved to
hear his loud laugh, although he used to ridicule me.
Every body seemed to like him, although he joked at
the expense of all. What caused his death?
Drinking rum. He became so low as to associate
with the vilest loafers, and to lie all night in alleys
or gutters.
Poor Mary! answered Smith; it must grieve
her sadly.
It don't grieve her now, replied Rubicon. She
was buried four years ago. If there be any truth in
people dying with broken hearts, she died with one.
It was not her own fault, poor thing.
She was a sweet girl, said Smith, with a sigh.
So harmless, too. I used to think if any one was
ever sent to this world to make others happy, it was
she.
Do you remember her wish? asked Rubicon.
I remember it. It has not been accomplished.
What a wild girl Harriet was!
Yes; I remember, she wished to be a fairy. Do
you know what became of her?
She married a worthless sot. Her disposition, you
know, was not like Mary's. The two quarreled, and
at length parted. Harriet, herself, began to drink
hard. Indeed, she had always been too fond of wine.
She became a loathsome object, and at last died of
typhus feverso the physician said. I never heard
what became of her husband.
And do you know any thing about Alice
Southey?
A strange expression of mingled grief and remorse
passed over Rubicon's countenance. He paused,
hesitated, and turned pale. Smith almost
involuntarily
repeated his question.
She was my wife, George.
There was a silence of many minutes. Smith spoke
first.
So we two only are left of all that gay evening
party. Even we are changed, John.
I am, replied Rubicon, bitterly. For six years
I struggledstruggled manfully for eminence in my
profession. It was vain. All my plans and exertions
were frustrated. A viper had twined around my
existence
,
42 2E2
which paralyzed my arm, and poisoned my
hopes. It was the wine cup, Smith, the wine cup!
Ah! if I had wished to be delivered from it, and kept
my wish!
But you have reformed?
Do not mock me, Smith. To-day I have reformed,
and yesterday, because my last cent is gone. I could
tell you that would make you pity me.
And why don't you reform?
Ask the Delaware why it still flows onward.
Listen, my friend, said Smith. I, too, was a
drunkard, even to the last stage of drunkenness. I
felt in despair, as you do. One night I went to a
meeting of the Washingtonians. Many told how they
had reformed, and, at last, I know not how, I stepped
forward and signed the pledge. `Fool,' I said to my
self, as I went out, `you will break it to-morrow
morning
.'
I have kept it faithfully until this day. The
Washingtonians aided me to get work, and, until
lately, I made a comfortable living, even during these
hard times. Let me entreat you, Rubicon, to sign
the tee-total pledge. There is virtue in it.
It's useless, said the other, with a sigh. I
could never keep it.
His friend entreated; but the unhappy man, though
still alive to the finer feelings which had distinguished
him in a better day, shook his head sorrowfully. The
conversation lagged, and was dropped. At the first
stopping-place, Rubicon arose to leave the boat. He
shook hands with his former friends, spoke a few
words, and stepped ashore. As the boat pushed off,
Smith watched him slowly ascending the wharf, with
feeble and irregular step.
How strange the contrast between the gay
company
,
pledging their hopes by moonlight, and the
two poor wanderers, parting with each other on the
shores of the Delaware!
STEPS TO RUIN.
By Mrs Jane C. Campbell
.
Of
all the woe, and want, and wretchedness, which
awaken one's compassion; of all the scenes of misery
which call so loudly for sympathy, there is none that
so harrows up the feelings as the drunkard's home!
Look at him who began life with the love of friends,
the admiration of society, the prospect of extensive
usefulness; look at him in after years, when he has
learned to love the draught, which, we shudder while
we say it, reduces him to the level of a brute. Where
is now his usefulness? Where the admiration, where
the love that once were his? Love! none but the
love of a wife, or a child, can cling to him in his
degradation. Look at the woman who, when she
repeated
for better for worse, would have shrunk
with terror had the faintest shadow of the worse
fallen upon her young heart. Is that she who, on her
bridal day, was adorned with such neatness and taste?
Ah me! what a sad change! And the children, for
whom he thanked God at their birth; the little ones,
of whom he had been so proud, whom he had dandled
on his knees, and taught to lisp the endearing name
of father. See them trembling before him, and
endeavouring
to escape his violence! Look at the
empty basket, and the full bottlethe natural wants
of the body denied to satisfy the unnatural cravings
of a depraved appetite! Oh God, have pity upon the
drunkard's home!
The picture is a sad one; and who that looks upon
it but would fearfully turn aside from the first step
to ruin?
We, too, have a tale to tell, which, it pains us to
acknowledge, contains more truth than fiction.
James Boynton was the first born of his parents,
and a proud and happy mother was Mrs. Boynton,
when her friends gathered around her to look at her
pretty babe. Carefully was he tended, and all his
infantile winning ways were treasured as so many
proofs of his powers of endearment.
In wisdom has the Almighty hidden the deep
secrets
of futurity from mortal ken. When the mother
first folds her infant to her heart, could she look
through the long vista of years, and see the suffering,
the sin, the shame, which may be the portion of her
child, would she not ask God in mercy to take the
infant to himself? Would she not unrepiningly, nay,
thankfully, bear all the agony of seeing her little one,
with straightened limbs, folded hands, and shrouded
form, carried from her bosom to its baby-grave? And
yet, not one of all the thousands who are steeped in
wickedness and crime, but a mother's heart has
gladdened
when the soft eye first looked into hers, and
the soft cheek first nestled on her own. And, still
more awful thought! not one of all these Pariahs of
society but has an immortal soul; to save which, the
Son of God left his glory, and agonized upon the
cross!
James grew up a warm-hearted boy, and among his
young companions was a universal favourite. Jim
Boynton is too good-natured to refuse doing any thing
we ask, said Ned Granger one day to a
school-fellow
,
who feared that James would not join a party of
rather doubtful character, which was forming for what
they called a frolic. And this the truth. Here lay
the secret of James Boynton's weaknesshe was too
good-natured; for this very desirable, and truly
amiable quality, unless united with firmness of
character
,
is often productive of evil. But we pass over
his boyish life, and look at him in early manhood.
He had a fine figure, with a handsome, intelligent
countenance; and his manners have received their
tone and polish from a free intercourse in refined
circles. He passed his college examination with credit
to himself, but, from sheer indecision of character,
hesitated in choosing a profession. At this time, an
uncle, who resided at the South, was about retiring
from mercantile life, and he proposed that James
should enter with him as a junior partner, while he
would remain for a year or two to give his nephew
the benefit of his experience. The business was a
lucrative one, and the proposal was accepted.
James left his home at the North, and went to try
his fortune amid new scenes and new temptations.
His uncle received him warmly, for the old man had
no children of his own, and James was his godchild,
His uncle's position in society, and his own frank
and gentlemanly demeanour, won him ready access to
the hospitality of Southern friends, and it was not
long before he fell in love with a pretty orphan girl,
whom he frequently met at the house of a common
acquaintance. That the girl was portionless, was
no demerit in his uncle's eyes. Not all his
treasures
,
and they were large, had choked the avenues
of the old man's heart, and the young people were
made happy by his approval of their union.
After a visit to his friends in the North, James
returned
with his bride; and, in a modern house,
furnished
with every luxury, the happy pair began their
wedded life. And now, who so blessed as Boynton?
Three years passed away, and two children make
their home still brighter. Does no one see the cloud,
not bigger than a man's hand, upon the verge of the
moral horizon?
Boynton's dislike to saying no, when asked to
join a few male friends to dinner, or on a party of
pleasure; his very good nature, which made him so
desirable a companion, were the means of leading him
to the steps to ruin.
Come, Boynton, another glass.
Excuse me, my dear fellow, I have really taken
too much already.
Nonsense! It is the parting glass, you must
take it.
And Boynton, wanting firmness of character,
yielded to the voice of the tempter. Need we say
43 2F
that, with indulgence, the love of poison was
strengthened
?
For a while the unfortunate man strove to keep up
appearances. He was never seen during the day in
a state of intoxication; and from a doze on the sofa
in the evening, or a heavy lethargic sleep at night,
he would awake to converse with his friends, or
attend
at his counting-room, without his secret habit
being at all suspected.
But who that willingly dallies with temptation can
fortell the end? Who can lay the flattering unction
to his soul, that in a downward course he can stop
when he pleases, and, unharmed, retrace his steps?
Like the moth, circling nearer and nearer to the flame,
until the insect falls with scorched wing, a victim to
its own temerity, so will the pinions of the soul be
left scathed and drooping.
Soon Boynton began to neglect his business, and
was secretly pointed out as a man of intemperate
habits. At last he was shunned, shaken off, by the
very man who led him astray. Who are most guilty?
Let Heaven judge. Let us pause, and ask why it is,
that so many look upon a fellow being verging to the
brink of ruin, without speaking one persuasive word,
or doing one kindly act, to lead him back to virtue?
Why it is, that when fallen, they thrust him farther
down by taunting and contempt. Oh, such was not
the spirit of Him who came to seek and save that
which was lost, such was not the spirit of Him who
said, neither do I condemn thee; go and sin no more.
How often, instead of throwing the mantle of charity
over a brother's sin, instead of telling him his fault,
between thee and him alone, it is bared to the
light of day, trumpeted to a cold and censure-loving
world, until the victim either sinks into gloomy
despondency
,
and believes it hopeless for him to attempt
amendment, or else stands forth in bold defiance, and
rushes headlong to his ruin, not one human being
stands so perfect in his isolation, as to be wholly
unmoved
by contact with his fellows! what need then,
for the daily exercise of that godlike charity which
suffereth long and is kind, which rejoiceth not in
iniquity, which beareth all things, believeth all
things, endureth all things!
Seven years have gone with their records to
eternity
;
where is James Boynton now? In one room of
a miserable dilapidated tenement, inhabited by many
victims of poverty and vice, lives he who on his
wedding
day entered a home which taste and luxury
rendered
enviable. Squalor and discomfort are on every
side. His four children are pale and sickly from
want of proper food, and close confinement in that
deleterious atmosphere, they have learned to hide
away when they hear their father's footsteps, for, alas!
to his own, he is no longer the good-natured man.
Fallen in his own esteem, frequently the subject of
ribald mirth, his passions have become inflamed, and
he vents his ill-nature on his defenceless family. He
no longer makes even a show of doing something for
their support; and to keep them from starving, his
wife works whenever, and at whatever she can find
employment.
A few years more, and where is Mrs. Boynton?
Tremble ye who set an example to your families of
which you cannot foretell the consequences! Tremble
ye whom God has made to be the protectors, the
guides, the counsellors, of the woman ye have vowed
to love and cherish! Mrs. Boynton, like her husband
has fallen. In an evil hour, harassed by want,
ill-used
by her husband, she tasted the fatal cup. It
produced temporary forgetfulness, from which she
awoke to a sense of shame and anguish. Ah! she
had no mother, no sister, no women friends, who
truly cared for her, to warn, to plead, to admonish;
again was she tempted, again she tasted, and that
squalid home was rendered tenfold more wretched,
by the absence of all attempt at order. However
great may be the sorrow and distress occasioned by a
man's love of drink, it is not to be compared to the
deep wretchedness by the same cause in a woman,
and it is matter for thankfulness, that so few men
drag down their wives with them in their fall.
Providence raised up a friend who took the
bare-footed
children of the Boyntons from being the daily
witnesses of the evil habits of their parents; and so
dulled were all the finer feelings of nature, that
James Boynton parted from them without a struggle.
Like the Lacedemonians of old, who exposed the
vice to render it hateful in the eyes of the beholders,
we might give other and more harrowing scenes from
real life; but let this one suffice! Thank God, for the
change which public opinion has already wrought!
Thank God, for the efforts which have been made
to stay the moral pestilence! Oh, it is fearful to
think how many homes have been desolatehow
many hearts have been brokenhow many fine
minds have been ruinedhow many lofty intellects
have been humbled! It is fearful to think of the
madness
the
crimethe awful deathwhich follow the
Steps to Ruin!
29*
NED SUMMERS, THE CABIN-BY.
By Amerel
.
A LARGE vessel, gliding calmly upon the placid
waters of a southern sea, is a beautiful object; and
when those on board, gathered within a little world of
their own, associate in groups upon the deck, telling
tales of home, or gazing upon the waste of waters,
the picture seems too lovely and romantic for a scene
of real life.
The afternoon sun of a summer day, on the seas of
India, shone on such a scene. Captain Charles
Giddings, with a full crew and several passengers,
was returning from a voyage to Calcutta. The ship
scarcely moved upon the waters, and all the softness
of a tropical clime, pervaded the quiet air. Every
one was upon decksome reading, some leaning
over the ship's side, looking into the waters, some
collected in groups, talking or reclining silently on
couches. The captain, the first mate, and the
cabin-boy
were together, regulating the compass, which had
been injured by a fall. In an arm-chair, not far from
these three, sat the mate's daughter, a young woman
of nineteen, reading. Between this young lady and
the cabin-boy an intimacy had sprung up during the
voyage, which appeared in a fair way to ripen into a
feeling stronger than mere affection. This the father
had not discouraged, but, on the contrary, had often
been heard to say, that of all the young men whom
he knew, none was more esteemed by him than Ned
Summers, the cabin-boy.
This was the first time that Mary Harper, the
mate's daughter, had been at sea. The interests of
her mother's family had alone induced her to
undertake
it; for her only brother had been lost in a storm
some five years before; since which she had
entertained
an instinctive dread of the ocean. Her
unexpected
acquaintance with Ned had, however, tended
to modify this dread, and, in his company she forgot
the dangers of the watery element, or the memory of
frightful tales concerning storms and shipwrecks.
During the afternoon she had amused her companion
by reading from a collection of tales and poetry; and,
soon as he was relieved from the task of arranging
the compass, he again seated himself beside her on
a broken cask, and listened while she resumed a
half-finished
tale. They were interrupted by the tones
of some one singing.
Let us listen, said Mary, closing her book.
Ned would have rather heard her read the tale;
but as she arose, he joined her, and walked towards
the ring which the passengers had formed around
the singer.
I know that song, said Mary; brother and I
used to sing it together.
Ned turned towards her, and saw that a shade of
sorrow had gathered round her former playful
features
.
Wishing to change the conversation, he
replied
Let us listenhe is going to sing again.
I do not wish to hear any more, she answered,
turning away. Do you never feel afraid upon the
sea, Ned?
No, I do not. During more than four years I have
acted as cabin-boy; and now I am as much at home
in a ship as on land.
I wish I could say so, Mary answered; but I
am a foolish creature about water. I would die of
mere fright in a stormthat I know well. Besides,
Ned, something seems to tell me that this voyage
will not be a lucky one. Who knows but that after
coming so far to seek a fortune, I may find only a
grave?'
There was something so sad in these words that
Ned, for some moments, could not reply. But at last,
while a shade of sympathy passed over his rough
features, he answered
I am not afraid of that, Mary. What chance is
there of a storm, when the weather has been fine
for so many weeks? Even if there should be one,
our ship was never in better condition, nor our
officers
more vigilant.
But you told me yourself, Ned, that a storm is
always more violent after a long calm.
So I did, Mary; but He paused, and
looked at her in hesitation.
Well, never mind, Ned, she said; in a livelier
tone. I am timid and foolish, that I know; but as
you are a better sailor than I am, I will trust in your
skill.
Ned was about to reply, when the mate called him.
Mary resumed her seat in the chair, and occupied the
time in watching the operations of the crew. She
was interrupted by her father's voice.
Why, captain, the barometer is falling!
Falling, sir? replied Captain Giddings.
Yes, sirand rather rapidly, too.
I was afraid of it, whispered the captain, as he
approached. A storm has been gathering for
several
days, exactly as it did this time last year, while
we were bearing west from Java Let the boatswain
call all hands to duty.
In a moment every thing was in activity, where
formerly there was languid indifference. The
passengers
retired to the cabins, the sails were taken in,
and the rigging made fast and trim for weathering
the storm. As if by magic, the ship was divested of
its gallant appearance, and lay a motionless hull, with
bare spars, upon the still bosom of the ocean. There
was something sublime in the calmness with which
each man stood at his post, and, without speaking,
gazed over the waters for the coming of the hurricane.
How is the barometer now, sir? inquired the
captain.
Risen, slightly, replied the mate.
Well, don't let's wait for danger. And
by-the-by
,
a little brandy will do us no harm, whether the
storm comes or not. He walked towards his desk
as he spoke, and raising the lid, brought out a
decanter
.
Pouring out a glass full, he offered it to the
mate.
When sober, Captain Giddings was an able officer,
and a kind man; when intoxicated, he was obstinate,
passionate, and brutal. He could, however, indulge
moderately in drink, without its affecting materially
his disposition or his official skill; but, unfortunately,
after taking liquor, he often went beyond the bounds
of moderation, and became either helplessly, or
brutally drunk. The mate knew this well; and,
though he was himself addicted to drinking, he
recoiled
from the thought of indulging his appetite, on
the eve of a tropical storm. He respectfully declined
the proffered glass.
Nonsense! said the captain. You will feel
the want of it in a dashing sea.
Excuse me, captain, the mate replied. We
shall want clear heads if the storm is like the one we
had last year.
Then I suppose, said the captain, laughing, you
would advise me not to drink.
I would, sir, with all respect. There will be time
to drink to-morrow.
Well, mate, replied the captain, I don't know
what ails you; but as to myself, I have no fears of
the wildest storm that ever raged in the Indian sea.
This ship will weather itthat I feel certain of. So
here is to your health. As he spoke, he swallowed
the brandy.
Still the storm delayed. The men resumed their
gaiety, jesting with each other, or singing among the
shrouds. The cabin-boy found a spare moment to run
below deck; and from every face, save that of the
mate, the previous anxiety had departed. The
captain
emptied another glass of brandy. Then,
turning
to Ned, who had just returned to the deck, he
exclaimed
Ned, are you afraid of the storm?
No, indeed, sir, replied the cabin-boy. With our
good ship and our good captain, I think we may
brave it.
There! rejoined the captain, turning to the
mate, that's the language I like to hear from my
crew!
The mate nodded, without speaking; but in his
features was a shade of mortified dignity. Turning
to the cabin-boy, he whispered a few words in his
ear.
I don't know what ails her, sir, Ned replied in
a low tone. It worries me to hear her speak of her
brother, and then of the coming storm, as though
there was some connection between them. I tried to
comfort her, but couldn't.
We must do our duty to night, said the mate,
with a solemn voice.
Ned looked at him with astonishment. Neither of
them spoke again; but the impression of those few
words, whose meaning was deeper than their
utterance
,
remained with him throughout the night. The
captain swallowed another half-pint of brandy.
The storm still delayedall at once Captain
Giddings
exclaimed
What's the use in waiting so long for a blow!
Hoist the topsails!
Every one started.
For heaven's sake, not now, captain! said the
mate, touching his hat.
Sir! said the other, I am master of this vessel!
We have been waiting here like fools, for nearly
two hours, just because somebody bewitched the
barometer.
Let me entreat you
Hoist the topsails, I say!
Only delay one hour, sir, implored the mate.
The captain stamped his foot upon the deck, and,
with an oath, repeated the command. It was obeyed.
Now let the storm come! said the half drunken
man.
There was a deep pause. Old sailors cast ominous
looks towards the west, where the sun was just
setting
;
and the mate, folding his arms, walked
thoughtfully
backward and forward, with his eyes fixed upon
the deck. An oppressive stillness was in the air;
low, moaning sounds came, at times, across the
waters; and from the bank of clouds which lay piled
upon each other near the horizon, red hazy mists
shot up, which seemed to spread like a shroud of
blood over the whole face of the sky. The sea
seemed molten glass, and the ship was buoyed up
upon its surface.
But the storm was coming. Though the sun went
down in fire, the sky was rapidly disappearing behind
the clouds, and the air suddenly grew black as
midnight
.
Any one who has been in the Indian seas, or
even among the groups of the Western archipelago,
know what such changes portend. The mate, rousing
from his revery, cast one glance across the water, and
then hurried towards the captain.
For heaven's sake, captain, order the sails to be
handed!
Scarcely were the words uttered, when a rustling
sound, like that of a deep wood, stirred by the wind,
was heard. The mate clenched his hands with a
look of agony; and sailors who had grown gray
among the tropics, held their breath, and grasped
with convulsive energy a rope or a mast. In the
next moment, sails and rigging were whirled into the
clouds; and the ship, as though struck by a battery
of guns, went careering on over the waters, cracking
and starting at every seam. For a few moments all
was still. Then came another blast, tearing and
shrieking among the cordage; and before the men
could utter a cry of horror, a third one struck the
devoted ship, bearing away the main topmast, and
causing the mizen mast, to crack like the report of a
cannon. Every eye was raised, with an expression
of horror, towards the tottering spar. It swayed for an
instant, with the motion of the ship; but the next,
with a fearful crash, it came down over the vessel's
side. Then for the first time arose wailings of agony
as strong men, clenching still the ropes which had
deceived them, were hurried on through the foaming
waters.
During this scene the captain was hopelessly drunk.
His orders were of the most contradictory nature,
and he seemed to have lost all the clear-sighted skill
which distinguished him at other times. The sailors
soon perceived his condition. Every eye was
directed
towards the mate as a last resource. He
ventured
to assume the command. The hands obeyed
with alacrity; and very soon the broken mast had
been cut away, the other spars strengthened, and
every shred of sail removed.
But the storm had only commenced. As it gathered
darker and wilder around the devoted ship one after
another of the crew was swept away, and the masts
creaked fearfully while the hurricane swept by them.
Before nine o'clock, the rudder was broken, and the
vessel became unmanageable. Then the scene
became
a terrible one. The once gallant bark, with its
freight of human souls, rushing headlong before the
storm; the hoarse words of command; the shrieks
of some wretch, hurried from his post to a watery
grave; the din of voices from the cabin; the
cracking
of spars; the howlings of the stormrose amid
that night's gloom, like the revel of the spirits, who,
as is fabled, exult over the miseries of mankind.
But a wilder scene was to follow. Hitherto the
passengers had remained below. Now they rushed
together upon the deck, shrieking, wringing their
hands, and praying for help. Some were induced to
retire, but the remainder running from place to place
with frenzied gestures, mingled their cries for help
with the noise of the tempest. Sometimes a wave
broke over the deck and bore with it one of their
number; but the survivors merely crowded closer
together
,
thus rendering their own destruction more
easy. A few clasped the captain's knees and begged
him to save them; strong men seized a rope or a
spar, and clung to it with looks of despair; women
rolled helplessly over the heaving deck, or hung
shrieking round the forms of those they loved.
Over this uproar, a loud voice was heard,
The ship has sprung a leak!
All hands were called to the pumps. Men who
had been nursed in Oriental luxury, bared their arms,
and worked with the energy of life; even women at
times assisted. The mate moved from group to group
encouraging them by his voice and example. The
water in the hold decreased; and as a few trusty
hands endeavoured to repair the breach, the mate
exclaimed
in a voice of hope:
Work merrily, lads! If we can arrest the leak
all may go well, our ship is still strong!
They worked as men do, when they toil for life.
Amid the excitement of partial success, the noise of
the storm was for a while unheeded, and each seemed
inspired with new life. Suddenly a terrific crash
was heard; the ship pitched almost upon her larboard
side; and through the started planks came the surge,
like a cataract, flooding the hold, overthrowing and
stifling those nearest to it, and rendering all effort at
the pumps useless. Then, strong hearts, which had
braved all previous danger without shrinking, rushed
on deck, and flinging their arms towards heaven,
shrieked a prayer for mercy.
The mainmast had fallen.
Let down the boats! cried the mate.
The first boat was soon on the waves. Men and
women crowded into it, falling over each other, and
pushing weaker ones to a watery grave. Though it
was in a moment filled to suffocation, others held in
agony to the ropes, till rude hands flung away their
arms, and severing the cords, launched into the deep.
At that moment another voice arose.
We are among breakers!
It was so. The boat, with all its freight, was
sucked within the foaming vortex, spun round and
round, and sunk.
The ship has struck! shouted another.
Then arose once more the maddening cry of
despair
,
and each clutched, as he could, some fragment
which might buoy him on the waves, after the ship
should go down.
The life-boat! the life-boat! was now the cry, and
many rushed towards it.
And where, amid these scenes, was Mary
Harper
?
There are a few among the walks of life, who,
though usually weak and timid, yet, in the hour of
danger, display a calmness and heroism, which
appear
miraculous to persons of ordinary courage
Mary was one of these. She had dreaded the storm
before it approached; but when it was around her,
she heard, without shrieking, the wind, the falling
timbers, and the uproar on deck. Her thoughts were
on her father and on Ned. When the ship struck
the cabin-boy was by her side. His words could not
be heard amid the uproar, but he grasped her form
tightly with one arm, while with the other he held
to the remaining mast.
Come to the life-boat, she at length heard him
say.
They sprang forward. It was full, but some held
out their arms for the girl. She drew back, and
looked at Ned.
Cut the ropes! shouted those in the boat.
Go, Mary, said Ned, there is not room for
both.
30*
And must you stay here?
Do not think of me, Mary.Wait, oh, wait one
moment! he shouted to the men.
Mary turned away. I will stay with you, Ned,
she whispered, as the boat was hurried off. I am
not afraid to die!
By this time the ship was fast sinking. Those who
remained on board had lashed themselves to large
pieces of timber as their only chance for safety. The
mate, unable to find his daughter, and thinking that
both she and Ned had been cast away, seized a part
of the mainmast. The cabin-boy still held to Mary,
clasping her waist with one arm, and with his other
hand holding one of hers. For a little while, no voice
was heard. It was the silence of men, sternly
waiting
the approach of death.
A huge wave broke over the deck. Some went
with it into the ocean, others were thrown down, or
rolled over the sides, which they grasped and clung
to. Ned was thrown senseless against the stump of
one of the masts. When he arose, the wave had
passed. He called on the name of Mary, but she had
gone to mingle with the many who, during that
fearful
night, were called from health and happiness to a
grave in the ocean. Ignorant of her fate, he ran
wildly along the deck, calling upon her name, and
searching every part that the water had not flooded.
Then a stupor came over his feelings, his limbs
relaxed
their energy, and he sunk helplessly upon the
deck. The front part of the ship, on which Ned lay,
had become jammed among the rocks, and was, of
course, immoveable. It was repeatedly washed by
huge waves, but being protected by the rocks, did
not go to pieces. Before morning, the hinder portion
was broken off and swept away. Most of those who
had remained on board went with it. The mate was
among them. Three or four saved themselves by
being tied to spars; the rest perished.
And where, during this time, was the man whose
intemperate indulgence of his appetite had thus
trifled so fearfully with life?he who had engaged
to carry his vessel safely through the wildest storm
of the Indian seas. He had been struck by the
mainmast
in its fall, and knocked senseless into the sea.
Two days afterwards, Ned and five companions
were relieved by a vessel, bound for England from
Calcutta. He never resumed his occupation as
cabin-boy
afterwards. When the temperance movement
began
he engaged in it with his whole soul, and with an
enthusiasm which seemed almost like madness; he
laboured among those whose labours were among the
waters. One evening, at a temperance meeting, he
heard an aged man tell of a shipwreck in which he
had been a sufferer. Two of his children, the old
sailor said, had found watery graves, and in both
instances
because the captain had been intoxicated.
When, in continuing, he told that one of them had
been a daughter, the pride of the family, Ned sprang
to his feet.
Was her name Mary, sir? he exclaimed.
That was her name, said the old man.
Mary Harper?
Yes; my name is Harper.
And do you remember the cabin-boy, whom you
told to do his duty that night?
The old man trembled. There was excitement
among the spectators too intense and breathless for
utterance.
I am that cabin-boy, added Ned. And, sir, I
did do my duty. I stood by Mary till stunned by
the wave which bore her away. I would have plunged
after her, but there was no strength left me. Oh! it
is dreadful! dreadful! and he seemed again amid
the scene of that night's storm. I see no pleasure
now, he continued, turning to those around him;
my heart is cold and blighted, but I would live a little
longer, that I might behold this cause in which we
are engaged flourish, until none will be found to
oppose
it.
He rushed towards the speaker's stand, and before
he had relaxed the grasp of the old man's hand, many
had come forward and enrolled their names on the
temperance pledge.
THE EMIGRANTS WIFE.
By Amerel
.
Does
a woman, named Sandford, live in this
village
?
inquired a gentleman in one of the settlements
on the Illinois, of a backwoodsman of rather
suspicious
looking appearance.
Caddy Sandford, do you mean? The man
nodded
.
She lives in that little house on the other side of
the fence, said the backwoodsman pointing with his
finger. You'll see a drunken rascal when you get
there, if you see her husband.
The stranger thanked him and walked on. Scenes
rude and disgusting met his eye at every step. In
one place two men lay beside the road asleep and
drunk; a little further on a hunter was skinning a
live fox; and near an old shed, three or four men
were engaged in a fist fight. After a walk of ten
minutes, he reached the log-housea wretched one
and knocked at the door. A sickly looking woman,
with soiled and tattered garments, answered the
summons.
Is this Mrs. Sandford? he asked. The woman
nodded. I have something of importance to tell
you, he continued; and as she opened the door still
wider, he entered, and seated himself upon a chair.
The apartment bore the marks of extreme poverty.
Two or three chairs, old and broken, a pine table,
some earthen dishes, piled upon a box, and a heavy
oak bucket, were the principal household articles.
The floor was almost black, and in many places
charred
.
Two children were sitting in a corner playing
together, and a third crying for food.
Were you born in this settlement? said the man,
with a low voice and after an embarrassing pause.
No, sir; I came from the East.
Is your husband living? asked the stranger in the
same low tone.
He is living, the woman answered, as she
endeavoured
to still the cries of her youngest child.
I knew, said the stranger, a family named
Warren
that lived in Connecticut; one of its members
married a man named Sandford, who emigrated to the
West, about ten years since. If you are the person,
I have something important for you to hear.
I came from Hartford, Connecticut, at about the
time you speak of, the woman answered. My
father's name was James Warren, and I am his only
daughter.
I believe, I knew you there, said the stranger,
still in a low voice. The woman looked at him, with
a scrutinizing eye; and after a pause replied:
Perhaps I have forgotten you; yet, there is in
46 2H
your voice and features something which appears
familiar to me.
Caroline! said the man, rising suddenly, and
removing
his hat which he had kept on during the
conversation. The woman started and shrieked. It
was her brother.
We will not describe the scene that followed. It
was long before either the brother or sister recovered
from its effects, sufficiently to speak. Caroline at
length said
I thought you had all forgotten me, and I was
willing to die alone in this wild place. Oh brother,
it is too much to see one of you at last!
We did not forget you, Caroline, he said. There
has been many a tear shed over the memory of you
at home. We could obtain no tidings of you; for
we all supposed that Sandford had gone to Missouri,
as he promised to do. I have been there three times
to search for you.
And did father forgive me, for marrying against
his will? exclaimed the poor woman, sobbing, as
the recollection of former days came over her.
Do not doubt it, sister. There is not one of us,
who would not stretch out his arms to embrace you,
if you would return to Connecticut.
If I could see mother but once more she
sobbed
it
would make me forget the sad hours I have
spent here.
Are these all your children, sister? he inquired,
anxious to divert her attention from the remembrance
of her change of fortune. The woman nodded. He
raised the youngest onea little girlupon his knee,
and parted the long curls of its hair. Though its
cheeks were pale and thin, and its eyes swollen with
weeping, there was a regularity and softness in the
features, which reminded him of his sister's infancy.
This is the little niece I have never seen, he said,
patting its cheek with his hand, and endeavouring to
hide his emotion. The other two children left their
play, and stepped timidly towards their uncle. He
spake kindly to each, framing his words in such a
manner as to relieve his sister from the painful
feelings
which his unexpected visit had occasioned.
During this time he had not inquired about
Sandford
;
but the afternoon had not passed away before
that individual appeared. He was in a beastly state
of intoxication. Bursting into the room, he uttered
a volley of oaths, and swore vengance on his wife.
The youngest child ran to its mother, and the others,
hid themselves behind their uncle. The drunken
man, without heeding the stranger, advanced directly
towards his wife, and seizing her by the arm, had
already raised his hand to strike her, when her brother
sprang between them. The drunken man, startled
by a movement so unexpected, let go his hold, and
reeled backward against the wall. After several
efforts to regain his balance he succeeded, and again
advancing, muttered with an oath
Who are you?
I am one, that wishes you to sit down and be
quiet, Warren answered.
Do you want to fight? continued Sandford, with
2H2
that simple expression of countenance peculiar to the
intoxicated.
I want you to sit down, said the other.
I'll not sit down, shouted Sandford. Ain't this
my house?I can take care of myself without getting
drunk. He again reeled forward.
Let me lead you to that chair, Warren said,
laying his hand on the drunkard's arm.
Let go of me! growled Sandford. I ain't
drunknot I, she's my wife, I tell you that. I'll
blow up the house, he continued with a loud oath.
I'll tear you limb from limb; all the men in Illinois
can't hinder me. As he spoke, he shook off
Warren's
hand, and endeavoured to strike at his wife; but
the effort destroyed his equilibrium and he came
down heavily upon the floor. After several
ineffectual
efforts to rise, he in a short time fell asleep.
This is dreadful, Caroline! said the brother after
a pause. She looked at him without speaking.
And you have suffered so long, without letting us
know. he added.
O, brother, how could I tell you of it? she
exclaimed
,
weeping. It is my own faultI feel that
I deserve it all. I almost wish you had not come to
see what you have seen. Yet if you but knew the
misery, the days of sorrow and sickness I have
endured
,
you might pity me. And these my little ones,
it is they alone for whom I have wished to live.
But you will not remain here to suffer.
What else can I do, brotherwherever I go, he
will follow me.
You must go with me to Connecticut, replied
Warrenboth you and the children.
His sister shook her head. I could not endure
father's look, she said mournfully.
All is forgotten, Caroline, said her brother,
tenderly
.
It cannot be! she replied, in the same sad tone.
He could not forget how I disobeyed him. No, no,
brotherlet me remain and die here. I have not
many days to linger, she added, looking earnestly
upon him. That disease, which cannot be cured,
has fastened upon me; but oh! it will be consoling
even in death, to know that I may leave these little
ones to your care. You can take them with you,
brotherthey have no remembrance of disobedience
and shame, to weigh down the gloomy hours of
existence
.
Father, too, will be glad to see them, and
perhaps
,
when he hears them laughing round him, will
think sometimes of their poor mother.
Warren did not reply. There was a long pause,
broken only by the hard breathings of the drunken
man, and the sobbings of his wife. The evening
gradually wore away, and one after another the
children
came to their mother, crying for bread. Their
uncle took some food from his portmanteau, and
spread it before them. They clapped their hands,
and danced in childish joy, at sight of the full meal.
Eat, sister, said Warren, as he seated himself
beside her.
She raised a morsel to her lips, but again laid it
upon the table. He urged her, but in vain. She was
sick at heart. There was something touching in
that scene, of the brother, hundreds of miles from
home, feeding, with the bread of charity, the little
ones of her who, in early days, had been the
pride and hope of the family. It seemed a silent,
but powerful lecture on the consequences of
intemperance
.
For several weeks previous to Warren's arrival in
the village, Sandford had been on one of those ruinous
frolics, technically known as
batters
. After drinking
to excess in the tavern, he would lie under sheds or
hedges during the greater part of the day, and return
in the evening to abuse his wife. Under such
treatment
,
his constitution, already shattered, was fast
sinking; and for some days past, symptoms of the
mania began to appear in his conduct. On the night
of which we have spoken, as Warren and his sister
were conversing with each other, the drunken man
suddenly awoke under a violent paroxysm of this
horrible disease. Fortunately for the wife and her
brother, two or three hunters belonging to the village,
who knew Sandford, happened to be passing along,
from a night excursion after deer. Hearing the
noise, and fearing that he was abusing Mrs.
Sandford
or the children, they pushed open the door, and
entered. Glad of such opportune assistance, Warren
bade them welcome, stating, in a few words, his own
position. With much difficulty the drunken man
was secured, and the hunters, after taking some food
from their hunting-sacks, agreed to remain until
morning.
All the remedies applied to arrest the progress of
Sandford's disorder were vain. He lingered in a
fearful condition for five days, and died a raving
maniac.
The last tie which held Mrs. Sandford to her
emigrant
home was now broken; for, although she had
not confessed it, yet her brother perceived that it was
partly on account of her husband that she had been
so decided in her refusal to return to Connecticut.
He, therefore, renewed his solicitations with increased
earnestness, and, at length, with success. The
summer
was far advanced; yet, unwilling to remain until
spring, Warren resolved on setting out immediately,
even at the risk of incurring the fevers prevalent on
the western waters during the fall season. Hence, in
a few days after Sandford's death, he was descending
the Illinois, with his sister and her three children,
bound for their distant home. The voyage was a
disastrous
one. Warren, himself, was attacked by fever
and ague; and, on arriving at Pittsburgh, the oldest
child suddenly became ill and died. Yet the mother,
frail and sickly as she was, bore up, with that
firmness which woman frequently displays in trials
of the most agonizing nature. It was the middle
of November before the little party arrived at
Hartford.
With what feelings did the child of povertythe
widow, whose husband lay in a drunkard's grave
stand before that mansion, in whose halls, when a
girl, her days had been spent in affluence. Her
brother
was beside her. He rang the bell, and a servant
47
admitted them. Old Mr. Warren heard his son's
voice, and rushed into the hall. There was a
clasping
of the hands in joyful surprise, a wild shriek, and
the daughter fell into her father's arms. The
children
screamed in terror, and clung to their uncle;
while tears, which manhood could not restrain, started
to his eyes.
Thank God! thank God! said the old man, at
last, I have seen my daughter once more.
Can you, forgive me, father? she murmured.
He pressed her to his bosom without speaking; but
in his countenance, beaming with joy, she read
oblivion of the past.
And where is mother? inquired the younger
Warren. The old man was silent.
Caroline gazed long in his face.
I see it! she exclaimed, as a wild burst of grief
came to her relief. Oh, my poor mother! I thought
to get her pardon, and to die in peace. It is I who
have shortened her days, and brought her sorrowing
to the grave. But I shall soon follow heryou will
not have me long, father, to imbitter your age by
remembrances
of the past. Oh. it will be sweet to die,
feeling that we are reconciled!
Caroline, said the old man, what words are
these? but the excitement was too much for his
declining
strength. He sunk with her exhausted upon
a sofa.
Restored to the home of her childhood, to her
father's
blessing, and her brother's care, with ease and
luxury around her, and the past consigned to
apparent
oblivion, would not the mother regain her smile,
and be happy in the society of her friends and her
children? Caroline appeared happy. She strove to
relieve the mind of her father from care, and smiled
when, with almost childish fondness, he would say
that she was once more his own girl. But in secret
when the heart and the countenance did not betray
each otherthere was the fast flowing tear, the prayer,
not for joy, but for that which strong men dread to
contemplate, and the cough which announced that
the prayer would be answered. We may not wonder,
then, that the effort to appear happy was too much
for her. She wasted away day by day, until the eyes
of partial friends could no longer be blind to the
ravages
of disease. Then every remedy which medical
skill could devise was applied; amusements procured,
and varied, and change of climate proposed. They
were vain. Spring came, and while the vegetable
world was springing into renewed life, while the fields
were clothing themselves in a grassy carpet, and beds
of flowers; while youth sought the society of kindred
youth, without whose smile existence was sad and
languidshe who had once smiled brightest amid
these scenes, lay in her chamber, asleep. The soft
wind came through the open window, and curled, at
times, the locks of her hair. It did not disturb her.
An old man, whose few hairs glittered over his
withered brow, like moonbeams around a ruined
pile, held her hand, and raising his own towards
heaven
,
exclaimed, Oh, God! this is not my daughter!
She neither felt his touch, nor heard his voice.
Two children stood beside her couch, but she seemed
unmoved, even though they called ceaselessly for their
mother. She slumbered too heavily to be disturbed
by aught like these. Hers was the sleep of death.
She was buried in the little churchyard, and over
her was placed a simple stone
Sacred to the
Memory of the Emigrant's Wife
.
THE TEMPERANCE LECTURE.
By Amerel
.
One
hot afternoon two gentlemen were riding
together
near the village of R in one of the
Middle
States. When they reached a cross-road which
led directly through the village, the one who held the
reins, stopped the horse, and turning to the other
said:
Ought we not to do something in this village?
We cannot, said the other. We must reach
Lancaster before the close of the week, and you know
how much we have to do after that. Don't let us
pause, unless it be impossible to avoid it.
We can easily make up one day's loss, said the
first speaker. Besides there is misery to relieve as
well in a village as in a city. Yonder I see a tavern
sign swinging; our opponents, you see, have already
obtained a foothold, and ought we not to make an
effort to dispossess them?
But how shall we make up the loss of time?
Stay here to night and to morrow; hold our
meeting
to morrow night; and then travel until morning.
2I
We shall thus gain at least half a day. As to the
remainder
,
leave it to me.
Well, drive up the road. The two men were
soon in the village.
On the following day it was announced that a
Temperance meeting would be held that evening, in
an old building, which had last been used as a
school-house
.
The church could not be obtained.
When the cause of Temperance first began to
excite
public attention, it is well known that such an
announcement would throw the most retired country
village into an uproar. Such was the case at R.
Some, who did not clearly understand what
Temperance
was, clamoured against the attempt to take
away their liberty. Others, with appetites
whetted
by opposition, declared that they would rather
resign both meat and clothing, than resign their
morning
potations of gin and hard cider. A few, zealous
in the cause of education, denounced the authorities
which had granted the school-house to the
Temperance
men, and declared it an insult to an
enlightened
population. Some were for excluding the
strangers from the village; and despairing to
accomplish
the act by force of argument, they talked
vehemently
of a right inherited from their ancestors of
keeping the moral atmosphere of R pure, if not
by fair means by foul.
Such were a few of the speculations and opinions
that disturbed this little village, during the day which
preceded the holding of the Temperance meeting.
In spite of them the school-house was crowded; for
curiosity, that busy principle, is pre-eminently busy
among the inhabitants of a village. Some had come
merely to see the lecturers; some to excite
disturbance
;
a few, well versed in village lore, to advocate
the cause of cider drinking; and some, with a
determination
to disgorge their loaded pockets of stones,
corn-cobs, chicken-bones and other missilesall of
course designed for the heads of the lecturers. For
half an hour, while the audience collected, a din,
like that of any Babel, of all languages and meanings,
arose from the motley audience, baffling the efforts of
the self-constituted committee of order, and threatening
to demolish the crazy building, whose joists and walls
were already cracking. Many of the peacefully
disposed
retired; leaving a fair field of operations to
those who had taken the management of the prelude
into their own hands.
Such were the discouraging prospects, under which
the first speaker mounted the decayed platform where
the teacher's desk formerly stood. He was a tall,
stout man, with the brow and eye of an orator, and
an attitude to awe a mob. Placing his hands behind
him, he looked calmly upon his audience, until as if
by magic, a deep silence pervaded every part of the
room. Then, with a voice which had been modified
to winning softness by experience in many a similar
scene, he began
My friends, permit me to relate to you a true
story. They listened. He told of one who had
been the hope of the household, in which she lived.
He described her, young, innocent, happy, beloved
by her friends, sought eagerly by men of high
standing
in societyof her marriage with one who seemed
worthy of her, and the merry pledges which
accompanied
the wedding sceneof a few years of
happiness
and
then of the crushing reaction which made
her a drunkard's wife, and hurried her heart-broken
to the grave. Then while his audience hung
breathless
upon his words, he poured forth in rapid and
brilliant arguments his reasons against the use of
alcoholic drinks. His hearers maintained profound
silence and seemed pondering over the words which
fell from his lips. Before he ceased a visible change
was observed in the aspect of all in the room.
The other speaker arose. He had not the
commanding
figure of his friend, but his voice was deep
and powerful, and went directly to the heart. The
first speaker had pointed to the evil of intemperance
he showed the remedy. He spoke of the manly
struggle with temptation, of the fallen reclaimed, of
the joy over a prodigal, who, having been lost, was
found. He also related anecdotes; but they were
soothing and encouraging. Tears of ecstatic joy flowed
from many eyes while he spoke.
Lectures like these had never been heard in R.
Men, half ruined by intoxication, shuddered as they
saw their condition, for the first time, in its true light.
Mothers, who had given small drams of cider or rum
to their children, silently vowed to abandon,
altogether
,
so dangerous a practice; young men examined
their habits, wives wept in bitter grief as they
recognized
,
in the pictures delineated, traces of their own
sad experience. Those who had come to excite
disturbance
were orderly; those who had boasted of
their skill in advocating cider drinking, sat speech
less. People who had grown gray amid the ravages
of intemperance, wondered why, for the first time,
they began to consider it a great evil.
And now, exclaimed the second speaker, when
he had finished his lecture, who will sign the
tee-total
pledge?
I will, said a poor old woman, who sat on a
broken box close to the platform. She arose, and
with much difficulty, hobbled towards the lecturer.
I was once as young, and rich, and happy as the
poor girl that the other gentleman told about. But
rum made me poor. Thank heaven, I can still write
my name to the temperance pledge!
And I will sign it, said a miserable-looking man,
in front of the orators. Sir, he said to the second
speaker, I came here to throw stones at you! Here
they are!he drew a handful of stones from his
pocketI did not believe you would tell the truth.
Now, I think differently. Every word you say is true.
I was a fool that I did not see it before. My father
taught me to drink, for he gave me rum, sweetened
with sugar, when I was a little boy. I could curse
him, but I will not He is already cursed. Once I
was a merchant. Look at me now! But I'll sign
the pledge, and keep it, too.
So will I, exclaimed a bloated old man, of some
twelve stone in weight, as he rose suddenly from
among the audience. A great sensation was visible.
2I2
There's Squire Dawson! Squire Dawson's going
to sign! was whispered in every part of the room.
The squire hobbled up the aisle with a gait which
evinced irresistible symptoms of gout; and, seizing
the pen, wrote his name with a trembling hand. Then
straightening himself as well as he could, he faced
the lectures, and exclaimed
Every word you have said is true. Rum has
ruined me, and it ruined my poor boy, Charles, who
lies in yonder churchyard. I have done ten times
more mischief by drinking rum, than I have corrected
by enforcing the law.
By this time another man had pressed up towards
the platform. He was not more than twenty-eight
years old; but indulgence in liquor and other abuses
had whitened his hair, and bent his shoulders as
though by the weight of years. His face evinced
much intelligence, and there was in his features a
mysterious sadness, which at once arrested the
beholder's
attention. Soon as the squire had finished
speaking, this young man stooped down and enrolled
his name on the pledge.
Mary will be glad of it, in heaven! exclaimed
the squire, grasping his friend's hand.
I believe she will, said the other, solemnly.
Gentlemen, said the squire to the lecturers, in a
voice which long habit had rendered authoritative,
this young man is my nephew. He became an orphan
at the age of thirteen, since which time he has lived
under my roof. He studied law in Philadelphia, and,
for a while, he seemed on the high road to success.
Rum ruined every thing; he and I were alike in
that respect. He loved a sweet creature whom we
called Marythe daughter of a physician who once
lived in this village. Rum killed him, too, poor
fellow
.
Mary was proud to be the chosen one of my
nephew. It was a sad parting when he went to study
at Philadelphiashe could scarcely give him up.
Every day, as we found out afterwards, she wrote
something about him in a small journal, and counted
the time which he had to stay. At last, it slowly
moved round. He returned; but he was alteredI
need not tell you how. Poor Mary! it broke her
heart! We buried her in the churchyard, beside my
boy, Charles. There have been sad times since then,
for both of us.
The two men sat down, amid silence interrupted
only by sobs. Others came forward to sign the
pledge; so that it was nearly eleven o'clock before
the meeting adjourned. Forty-two names had been
enrolled in the temperance cause!
The two men gazed upon each other in wonder and
thankfulness. What a work had been done in the
short space of one evening!
Do you still regret, said one of them to his
companion
,
that we have been detained for a day?
My friend, was the reply, would that we
might lose every day in this manner.
Nor did the good effects of that one effort stop
after those with whom it had originated left the
village
.
On the following day, several men were
gathering
in their harvest in the fields near the village
They had been at the meeting of the previous
evening
,
and the names of two or three of them were
enrolled
upon the pledge. When the hour for dinner
arrived, they collected under a large tree, and while
eating, began to converse upon the subject of the
lectures.
Do you think old Squire Dawson will keep the
pledge? asked one.
I have no doubt of it, John. I never saw the old
man so resolute in any undertaking before. But did
you see Briggs, the tavern-keeper?
No. Was he there?
Yes. Every body thinks he came to make
disturbance
.
He missed it, though. While the first man
was lecturing, he appeared very uneasy, shuffling
about from side to side, as if he thought all of us were
watching him; but soon as he saw the squire get
up, he pushed for the door in double quick time. He
knows the squire could tell a tale about him, if he
chose.
I heard that his tavern has not been opened this
morning, said a man, named Greene.
Pity that it ever should, answered another.
But who would think that so much could be said in
favour of temperance?
Or so-much done?
And why cannot more be done? exclaimed the
one they had called John. Why may we not form
a small temperance society, and have rules and
regular
meetings, like other societies, and invite persons
to lecture for us, and endeavour to prevent some in
this village from becoming drunkards?
That is an excellent thought, replied Greene.
Suppose we give notice to our friends that a
meeting to form the society will be held to-morrow
night, at the school-house?
Agreed! they all exclaimed.
One of them, who had not signed the pledge on the
previous evening, drew something from his basket.
I will begin, said he, by throwing this rum
bottle, which has spoiled many a fine lunch, into the
creek there. He did so, with the approbation of his
companions.
The meeting was held on the following evening.
A large society was formed under the most promising
circumstances, and its members went forth already
armed with an influence powerful for good. Such
were the immediate effects of the first temperance
lecture in the village of R. A word spoken in
season, how good it is!
THE MAN WHO ENJOYED HIMSELF.
By Henry Travers
.
I'm
as dry as a fish, Harry, said an acquaintance
who was visiting a young man named Marshall.
Don't you keep any thing good to drink here?
Yes; we've a pump full of the purest water, was
replied.
Pah! water! and the acquaintance manifested
disgust.
There is not a sweeter nor better beverage in the
world, friend Lloyd,
`Water for me, bright water for me.'
And he sung the line merrily.
And have you become a cold water man? said
Lloyd, with a look of surprise.
Yes, replied Marshall, I'm for pure, cold
water.
Well, I'm sorry for you, said Lloyd. Right
down sorry for you! That's all I can say. Never
catch me cutting all the nice little comforts of life
few enough there are at best. I go in for enjoying
myself
So do I; and I never find so much enjoyment as
when my mind is clear.
A good glass of whisky toddy makes the mind as
clear as a bell, said Lloyd.
It never was so in my case.
It's always so in mine. To night I'm as dull as
a deacon.
I hav'n't found you so.
I feel so, then.
Will you have a glass of water?
No. Lloyd shook his head emphatically.
A cup of coffee, then?
Nono.
And the acquaintance made a motion to rise from
49 2K
the table at which he had been playing a game of
chess with Marshall.
Don't go yet. Let's have another game, said the
latter.
Thank you, I've staid longer now than I intended;
I'll call in again some other evening.
I wish you'd stay, urged Marshall.
But Lloyd could find enjoyment here no longer.
He wanted something to bring up his spirits. So he
left the pleasant parlour and companionship of his
friend, to enjoy himself in a bar-room where the air
was loaded to oppression with segar smoke and the
sickly fumes of liquor. Some men have strange ways
of enjoying themselves.
Marshall had a pleasant home in which was a
pleasant wife and a sweet child. He had once tried
to find pleasure in idle company, tavern lounging,
and brandy drinking; but the experience of a few
years satisfied him that he had somehow or other
gotten into the wrong road; and so he turned off into
a better way. He quit tippling, applied himself more
industriously to business and married a wife.
Never catch me at this work, said his friend
Lloyd, when the last mentioned event took place.
I go in for enjoying myself.
So do I, returned Marshall. I never was so
happy in my life as I am now.
Wait a while, retorted Lloyd, smiling. Wait
a while, this is only the beginning.
You'd better follow my example, laughingly
answered
Marshall.
Never. I go in for enjoying myself.
And so the two men went on, each in his own way,
and both seeking to enjoy themselves. As for Lloyd,
he, somehow or other, did not always feel as happy as
he could wish. Tarrying long over the bottle at
night, generally produced morning sensations of no
very agreeable character; and the disarrangement of
business matters, and the marring of his prospects in
life, consequent upon wine drinking and good
fellowship
,
caused him often to be afflicted with the
blues.
Oh dear! This is a hard world for a man to get
along in! was a sentiment which often fell from
his lips. Daily, for all his efforts to enjoy himself,
the lines on the countenance of Lloyd evinced more
and more a downward tendency. In conversation a
light would go over it; but this soon faded, and he
looked as dull and miserable as before. Moreover a
perceptible change passed upon his outer man. The
neat, tidy, particular Mr. Lloyd, grew careless of his
person. Dress became an indifferent matter. He
found no longer any enjoyment here. All his
pleasure
hovered around the cup that inebriates.
Some months after the incident mentioned in the
beginning, a person said to Marshall,
Our old friend Lloyd is in trouble, I am told.
Ah! What's the matter?
The sheriff is on him.
Indeed! I'm sorry for that. How did it
happen
?
He likes to enjoy himself too well.
He's fond of company, I know, said Marshall.
And fond of something else. He drinks like a
fish.
If he only drank
like a fish
, it would be better
for him. A fish takes nothing but pure water, and
that in reasonable quantities.
True enough. He drinks like a beast then.
Don't slander the beast. I never yet saw a dumb
animal who would touch brandy.
Nor did I. Well, I'll get it by and by. He drinks
like a fool.
That's more like it. Poor fellow! I'm sorry
for him. He calls all this enjoyment. But, where
the enjoyment lies, it passes my wit to tell. He didn't
look very happy the last time I saw him.
Nor is he very happy now. Men seek out many
inventions by which to enjoy themselves, and this
drinking is one of them. But the whole system of
tippling is a miserable failure from beginning to end.
I never saw any true enjoyment among dram-drinkers
even while the stimulant was in its first exhilaration.
Afterwards we all know that, `it biteth like a
serpent
,
and stingeth like an adder.'
You say, remarked Mr. Marshall, that the
sheriff is on Lloyd?
Yes.
Is the matter serious?
I believe so. The debt is a thousand dollars, and
he couldn't squeeze this much from his business
without
squeezing the very life out of it. I guess it's all
over with him.
I'm sorry, indeed. Lloyd has some good traits of
character.
Yes; but he is fast drowning them out.
I must go and see him. Perhaps I can suggest
something for his benefit, said Marshall.
If you would suggest sobriety and a better
attention
to business, some good might come of it.
Though I fear me, he is too far gone to hope for a
favourable change.
I will see him at any rate, returned Marshall.
Perhaps I can do him some good. Men in trouble
are more inclined to hearken to the suggestion of
friends.
Prompted by his kind feelings, Marshall went
immediately to Lloyd's place of business. He found
no one there but a boy. Every thing looked
thriftless
and in disorder.
Where is Mr. Lloyd? he inquired.
Hasn't been down since dinner, was replied.
Do you expect him here?
No, sir.
Doesn't he generally come down in the after
noon?
Not often.
He boards at the `Eagle,' I believe?
Yes, sir.
Do you think he is there now?
I can't tell, sir.
Marshall stood and reflected for a little while.
Then he started off, and bent his steps towards the
Eagle Hotel.
2K2
Is Mr. Lloyd in his room? he inquired on
arriving at the house.
I believe he is.
What is the number?
Room thirty-nine, third floor.
Marshall ascended to the third story, and
examined
the numbers until he came to the one he
sought. The door stood ajar; without knocking, he
pushed it a little open, so that he could see within.
At a table, upon which was a bottle and a pitcher,
sat Lloyd, trying to forget his troubles and find
enjoyment
in drinking. In his hand was a glass, half
full of brandy, which he was holding up and eyeing
with a look of stupid, half drunken interest, as if he
hoped to see some good angel arise therefrom and
rebuke the unhappy spirits, by which he was
possessed
.
For a moment or two, Marshall stood and
contemplated
the picture.
And this is enjoyment! said he. And this the
man who enjoys himself! Heaven keep me from
such enjoyment!
Then he pushed the door wide open and entered.
Marshall! exclaimed Lloyd, setting down his
glass quickly, while a slight flush of confusion went
over his face. How are you? This is an
unexpected
visit. Take a chair.
A chair was offered, which Marshall accepted.
The two men looked at each other inquiringly, for
some moments.
I heard to day, said Marshall, at length, that
you were in trouble; is it so?
Oh, dear! sighed Lloyd. Trouble! I've had
nothing else for the last six months. Every thing has
gone wrong with meevery thing.
How has that happened?
I'm sure I don't know. Luck is against me, I
suppose.
Luck?
Yes. Ill-luck has dogged my steps for months;
and now, to cap the climax of trouble, I've got into
the sheriff's hands. He'll make a clean sweep.
Who has sued you?
Carpenter.
What's his claim?
A thousand dollars.
Can't you hold him off for a while?
I've been holding him off, and promising for a
year. Now, he says he wont be put off any longer.
Is there any prospect of your paying him?
If business were not so dull, and times so hard, I
could settle his claim in twelve months.
I don't find business dull, said Marshall.
I do, then. It has been a perfect drag with me
for the last six months, and things get worse and
worse, instead of better.
Perhaps it's your own fault, suggested
Marshall
.
How my own fault?
Do you attend to business properly?
I do all the business that comes to me. I can't
make business.
I don't know about that. I rather think you are
too fond of enjoying yourself.
And Marshall smiled, as he glanced at the bottle
and half-filled tumbler.
Oh! ejaculated Lloyd, indifferently; a man
must have some enjoyment in this life.
He may have a great deal if he will only seek it
in the right way. You, it strikes me, have been
getting
into the wrong way.
There's something wrong, without doubt, said
Lloyd, gloomily.
Undoubtedly there is; and now, suppose you go
seriously to work to find where the wrong lies.
It's too late.
Why so?
The mischief is all done.
Perhaps not.
I'm on my back, without the power to rise.
Carpenter has got his foot on my neckconfound
him!
Perhaps he may be induced to take it off
Not he. He thinks it his last chance to get his
money.
Marshall sat silent for some time. Then he said, in
a serious voice
You will bear the truth from a friend?
Oh, yes. I never was afraid of the truth.
I can point out the cause of your present
difficulty
,
and likewise the remedy.
Can, you, indeed? Then I wish, from my heart,
that you would do so.
There is the cause! And Marshall pointed to the
bottle of brandy that stood on the table.
The eye of Lloyd followed his finger.
What do you mean? said he.
There is the cause! repeated Marshall; and this
time he laid his hand upon the bottle.
For some time Lloyd looked his friend in the face;
then his eyes drooped, gradually, and fell to the floor,
while a heavy sigh came up from his bosom.
Do you wish to know the remedy? inquired
Marshall.
Of course I do, said Lloyd.
There it is! And, with the words, he threw the
bottle from the window.
What do you mean? exclaimed Lloyd,
springing
to his feet in surprise.
I have shown you the cause and the remedy,
replied the friend calmly. Act wisely from the
knowledge now received, and all may yet be well.
It is too late, said Lloyd, resuming his seat.
No, it is never too late, while life remains, to
retrace
the path of error. Give up this poison-bowl, in
which you have too long drowned your reason. Let
your best thoughts and your best efforts centre in
your business, and my word for it, all will come out
right in the end.
But Lloyd shook his head.
Believe that what I say is the truth, urged
Marshall.
50
How can I? Am I not in the clutches of the law,
which never relinquishes its grip while breath
remains
in the body?
Promise me, on your word of honour as a man,
said Marshall, that you will change your manners
of life, and I will undertake to manage Carpenter.
How, change?
Give up drinking and idle company, and put
yourself down to business.
What is life worth, if a man is to have no
enjoyment
?
Not much, I grant. And pray, how much real
enjoyment have you had?
Lloyd shrugged his shoulders.
Enough to make life worth going over again?
No, was the emphatic answer.
And yet there is a great deal to enjoy in the
world. The only defect in your case is, your error in
the adoption of means to the end in view. No man
ever found real enjoyment in the bottle. And why?
It is not there! Its effect is unnatural excitement,
which is followed by depression, to say nothing of the
consequent evil results that must produce their
measure
of unhappiness. This is your history, and the
history of every man who indulges in the pleasures
of the bottle.
Perhaps you are right, said Lloyd, after a long
silence. He sighed heavily as he spoke.
Try a new way to enjoyment; this has failed.
What would you have me do?
Give up, as I have said, drinking and idle
company
,
and all will be well with you again. Promise
this amendment, and I will see that Carpenter is taken
care of.
I promise, said Lloyd, after another long period
of silence.
On your word as a gentleman?
Yes.
I will rely upon it. Good day. To-morrow
morning I will see you at your store.
Very well.
And the two men parted.
Carpenter, by whom an execution had been issued
against Lloyd, was busy in his store when Marshall
came in, shortly after parting with his friend in
trouble.
I want to say a word to you about Mr. Lloyd,
said the latter.
The smile that lit up the countenance of Carpenter
faded.
Do you mean to sell him out under the execution
that now lies against his property?
I do, certainly, replied Carpenter.
It will break him up, root and branch.
I suppose it will; but I can't help that. If not
pulled up by the root now, he will die down to the
root in a little while. If I don't take care to get my
own now, I will never get it; for he is going to the
dogs about as fast as a man ever went. Drink is
ruining him.
I am aware of that. But, I believe he will
reform
.
Carpenter shook his head.
If he should really reform, and attend properly to
business, how long would you give him to pay your
debt, provided his present amount of property were
not diminished, and your security in it were kept
good?
Five years, replied Carpenter, emphatically.
But I have no faith in his giving up the bottle, and
attending to business.
Will you give him a trial?
Certainly. So long as he keeps from drinking,
and attends to his business, I will let my execution
rest, provided no one else attempts to come in, and
get precedence over me.
He has just promised me that he will entirely
reform
his life.
Has he?
Yes.
Then, in heaven's name, let him have every
chance for his life. I will not put a straw in his way.
I saw that ruin was inevitable, and merely stepped
forward to save my own from the wreck; but, if there
is any hope for him, I will not interpose an obstacle.
On the next morning, Mr. Marshall called early at
the store of his friend. He found him there, and busy
at work in restoring things to order. He looked pale
and anxious.
I've seen Carpenter, said Marshall, in a
cheerful
voice.
Have you? Lloyd did not smile. There was
too heavy a pressure on his feelings.
Yes.
Well, what does he say?
Just what I expected him to say. All he wants
is some security for his claim.
I have none to offer.
Oh, yes you haveat least, all that he desires.
Give up your brandy, and attend to business.
Did he say that? A flush came to the face of
Lloyd. There was something indignant in his tone
of voice.
He said what all your friends have been saying
for some time past, that drinking and idle company
were ruining you. He saw that, going on as you
were, your destruction was inevitable, and he merely
sought to save himself.
Lloyd felt exceedingly humbled by all this.
I am not a common drunkard, said he.
Yet you have been indulging so freely, replied
Marshall, that hundreds have observed it, and
predicted
your ruin; and, what is more, the prediction
has been well nigh fulfilled.
So it seems.
But all may be recovered. Abide by your
present
resolution and you need not fear for the future.
Am I to understand, then, that Carpenter will
not sell under this execution?
Certainly. The measure was only one of safety
to himself. Go on, as you are, and pay him as fast
as you can. He says that if the whole claim is
recovered
in five years, he will be content. All the
security he asks is a change in your habits.
I will not disappoint him, said Lloyd,
emphatically
.
And he did not.
Five years have passed since the events briefly
described took place. Lloyd has remained true to his
promise, and is now free from his obligation to
Carpenter
.
Moreover, he has taken to himself a wife,
and in her society at home, where there is a sweet
little babe, he finds a far higher pleasure than he ever
knew while in search of the smiling companion in
drinking-houses and among idle company. As for
the brandy bottle, it has never visited his happy
home, and, we trust, never will.
Do you want to find the man who enjoys himself?
There he is; and his name is Hiram Lloyd.
TWELVE O'CLOCK.
By Henry Travers
.
Oh
dear! muttered Mr. Guzzler, as he stretched
and gaped in bed. I wonder what o'clock it is?
And he tried to rub his eyes open.
It can't be late. Oh dear! O-o-o! AhOush!
And he gaped, and stretched, and shook himself.
I wonder if the sun's up? Yes; for at that
moment, a few rays of light came through his
half-open
lids, and touched the retina as sharply as if
pricked with needles. Yes, it's daylight, but I
guess the breakfast bell hasn't rung yet.
And so Mr. Guzzler smuggled himself down
under
the bed-clothes that he might take a little
morning
comfort. As he did so, a pain shot through his
forehead; and he became aware of a sensation of
vacancy and sickness at the stomach, accompanied by
ardent thirst.
At twelve o'clock, Mr. Guzzler had a business
engagement
of considerable importance to himself. In
fact, he had applied to a person for the loan of some
money, and this person had promised to call at his
store in order to talk the matter over with him at
twelve o'clock.
On the night before, Guzzler, as was his custom,
indulged himself freely in drinking; and, in order to
prolong this sensual pleasure, sat up until all his
senses were drowned by inebriety. Late drinking
usually made late rising, in the case of Mr. Guzzler.
He was hardly ever out of bed before nine o'clock;
and not unfrequently lay until the clock struck ten;
when he would creep forth, feeling about as
uncomfortable
as a man need wish to feel.
O-ow-ah! gasped Guzzler again. On the
present
occasion, he got a little wider awake, and once
more he threw his arms beyond the bed-clothes, and
stretched them to their widest extent.
Rat-tat-tat! Some one knocked at the door.
Well, what's wanted? cried Guzzler, a little
impatiently.
It's twelve o'clock, said a servant, pushing in
his head.
Twelve o'clock! Impossible! returned Guzzler
as he rose up.
It's just struck, sir.
Not twelve?
Yes, sir. It's just struck twelve.
Why didn't you call me sooner, then, you rascal?
I did call you, sir. I called you at nine o'clock.
You must have called in a whisper, then.
No, sir. I called loud, and you answered me.
Twelve o'clock! Too bad! too bad! muttered
Guzzler as he turned out and began to dress himself.
His quick movement and excitement of mind sent
the blood rushing to his head, where the pulses beat
along his temples as heavily and painfully as if they
were the strokes of a hammer.
Twelve o'clock! To think that I should have
overslept myself this way! Too bad! too bad!
Hurriedly throwing on his clothes, and half
performing
his ablutions, Guzzler was soon ready to
leave his room. There was no time to wait for an
extra breakfast. Off for his store he went, hoping
that the individual with whom he had made the
engagement
might still be there. He paused on the
way but once, and that was to get a glass of brandy
and water.
Has Mr. R been here? he asked of his
young man, on entering the store.
Yes, sir, was replied.
Did he wait any time?
Yes, sir; he waited for half an hour.
Did he say he would call again?
No, sir.
How long has he been gone?
51 2L2
Only a few minutes.
Did he say any thing?
He said when he first came in, that he had some
money for you.
Ah! did he make any remark when he went
away?
He told me to tell you that he believed he
couldn't make the arrangement he was talking with
you about.
Couldn't make it?
That's what he said.
The countenance of Mr. Guzzler fell. He stood
for some moments with his eyes upon the floor. Then
a thought went through his mind, and looking up, he
said to the clerk,
Did Mr. R make any remark about my not
meeting him here at the time appointed?
He asked if you had been at the store, this
morning
.
And what did you say?
I told him that you had not.
Well?
He then wished to know if you often remained
away from your business to so late an hour.
Well?
`Not often,' I answered.
Not often! Why didn't you say
no?
Because I couldn't, sir.
You never knew me to be away from my store as
late as twelve o'clock before this, in your life.
Don't you remember, one day last week?
No, sir! I don't remember any thing of the
kind, nor do you, either!
Mr. Guzzler spoke angrily.
A pretty way to speak of your employer, whose
interest you are bound to protect! Had you no sense
nor prudence? And what else did Mr. R say?
Had he any more questions to ask?
Yes, sir. He asked how early you came, as a
usual thing, to the store.
What reply did you make to that?
I told him the truth, sir, answered the clerk,
whose mind was a little fretted.
Why didn't you evade the question?
Because I didn't wish to do so.
What was your answer?
I said you were generally here by ten or eleven
o'clock.
Confound you! exclaimed Guzzler, losing, still
further, his temper.
The clerk became now quite as angry as his
employer
.
Hurriedly taking up his hat, he left the store,
and did not again return.
Alone, and without having taken a morsel of food
since the night before, Guzzler was now in no very
pleasant condition in either mind or body. Moreover,
he had two notes to pay in bank, and no money on
hand.
About half on hour after his clerk went away, a lad
brought him a note, the contents of which we give.
Mr. Guzzler,Dear Sir
:I find that it won't
be convenient for me to lend you the money we
talked about. In fact, to tell the plain truth, I hardly
think it prudent to risk any thing with a man who
neglects his business. No one who lies in bed until
eleven or twelve in the morning, need expect to get
along. Pardon this freedom; but he is the best
friend, generally, who speaks the plainest.
Yours, &c., R.
When bank hours closed, Guzzler's two notes
remained
unpaid. Not long afterwards, he was sold
out by the sheriff, and is now in a poor and miserable
condition. So much for late drinking and late rising.
The man who sits over the brandy bottle until twelve
o'clock at night, and then sleeps until twelve the
next day, in order to get over the effects of his
debauch, mustn't expect business confidence and
success
in trade. The two never go together.
PAYING FOR SPORT.
By Henry Travers
.
L, the distinguished temperance advocate, tells
the following storyhimself the hero.
I was a quiet, steady-going, unexcitable kind of a
personage, and not over fond of adventure, while
sober; but a glass or two of liquor generally took
away all my native discretion and self-respect, and
made me ripe for any kind of a frolic. The
consequence
was, that every now and then I got into some
scrape or other, the result of which always made me
conscious that I had been playing a losing game.
On one occasion, three or four young fellows, about
as thoughtless as myself, agreed, while in liquor, that
we would disguise ourselves, and take a trip up the
river as far as Pittsburg, and there have a first rate
blow out. One, who had been tarrying but a short
time at Jericho, half covered his baby face with
enormous
whiskers; another mounted green goggles, while
I bought a pair of black, fierce-looking moustaches,
and glued them to my upper lip. So metamorphosed
were we, that I hardly think our mothers would have
known us.
In this plight, with plenty of brandy aboard, we
embarked in one of the upward-bound boats, bent on
having a grand frolic. And so we had; but it cost
something to pay the piper, as it generally does in
such cases.
We soon made it clearly apparent to our fellow
passengers that we were a hard party. Some took
note of our sayings and doings with broad grins; some
with frowns; and some with an indifference that
marked their contempt for us as a parcel of
shallowpated
,
drunken fools.
Rum made us feel of consequence; so we showed
ourselves off to still better advantage. We swaggered
about, talked of indifferent matters in loud voices,
swore roundly, and were as ill-mannerly, rude, and
offensive to the other passengers, as it was possible to
be without getting up a quarrel. Every now and
then we repaired to the saloon on the forward deck,
and took in a new stock of excitement in the way of
toddies, punches, slings, cobblers, and so on.
The captain, a bluff, hard-featured, intractable
looking fellow, had, I did not fail to see, his eyes
upon us; and, sometimes, when we showed off some
extra flourishes, I could see a quick contraction
about his heavy brows. But brandy was in the
ascendant, and I did not feel afraid.
At dinner time, I took my place at the table, and
seizing my plate, thrust it towards one of the waiters,
theatrically, at the same time calling out
Here! you fellow! Bring me some roast beef,
rare!
But the fellow chose to wait upon a lady first.
Waiter! I cried, holding my plate to another of
the table-attendants.
But he found it convenient to supply the wants of
some one else before attending to me.
I say! Look here!
But still I was unheeded. The waiters were busy
in helping others.
Waiter! I at length shouted, so loudly, and in
so fierce a tone, that the eyes of all at the table were
instantly upon me.
This brought one of the attendants, at whom I
glanced menacingly, to my side.
Roast beefrare! said I.
Yes, sir. And the waiter vanished with my
plate.
For a few moments I sat patiently; but the roast
beef not appearing, my blood began to move a little
faster in my veins. Nearly a minute elapsed, and
yet I had obtained, thus far, nothing to eat. I turned
from side to side for the waiter to whom I had given
my commission, my anger rising higher and higher
every moment. Many were looking at me, enjoying
my impatience, and I knew it. At length, I saw the
fellow who had taken my plate, very coolly attending
to some one else. For a moment or two I sat and
looked at him, hoping to catch his eye; but, as I
believed
,
he purposely avoided looking at me.
Maddened
beyond control, I sprang from the table, and,
seizing a chair, knocked him senseless upon the floor.
In an instant I was seized and roughly whirled
from the cabin.
Throw him overboard!
Lynch him!
Knock his brains out!
And sundry other cries of a like nature reached
my ears from the crowd of excited beings that
gathered around me.
I began to feel a little sober, and to be troubled
with the intrusion of some not very agreeable
thoughts.
I'll take care of him, gentlemen, called out the
captain, at this crisis, and saved me, I believe, from
being thrown unceremoniously into the river.
Seizing my arm, he forced me down upon the lower
deck, and calling for a rope, fastened me securely to
a post, where he left me in care of one of the hands.
Here I remained for several hours, unvisited by either
of my companions, who were told, as I afterwards
learned, that if they attempted to go near me, they
would be dealt with after a fashion not at all pleasant
to think about.
You may be sure that I was sober enough by
sundown
.
My friendsbrandy, gin, and whiskywho
had inspired me with such a fine flow of spirits, and
such a recklessness of consequences, withdrew the
light of their countenances, and left me sad, spiritless,
and repentant of my folly. What penalty I was about
to suffer, I could not tell. Off-hand justice is never
very partial to the culpritof this I was well aware,
and with good reason dreaded the unknown
punishment
in store for me. We had passed Steubenville a
few miles, when, soon after the sun dipped below the
horizon, the boat came near the shore, on the opposite
side of the river, and I was unceremoniously landed.
A faint cheer went up from the deck of the
steamboat
,
as she swung off into the channel and resumed
her course.
You may be sure that I was as sober as a judge at
this stage of the adventure; and not only sober, but as
heartily ashamed of my folly as a man could well be.
The place selected for my landing was miles away
from any house, at least on that side of the river.
High hills, densely covered with wood, arose almost
from the water's edge. The thought of passing the
night there alone made me shudder.
Seating myself on a fallen tree, I turned my eyes
first up and then down the river, in the hope of
seeing
a boat come in sight. Thus I remained until the
darkness closed in; and still there was no sign of
deliverance. As the sun went below the horizon, a
heavy mass of clouds arose, and gradually spread
over the sky. Not a star, therefore, twinkled in the
firmament. As the night came down the wind arose;
and an occasional flash of lightning heralded an
approaching
storm. Soon the rain came pattering
down; and, in a little while, a fierce tempest was
rushing and roaring around me. So dark had it
become
,
that I could only see to the distance of a few
paces, except when broad flashes of lightning
illuminated
the whole horizon. Cowering for shelter at
the root of a great tree, I endured the drenching of
52 2M
the storm for nearly two hours. Twice during this
time, as the lightning made all, for a moment, clear as
day, I saw a steamboat moving by, and each time
halloed with all my might; but my voice was lost
amid the din of clashing elements.
The whole of that night I passed alone, in my
exposed
condition, suffering more in body and mind
than I can well express in words. At day dawn,
every joint was stiff and painful, and my skin dry,
and hot with fever. It was ten o'clock before I was
taken off by a boat on her way down the river.
When I arrived at W, my native place, I was too
ill to stand on my feet, and had, therefore, to be
carried
on shore.
Two months' confinement to my chamber with a
severe rheumatic fever, and a year's after suffering
from the unexpelled remnants of the disease, were the
penalties I suffered for my drunken frolic.
After that, I was more shy of my particular friends,
brandy, gin, and rum; and finally cut them altogether
as disreputable acquaintances, who were more likely
to get me into trouble, than be of any real advantage
to me.
As for my partners in this wild scrape, they thought
it prudent, after the summary dealings I had met with
from the captain, to behave a little more decently. By
the time they reached Pittsburg, they were cooled
off entirely, and so ashamed of themselves, and
concerned
about me, that they hid their diminished heads.
Early on the next day they took passage for home;
and had the satisfactionif satisfaction it may be
calledof seeing me relieved from my long sojourn
on the river shore; for I was taken off by the boat in
which they were finding their way back. Our
meeting
,
you may be sure, was not of the most joyous
character
.
We had all paid pretty dearly for our sport;
though my bill on that occasion was much the
heaviest.
LOCKED OUT.
By Amerel
.
Amid
the scenes of suffering and sorrow which the
annals of intemperance present, we occasionally meet
with a shade of the ludicrous. There are
individuals
,
who, owing to some peculiarity of their mental
constitution, never become habitual drunkards.
Occasionally
they indulge in a night revel, or a frolic of
longer duration; but when this is over, their appetite
for strong drink seems extinguished, and they remain
sober for months.
Such a character was one Dr. Lightfoot, so called
in the neighbourhood where he resided. The title
was a mere soubriquet; for, though his easy,
unostentatious
manners endeared him to all, yet he had no
great stock of learning, and made no pretensions to a
profession of any kind. Being at all times a jolly
companion, his house was the resort of those who,
leading
a half useless life like himself, knew no way of
relieving the tediousness of time, except in a social
party or a glee club. At such places, and especially
when half intoxicated, Lightfoot was the most
amusing
of drones.
A party of three or four men, to which Lightfoot
had been invited, had assembled one evening at the
house of a man named Goblet. Decanters, glasses,
and dishes of fruit were on the table, and, at times, a
loud laugh or a clapping of hands, announced that an
anecdote or a good story had just been finished. The
liquor was, however, untouched, and the men seemed
to be waiting anxiously for the arrival of others.
Afraid the doctor can't get here, one of them
said, at length.
That will be a disappointment. Is it raining
yet?
You'll believe so if you come to the window. The
poor old man would be drowned, big as he is.
Contrary to all probability, Lightfoot's heavy knock
was heard at the door. He was soon in the room.
Come at last, doctor, greeted his ears as he
entered. A stormy evening.
Terrible. I'm wet, too, he replied, as he stood
2M2
puffing, while the water poured from his umbrella
and coat. The dripping garments were speedily
removed
by his friends.
Why, doctor, you're out of breath, exclaimed
Goblet.
Most dead. The omnibus man wouldn't stopI
chased him half a squaretill die, I thought I would.
I catched upit was full. You know I'm poor at
running.
So you walked the whole way?
Yeswhat o'clock is it?
Just eight, doctor.
I started at sevenit's the way when you're in a
hurry. Let's have a glass, if you please.
Wine was poured out, and the whole party, seating
themselves round the table, rapidly emptied one glass
after another, accompanying the draughts by
extensive
levies upon the cakes and fruit. As the provisions
diminished, the hilarity increased, until the room rang
with shouting and stamping. Songs, anecdotes, and
shouts of laughter were mingled together in
inextricable
and indescribable confusion. One called for a
glee, another for a round; while Goblet, emptying a
wine-glass into his bosom, declared he could drink
and sing at the same time. A few moments
afterwards
,
two of them, having thrown themselves back
in a chair, were singing a double bass, and keeping
time with hand and foot.
Hear me, boys! Goblet shouted. They sang on.
I've a newa new notion. Still they sang on.
Let one of us reciterecite a pagetwo pages
ofShakspeare, and The melody had now
increased
to double forte, and, mingling with the
stamping
of feet, drowned all other sound. Goblet's
proposal
was lost in the din.
During the performance, the doctor had been
lounging quietly in his chair, emptying, with great
industry, one glass of wine after another, while his
small eyes twinkled with delight. It was his habit,
on such occasions, to remain a silent spectator until
his companions were pretty well exhausted, and then
to break forth into exercises of his own, so original
and startling, that they aroused his half-sleeping
audience to another hour's revel. Such was the case
on the present occasion. He saw, with astonishing
apathy, his companions advance, step by step, to the
summit of merriment, and then sink, with head and
elbows, upon the table; but his own turn came at last.
Just as the voices of Goblet and the other two were
dying away in feeble mutterings, Lightfoot, with
stentorian
lungs, burst into the well-known street rhapsody,
We won't go home till morning!
Haa? drawled Goblet's right hand assistant,
raising his head and looking at the doctor, curiously.
By that time, Lightfoot had reached the words, broad
daylight, to which he added a variation of rapid ha!
ha! ha's, accompanied by stamping, which
considerably
disturbed the slumbers of his friends. The
second
verse began still louder, and the singer, swaying
to right and left, marked the time with beats and
accents
,
which made the windows and the decanters
jingle.
What's the matter? exclaimed Goblet, seizing a
decanter.
Chorus, boysfull and strong! the doctor
shouted.
I'm sick, one of them groaned.
We won't go home till morning! roared
Lightfoot
.
And one or two voices, feeble as echoes,
repeated
morning. The doctor, encouraged by such
success, put forth his whole strength, so that before
the close of the song, the entire party were again in
full blast.
Give us another, doctor! arose from all sides.
But the doctor needed no stimulus. Throwing his
head upward, to allow his voice its whole volume, he
poured forth, during more than an hour, songs, catches,
and solos, until the room resembled a bedlam.
Who'll dance? exclaimed Goblet, making a
strong effort to rise.
A dance! a dance! echoed his drunken
companions
;
and Goblet, after several ineffectual attempts,
succeeded in rising. He reeled towards the middle
of the room, and began a series of zigzag steps, amid
the laughter and jeers of his companions. But, in
spite of the powerful encouragement of Lightfoot's
voice, he dared not trust himself upon one foot, but
stumbled backward and forward, while his arms and
head wagged in sympathy with his feet. At last he
moved towards a chair; but, unfortunately, in the
act of seating himself, he struck its edge, and came
down, with a deafening noise, upon the floor. A roar
of laughter arose from his companions; but the fall
sobered Goblet in an instant. The chair, which came
with him, had inflicted pretty severe bruises upon his
head, to which was added the effects of the heavy
shock. For a while he writhed over the floor with
ludicrous contortions of face and figure. Some one
was heard at the door.
Is any thing the matter? inquired a servant,
timidly, looking into the room.
He was ordered down stairs. By the vigorous
exertions
of Lightfoot, Goblet was raised from the floor
and conducted to a chair.
This accident destroyed the hilarity for that
evening
;
and, at a few minutes past midnight, the party
broke up.
Lightfoot's spirits, like an overstrained bow, began
to flag, and a longing desire for sleep came over him,
even before the accident to Goblet. It was precisely
when in this condition that he was the counterpart
of what we have beheld him under the first influence
of intoxicationpeevish, irascible, hasty. The
condition
of the weather was such as to increase these
feelings to an indefinite extent; for of all things,
Lightfoot
detested walking through the rain. This, was,
however, unavoidable; and the old man, after
throwing
out some doleful remarks about pouring,
slush, and his health, stepped upon the
pavement
.
His intellect being in a lethargic state, from
which he partially aroused, only when the recollection
of the rain and the late hour occurred to his mind, he
totally forgot that he held an umbrella under his arm,
and, consequently, walked home without raising it.
53
After a terrible journey of more than an hour's
duration
,
he came to the last corner, round which was a
direct road, with pavement the whole way to his own
door. To any other man this would have been an
occasion of rejoicing; but Dr. Lightfoot was not like
other men; and now, to wound still more his already
lacerated feelings, an envious thought suddenly
occurred
to his mind. It was that of Mrs. Lightfoot,
seated comfortably at home, while he was suffering
in the storm. It almost overwhelmed him. She
don't care if I perish, he muttered, so she's well
herself. Worse and worseit's trickling down my
back. Any woman, to see her husband out such a
night as this! oh! it's dreadful!after ten o'clock,
too! curse the glee club!must have a heart of
flint. Only listen! he groaned, as the wind whistled
over his head. I'll not go out again, if I only get
home alive, no, not for a year.
Lightfoot was now hard by his dwelling. He rang
the bell convulsively, and was soon inside of the hall.
Start about your business! was his first
exclamation
to the servant who offered to take his umbrella.
They'd see a man drown, he soliloquized,
without
asking him if he was wet, or bringing him an
umbrella. Perceiving that useful article under his
arm, he hurriedly seized a light, and ascended the
stairway which led to his room.
It's shut, is it? was his first summons, as he
kicked the door with fearful emphasis. Is it shut?
And you'd see me sufferanother kickwith
coldanother kickat this time of night, would
you!Here he battered the panel with his fist,
you cruel,a kickhard hearted,two kicks
wretch!
By this time audible sounds proceeded from the
room. Mrs. Lightfoot had evidently risen.
Let me in! roared the doctor, charging the door
at full speed.
Thieves! murder! screamed Mrs. Lightfoot.
Open the door, instantly! open the door! And
the panel resounded at each word.
Heaven help us! screamed a woman, rushing
from her room.
What's the matter? exclaimed another, peeping
through the carefully opened door.
The doctor was now plying both feet alternately,
so that the door appeared failing fast. Mrs. Lightfoot
was heard at the window, inside, screaming for the
police; while the servants and boarders, having
reached the scene of disturbance, were enjoying it
with the keenest relish.
Maybe the man wants to see somebody, said a
boarder who had arrived that day.
Kick harder, doctor, exclaimed a waggish young
man, on Lightfoot's right hand.
Such jests, accompanied by shouts of laughter,
increased
his rage to the highest pitch, and, with
doleful
cries, he kicked and knocked the door with feet
and hands. As his temper increased, the mirth of the
group around him reached its height; so that every
knock upon the door was greeted by such expressions
as That's it, Hit him again, Strike, but hear
me, Once more into the breach, &c.; while
inside
Mrs. Lightfoot was heard screaming murder.
Look here, neighbour, exclaimed a bystander,
who thought the performance had gone quite far
enough, It's now nearly two o'clock; and we folks
who stay in at night, want some sleep. If you are so
fond of kicking, go into the street, or I'll call an
officer
to take you.
Why don't she let me in, then?
If you can't get in without all this hubbub, we'll
provide lodging for you I assure you.
Look at me! whined the doctor. I've passed
through more trials than would kill a horse; and
when I come home, all dripping, she locks me out.
Let me in! let me in! and the assault recommenced.
Why, doctor, it isn't you, is it? inquired the
voice within. Is it you, dear?
Let me in, you false, deceitful hypocrite! Let
me in, or I'll stave the door through!
Will you be quiet or not? said the man who had
undertaken to interfere.
Why, dear, exclaimed Mrs. Lightfoot, half
opening
the door, it wasn't locked.
Don't speak to me! shouted the doctor.
Wouldn't it have flown open when I knocked?
wouldn't it, if it wasn't locked?
The doctor had just finished this question when a
hand was laid upon his shoulder.
Hands off! he shouted.
Not at present, was the reply. I want you
with me to-night.
II was trying to get in my room, exclaimed
Lightfoot.
You must go with me.
Oh, sir! exclaimed the poor doctor, much
sobered
,
it's all overcouldn't get in, that's all; but
it's all over.
You must go with me, though, and account for
the night's disturbance.
It ain't necessaryindeed it ain't sir. I was wet,
watchman, and cross; but it's overover.
The watchman shook his head. You must come
along.
Oh, no! no! no! screamed Mrs. Lightfoot,
wringing her hands. Don't take my poor husband!
He's the kindest of men. Please, for my sake, you
won't take him. It's all my fault that I wasn't up
indeed it is!
The doctor's fortitude now gave way. Oh, don't
take me!not to-night! It's only the first offence!
I'll do better in futureindeed I will! It's Dick
Goblet's fault. I didn't want to go. Please let go
my arm!
At length the matter was compromised; and the
doctor, with his wife, was allowed to retire. This
is my last frolic, was heard by the merry crowd, as
the door closed upon them.
THE MAN WHO MADE A BEAST OF HIMSELF.
By Henry Travers
.
If
your husband will make a beast of himself,
said old Mrs. Gnipen, and her harsh features showed
harsher lines than beforeif your husband will
make a beast of himself, that's your misfortune. I've
nothing to do with it. So you needn't come whining
to me.
If Mr. Gnipen wouldn't sell him liquor, ma'am,
sobbed the poor woman, who had received the
repulsive
answer of the landlord's wifeif you and Mr.
Gnipen wouldn't sell him liquor, but would just say
to him, in a kind way
Not sell liquor, indeed! and the old lady drew
herself up in supreme astonishment at such a
proposition
.
And pray, Mrs. Wimbleton, for what
purpose
do you think we keep tavern? If your husband
will make a beast of himself
Now don't say that again, Mrs. Gnipen, said poor
Mrs. Wimbleton, in a distressed voice. My
husband
isn't a beast. Not a kinder man is there alive,
if he'd only let drink alone.
Why don't he let it alone, then? or why can't he
use it in moderation, as a decent man should? Here
he comes, every two or three days, and drinks and
drinks until he makes a fool of himself, and disgraces
our house, which has always been a decent, orderly
house.
Don't sell him liquor, then, Mrs. Gnipen. He
can't drink without going beyond himself. He's
weak in this matter.
No, Mrs. Wimbleton, we never do that. If we
refuse to sell to one man, because his wife comes
snivelling
about, we'll have our house surrounded by
women
in little or no time. Keep your husband at home;
that's all the consolation I have to give you. Keep
him at home, Mrs. Wimbleton.
If
your
husband, Mrs. Gnipen
What have you got to say about my husband?
fiercely inquired the old woman.
If your husband were to come home in liquor,
you'd maybe have a little more feeling
My husband come home in liquor! Mr. Gnipen
get drunk!
The tavern-keeper's wife boiled over with anger,
and she raised her clenched hand, and shook it fiercely
at the poor, shrinking creature, who stood before her.
He's as likely to get drunk as any one, retorted
Mrs. Wimbleton, who felt very much like the
trampled
womandisposed to show that all life was not
entirely crushed out of her.
You'd better not say that again, Mrs. Wimbleton!
You'd better not tempt me too far! No one shall
speak ill of my husband!
He's bloated up now as big as one of his brandy
casks! retorted Mrs. Wimbleton, gaining courage;
and if he isn't brought home on a wheelbarrow,
one of these days, as drunk as a beast, I'm no prophet.
And so good morning to you, Mrs. Gnipen. When
that happens, I'll call and give you my compliments.
Maybe, then you'll have a little more feeling for
others. Maybe, then you won't be so quick to tell
other women about their husbands' making beasts of
themselves.
And saying this, Mrs. Wimbleton retired. The
heat of her anger had dried up her tears. Her form
no longer drooped in attitude. Her step was quick
and firm. As she walked on towards her home, she
met Mr. Wimbleton on his way to Gnipen's tavern.
54 2N2
John, said she, in a quick voice, and she laid her
hand firmly on his arm as she spoke, where are
you going?
Over to Gnipen's, replied Wimbleton, evincing
some surprise at the manner of his wife, so changed
from its usual patient submissive character.
To Gnipen's! And do you know what Mrs.
Gnipen says of you?
What does she say?
Why, that you make a beast of yourself!
How do you know?
She told me so to my teeth, so she did!
And what did you say, Kate? Wimbleton felt
some risings of indignation.
I told her that her husband was little more than
a brandy cask, and that I'd live to see him brought
home on a wheelbarrow.
You were sharp, Kate. Wimbleton laughed.
How did the old crone relish that part of the joke?
Not much. She fairly boiled over with rage.
Brought home on a wheelbarrow! Ha! ha!
Wimbleton seemed greatly amused at the idea.
What put that into your head?
I had to say something to bring the old wretch to
her feeling; and I think I succeeded. To talk to
me of your making a beast of yourself! I couldn't
stand it.
Old Gnipen on a wheelbarrow! Ha! ha!
Wimbleton
couldn't get over that.
Come home, John, said Mrs. Wimbleton, who
still had tight hold of her husband's arm, and now
gently drew him the way she wished him to go.
Don't visit places where they talk of you being a
beast.
Wimbleton yielded to his wife's persuasion; and,
as he walked along by her side, laughed outright
every now and then, saying, as he did so
Gnipen on a wheelbarrow! That's too good!
Now don't go to that tavern any more, John.
Don't! you will kill me! said Mrs. Wimbleton, on
their arrival at home. Don't let people say you
make a beast of yourself. Have more pride, more
respect
for yourself, more respect for me and the
children
.
I won't go there but once more, Kate, replied
Wimbleton.
Don't go at all, John.
Yes, once. When Gnipen is trundled home on a
wheelbarrow, I'm going along to witness his
reception
.
Make a beast of myself, do I?
I was only talking at Mrs. Gnipen. I don't
suppose
it will happen, said Mrs. Wimbleton.
It will happen then, Kate; and that too, before
night, or my name is not John Wimbleton. The
Sporting Club dines at the White Swan to-day, and
Gnipen is always present on these occasions. Last
time, and the time before that, I saw him staggering
home a little before dark, so tipsy that it would have
puzzled him to say whether he were going up hill or
down. This evening he will, no doubt, be in the
same happy state, and prepared to enjoy the ride you
spoke of, amazingly.
And laughing to himself, Wimbleton went off to
the shop where he worked. He had not quite lost
all self-respect, nor was he entirely indifferent to the
feelings of his wife. The fact that Gnipen's better
half should have insulted Kate so grossly, galled him
much more than was apparent to her; and when she
spoke of having retorted after the fashion related, he
instantly conceived the idea of executing what she
had prophesied, at the same time, that he took a strong
internal resolution to abandon a habit that was fast
dragging him down towards disgrace and ruin.
Tom, said Wimbleton, to a half-witted person
who turned a wheel in the shop where he worked
Tom, do you think you could wheel old Gnipen for
the distance of a square or two?
Oh yes, if he'd sit still, replied Tom, grinning
at the novel suggestion.
Very well, Tom, I'll give you two shillings for
the job.
And a treat into the bargain? inquired Tom.
No! Wimbleton looked grave as he shook his
head. No, Tom! This treating is a bad business.
I'm going to stop it. I've sworn off from drinking
any more. When a man drinks until they call him
a beast, I think it's about time to stop.
Dressed up in his best, and feeling his importance,
the landlord went to the dinner of the Sporting Club,
where he drank wine and brandy until he was only
a little above the condition of some of his companions,
who were under the table.
In this interesting condition, he started for home,
carefully setting down his feet at every step, and
vainly imagining that he was going along in a
math-ematical
line, when, in fact, he was, to all appearance,
engineering for the location of a Virginia worm fence.
Suddenly, and without any perceptible warning,
landlord Gnipen found his heels tripped up, and his
rotund body, corporation and all, transferred to some
vehicle, the exact nature of which he could not at
first make out. But, in a little while, his bewildered
senses were clear enough to enable him to
comprehend
that he was riding on a wheelbarrow, attended
by a pretty respectable and pretty noisy escort.
To move from his position he found impossible;
for, like a great turtle, he had been turned upon his
back. To keep from rolling upon the ground, he
clung eagerly to the side of his carriage, which was
rapidly propelled by Tom, in fulfilment of his
contract
with Mr. Wimbleton; while, sober as a judge,
and calmly enjoying his pipe, the last named
individual
walked erect by the side of the tipsy landlord.
Mrs. Gnipen was taking her afternoon nap in her
large cushioned chair, dreaming a pleasant dream
after the subsidence of her indignation, which had
been aroused by Mrs. Wimbleton's slanderous
suggestion
about her husband and a wheelbarrow, when
she was aroused by the noise of shouting and loud
laughter. By the time she was fairly awake, the
door was flung open, and in came the astonished
landlord
to visit his no less astonished wife, in all the
dignity
of a one wheeled carriage, accompanied by a host
of attendants.
Three cheers for Gnipen! cried Wimbleton, as
Tom tipped, dexterously, the wheelbarrow, and
dropped his load at the feet of the landlady. Three
cheers for the man who never made a beast of
himself
!
Three loud and long cheers went up from the
crowd which had been attracted by the novel sight of
Boniface going home from the club dinner, drunk, on
a wheelbarrow.
Now, right about face and march! added
Wimbleton
,
moving towards the door as he spoke; and the
crowd, imitating his example, left Mrs. Gnipen to
console herself as best she could over an event that
was to her humiliating beyond conception.
Now Gnipen, though engaged in a calling that
reflects
honour on no man, but rather disgrace, had the
organ of self-esteem largely developed. He considered
himself a person of standing and importance in the
community, and, if the truth were told, a little better
than his neighbours. Terrible, therefore, was his
mortification, when, on a return to sobriety, he
became
fully aware of the disgraceful liberty that had
been taken with him; and that it was all over town
how he had been taken home drunk on a
wheel-barrow
.
As for Mrs. Gnipen, she could not hold her head
up in the bar-room, and showed herself there no
more. Something of what poor wives suffered, whose
husbands she had helped to debase, she now
experienced
,
and no one pitied her suffering. As for Gnipen
himself, the cruel jibes and jeers of his free and easy
drinking customers galled him so terribly, that, after
enduring them for a little while, he became fretted
beyond endurance, and, selling out his tavern, went
off and set up in a neighbouring town. But the story
of his wheelbarrow adventure followed him there.
This, and the fact of not doing very well in the new
stand, finally drove him off into the country, where
he is now engaged in the more honourable and useful
employment of a farmer.
Wimbleton kept his good resolution, much to the
joy of his wife.
THE TEMPERANCE GROCER.
By Amerel
.
In
that portion of the Connecticut valley which
forms part of Massachusetts, is a town now one of
the most flourishing in the district, but no later than
a generation ago, small and unimportant. Fifteen
years since, the largest store in the town was kept by
one Thomas Argall, a native of the place. As is
usual in village stores, he sold every thinggroceries,
drygoods, cutlery, medicines, liquors, farming
implements
,
fancy goods, confectionaries, and poultry.
Argall
was a jolly fellow, and being known by every
body for miles around, his business thrived
wonderfully
.
Of course his store was a favourite resort of
the town people, especially after the postoffice for
the district had been established there. Old farmers,
from a distance of thirty or forty miles, who neither
received letters nor expected to receive them, called
at the postoffice whenever in town, and after
lamenting
the neglect of their correspondents, sat down to
spend the day. When the labourers of the town were
released by the approach of night, they collected at
Argall's to smoke, chat, tell tales, and sing songs; so
that his establishment often resembled a tavern or
beer-shop, instead of a store for the sale of useful
articles.
Among the classes of articles that formed Argall's
stock, liquors occupied a conspicuous place. The
revenue derived from the sale of them was great, for
he supplied not only his own town, but most of the
villages for miles around. Always accommodating,
he sold small quantities as well as large; and this
rendered him a general favourite with those, who, on
numerous occasions, found their cash proper to
amount to no more than three or five cents.
Thus for many years the business of the Grocery,
55 20
Liquor, and Variety Store, advanced prosperously,
and its proprietor accumulated money. It is true,
there were many drunkards about the town; nor
could it escape the intelligence of the dullest person,
that they bought the liquor, which intoxicated them,
at Argall's. But in those days such matters were
regarded
as matters of course. If a man choose to be
a sot or a brute, who had the right to hinder him?
Let each one mind his own business, and allow the
rest of mankind to get along through life as they
choose. If they ran the race without stumbling, well.
If half a dozen did stumble, let the hind ones pass
them. If a few like the drunkard fell, let no dunce
stop to pick him up, because it is plain to all, that
every body has a right to fall. Such was the
reasoning
of that day; and its cruel sophistry crushed the
struggling hope of many a wretch from misery to
despair, and sheltered the rum-seller from the
withering
indignation of his fellow-men.
The winter of 1833, was one of great severity
throughout the district in which the town was
situated
.
In January, Argall had occasion to visit a
village
in Connecticut, at which time he was absent
more than a week. He returned late in the evening;
and on the following morning no small stir was
created among his neighbours by the discovery that
his sign was down. While various speculations
were advanced to explain this phenomenon, news was
circulated that another sign had been hoisted, bearing
the words
Temperance
Grocery, and Variety Store.
This threw the town into a ferment, or rather uproar.
Trusty agents were despatched from all quarters to
ascertain if the rumour was true; and on their
reporting
in the affirmative, a consultation was held, on
the propriety of repairing in a body to the store, and
inquiring into the cause. All were alarmed at the
idea of a Temperance store; but that Argall seriously
designed to stop selling liquor, nobody could believe.
In the evening the store was filled. All ages and
both sexes were represented, each clamouring to know
why the store had been changed to a Temperance
grocery. After the tumult had somewhat subsided, a
man named Warren, advanced before the counter,
and asked the storekeeper if he had actually intended
to sell no more liquor.
I will neither sell nor buy another drop! was
the answer.
A confused din of voices succeeded this
announcement
.
The passions of many in the crowd were
evidently rising.
How do you expect to live? asked another
I will live by keeping a Temperance grocery
store, Argall replied.
Ha, ha! exclaimed a third speaker. A
Temperance
groceryha, ha, ha! Won't sustain you a
year.
Then I'll lock up the store and go to farming,
was the firm reply.
What on earth put this notion in your head?
exclaimed a disconsolate toper.
He's a foolthat's it, resumed another. And
I must tell you, Argall, I always thought you were a
mean, low-principled little fellow.
You didn't think so last winter, when I helped
you out of that rent difficulty with old Benson,
answered
the storekeeper.
Let's go and get liquor where we needn't thank
Tom Argall for it, said a rough looking labourer, as
he turned towards the door; and remember, he
added, turning suddenly, and elbowing through the
crowd to shake his fist in the storekeeper's face, you
get no more money from me!
No, nor from me either! echoed another. Two
or three passed out; but the crowd remained,
seemingly
for the purpose of bringing their refractory
storekeeper to a strict account. During the few
succeeding moments of confusion, Argall leaned
forward
with his hands upon the counter; but when
the noise had somewhat abated, he drew himself into
an attitude favourable for speaking, and requested
the crowd to listen. Silence ensued, and he began.
I will tell you, neighbours, why I have altered
my sign. You know I have been in Connecticut,
and during the week past have journeyed a good
deal among the towns and villages of that State. The
weather has been as cold there, and the snow as deep
as it is here to-day; and folks had hard work to
keep themselves warm, even with three coats on.
Last Thursday night, I had to walk three miles on
business which could not be postponed. It had
snowed hard since noon; and at seven o'clock, the
time I started, the ground was covered to the depth
of a foot. But I plodded on, over the fields, reached
the house, and transacted my business. To return
was more difficult. It was still snowing, softly but
fast; and while wading over the buried footpath, one
found it very difficult to keep himself warm. I took
a different route from the one I came by, which,
being sheltered by a ridge of hills, was not covered
so deeply as the others. After travelling about a mile,
I perceived a light at a distance, glimmering through
the snow. Glad of the prospect of warming my numb
limbs, I hurried on till I got near enough to
distinguish
the building. It appeared to be a hut, rather
than a house, and the outward appearance was in a
more miserable condition than any house that I ever
saw in New England. I was now near enough to
hear loud cries, which increased to screams, and the
stamping of feet upon the floor. At first I was
apprehensive
that either thieves had broken in, or that the
hut was a resort of gamblers; but this opinion was
contradicted by the voices of women and children.
As the screaming increased, I hurried, as fast as
possible
,
over the fence and up the yard, which stood
before the house. The noise was at its height when
I reached the door. `Should I go in?' I said to
myself
.
A child screamed murder. I placed my hand
on the latch. Suddenly the door was torn open, and
a woman, half naked, ran by me. I grasped my
crab-tree cane, and rushed in.
And now, neighbours, continued the storekeeper,
listen. A man, all in rags, and in a beastly state
of drunkennessthe most disgusting spectacle I ever
2O2
beheldwas pursuing a little boy round the room.
As the little fellow leaped, screaming about, over
broken chairs and stools, the fatherfor such he
wasmade terrible blows at him with a pair of tongs.
He had struck him on the arm, and disabled it; and,
just as I entered, he was aiming a blow at his head.
A girl, older than the boy, sat on her knees, crying
and wringing her hands.
My sudden entrance stopped this fearful scene;
and while I demanded what was the matter, the
children
ran and couched behind me. For a while the
infuriated father seemed preparing for an attack; but
in a few minutes he dropped the tongs, and sunk
helpless upon the floor. The wife came in soon after,
and sad, indeed, was the spectacle, when she and her
children gathered round to thank and bless me.
There was no stove in the room, nor any fire, except
a little tan in the chimney-place, which rather
smoked than burned. The boy had neither coat,
vest, nor shoes on, and the other two were clad in
garments thin enough for summer.
After binding up the boy's arm as well as I could,
I prepared to depart. But they begged me to remain,
crying and exclaiming that they would be killed
when the drunken man awoke next day. But I
promised
to return early the following morning, and
adopt some measures for removing them to the
neighbouring
village. I did so; and through the kindness
of some friends, who cheerfully assisted me, the wife
and children of the drunkard were removed that day.
It drew tears from the eyes to see these hungry,
half-naked creatures, clapping their hands with joy,
at being delivered from the power of him who should
have been their protector. Before I left the village, I
learned that this woman is the daughter of a
merchant
,
who died some years ago in Boston, and that,
when married, she enjoyed all the luxuries which
wealth, beauty, and an apparently happy marriage
alliance could furnish. How exquisite must be her
feelings, when she reflects on the scenes of former
years, I leave you to imagine.
And what's that got to do with taking your sign
down? growled a loafer, who with his back against
the wall and his hands in his pockets, had been
listening
impatiently for the conclusion of the
shopkeeper's
story.
It has this much to do with it, answered Argall.
I believe the liquor which that man drank, came
from my store; for every one here, knows that I
supply
both those villages, and many others still further
south. If you would have told me a month ago, that
I was pursuing a course which brutalizes men,
impoverishes
families, and arms the father with insane
rage against his children, I would have thought or
cared little about it. But I have seen a spectacle of
wretchedness such as no words can portray. It has
haunted me ever since. I will no more spread the
seeds of wickedness. You may do as you please
either patronize me, or patronize another; but rather
than have the fearful account to answer for of the
misery of my fellow-men, I will abandon my
business
.
And you may abandon it, exclaimed half a dozen
voices.
You are a mean, cowardly, chicken-hearted
fellow
!
added a butcher, as he struck his fist upon the
counter.
Call me what you please, said the storekeeper,
you'll never shake my resolution.
But we'll shake your custom.
My conscience is clear, replied Argall. Rum
is an evil, and I am done with it. Tell me, he
added
in a louder voice, is there no woman here who
has been driven from her house by a drunken
husband
?
There was a pause.
And has no one here, been carried home beastly
drunkdragged from under hedges, hauled out of
ditches, pulled through mud and rain, snow and
storm, until he had lost all semblance of a human
being. Has no one ruined his health by strong drink?
Has no one lost his property by strong drink? Has
no one run in debt, through strong drink? And did
drinking rum ever make a man rich, or wise, or
amiable, or dignified? Think over these questions,
before you condemn me for taking the step I have
taken.
Lecture a little longer, Tom, said a toper.
I'll drink when I please, and as much as I please,
exclaimed another. It's a free country. If a man
gets drunk, its nobody's business but his own.
But it's my business, not to sell liquor, replied
the storekeeper.
Mr. Argall is right, said a woman, who had
listened attentively to all he had said. Many a
time poor neighbour Smith ran into my house to hide
from her brute of a husband. I wish all liquor was
thrown in the Connecticut.
And I too, exclaimed another woman. I know
what it is to have a drunken son. Let men but
gratify
their appetites, and they care not how much
suffering
they bring on us women.
The excitement had now increased to a fearful
extent
;
and but for the self possession of Argall, he
would have been pulled from behind the counter.
The company remained until nine o'clock, when
perceiving
that they had effected nothing, they began to
dispersemost of them swearing that all intercourse
between themselves and Tom Argall was at an end,
and for ever.
Argall kept his resolution. For more than a
month, his store was daily beset by farmers and others
from adjoining districts, who, after standing in the
road to spell the new sign, rushed into the store with
loud exclamations of what's the matter?
Indignation
generally succeeded astonishment; and they,
like Argall's neighbours, declared that their
connection
with the store was at an end. The consequence
was, that in a very short time, Argall's sales were
reduced
,
more than fifty per cent. But he would
neither yield nor compromise; and after two months'
abstinence from the store, the people of the town
discovered
that he could get along without them, much
better than they had anticipated. Gradually they
restored to him their custom; and before the
expiration
of that year, the business of the Temperance
Grocery was as flourishing and profitable as that of
the former store had been. In due time Argall started
a Total Abstinence movement, which met with
success
,
beyond his hopes; so that he was soon able to
number among his friends, those who had once sworn
away all connection with him.
GEORGE SANDFORD.
By Amerel
Let
us, at all events, maintain a regular
correspondence
with each other, said a young man to his
brother, as they stood by a steamboat, on which the
speaker was about to step.
Certainly, was the reply. But Charles, what is
that one subject to which you alluded last night, as
of the first importance to myself?
I almost fear to mention it.
Speak freely, answered the young man; I
have promised to take no offence.
Then, brother, to be plain with you, I fear that
you are imbibing an appetite for strong drink, which
may one day make you miserable.
Nonsense! answered his brother. Do you
suppose
the little that I drink could harm any body?
Perhaps not; but remember that you drink twice
as much now as you did six months ago; and at least
four times as much as you did a year since. What
assurance have you that your present quantity will
not be doubled six months hence?
There may be something in that; but after all, I
have no fears of ever drinking to excess. Even
Annette
,
who rates me hard enough about every little
fault, hasn't thought of that yet.
Do you think not?
I know she has not.
Yet, George, you told me only a week since, that
an unaccountable sadness had lately mingled itself
with her words and actions, and which it seemed as
vain for you to attempt to dissipate as to explain.
May there not be some connection between that
fact and the subject we have been speaking about?
Well, I will think of it, the other replied. In
the mean while, do not be afraid of my turning
drunkard; for, he added, laughing, Annette will
watch me, I promise you.
The two men parted. George, the younger one,
was slightly mortified by the conversation we have
narrated, although he exhibited no symptoms of his
feelings to his brother. Yet he could not stifle the
consciousness that his love of liquor was gradually
strengthening. But he quieted himself with the
reflection
that it would be easy for him at any time to
break off the evil habit, and consequently he gave
little heed to his brother's advice. Having been but
recently married, with every prospect of happiness at
home, and success in business, he was not disposed to
interrupt his present enjoyments, by gloomy
anticipations
of the future.
His brother Charles had gone to Europe on a
professional
tour. During more than a year, a regular
correspondence was maintained between them; but
after this it languished, and then ceased. Charles
remained
in Europe three years; and during the last
eighteen months of this time, he heard nothing of his
brother.
It was, therefore, with feelings more like sadness
and fear, than joy, that he once more reached his
native city after so long an absence. As his parents
had long since been dead, he proceeded to the former
residence of his brother. George had moved, but
none of the neighbours knew where. The traveller
walked rapidly down the street to the house of a
former friend, but he was also gone. Several other
visits were attended with a like result. He began to
be alarmed; and, after standing some time in
uncertainty
,
moved towards a large store, for the purpose
of consulting a directory. While doing so, a
miserable
looking loafer reeled out of a grog-shop, and
came down opposite to him. Before our traveller
could step out of the way, the drunken man extended
his hand, and exclaimed
How d'ye do, brother?how d'ye do? at the
same time wagging his hand up and down, while the
other was thrust into his pocket.
The other turned aside, and was about walking
on.
None of your shyshy tricks, Charley, said the
drunken man, staggering from side to side, and
nodding
his head.
Charles started, and scrutinized his new
acquaintance
with intense interest. Surely, this was not his
brother, George!
2P
I ain't drunk, he drawled, as his body swayed
to and fro, with wondrous flexibility. I can take
care of myselfI cancan't you, Charley?
Who are you? exclaimed the astonished
traveller
.
The other placed both hands in his pocket, and,
balancing himself as if on wires, looked at Charles
curiously with one eye, the only one open.
I'm George Sandford, he replied, again
extending
his hand.
You! exclaimed his brother. George
Sandford
!
and involuntarily he raised his glass to his
eye. It was so. The wretched object before him,
ragged, hatless, and drunken, was the brother who,
at his departure for Europe, had entered upon life
with every prospect of success.
Charles Sandford accompanied his brother to his
residence. It consisted of but one room in the second
story of a house, located in a disagreeable part of the
town. Here, amid destitution of the most trying
nature
,
sat Annette Sandford, holding an infant on her
knee, while another, two years old, was standing
crying
by her side. The alteration upon her husband
had not been greater than that which grief had
produced
upon her.
Is the babe sick? asked the elder Sandford, after
the first salutations were over.
It has never been well, brother, Annette
answered
.
It wastes away daily.
What is it's name?
Charles, the other answered. We named it
after you; but it will not live to name you.
There was a pause. You have altered, Annette,
the brother would have said, but he feared to wound
the poor wife's feelings, and refrained. Unlocking his
carpet bag, he took from it some food, and called the
little girl to him. She clapped her hands with joy, as
the welcome meal was offered to her, eating it with an
eagerness which showed that she had not tasted food
for many hours.
A change has come over us, Charles, said the
wife, as she strove to conceal her emotion.
The brother nodded.
We waited long for you, she continued, but
you did not come. Many a night I have lain awake,
wishing I could but see you once more.
And you have suffered so long, alone?
Oh, brother, I have suffered! she answered.
If I should tell you all the shame, and sickness, and
racking anxietybut I will not complain. God will
deliver me some day from this world of misery. Yet
it is for my little ones that I am willing to live and
suffer here a few years longer.
You must go with me, Annette.
Where?
To a place of comfort, where you may live as
you deserve to do. Your children shall be with you,
with servants of your own choice, and a house to
yourself.
But, brother, must I be alone?
What do you mean, Annette?
Oh, Charles, I scarcely dare mention it! You are
too kindyet my husbandI cannot help it, brother,
but miserable and degraded as he is, I love him
still.
He shall be provided for, sister; but he must no
longer have the opportunity to make life a burden to
you.
But I will see him sometimes?
Yes.
And know that he is taken care of?
Yes.
The arrangements were soon completed. Mrs.
Sandford was transferred to commodious apartments,
and every effort made by Charles to reclaim his
erring brother. For a while there seemed little
prospect
of success; but ultimately he signed the
temperance
pledge, and became as respectable and useful,
as he had been worthless.My dear Daughter
,As I write this, you are
playing about my room, a happy child, and all
unconscious
of the great loss you will soon have to bear in
the death of your mother. Not long have I now to
remain upon the earth. The sands in my glass have
run low; the life-blood in my heart is ebbing; a few
more fluttering pulses, and my spirit will take its
flight from earth.Ah, my child! not until you are
yourself a mother, can you understand how I am
distressed
at the thought of leaving you alone in this
selfish and cruel world! But I will not linger on
this theme.
Mary, when this letter is placed in your hands,
you will be a womanwith the heart, I trust, as well
as the developed mind of a woman. Your aunt Helen
has promised to take you, and raise you as her own
child. You, therefore, will scarcely feel, I hope, your
loss. But it will be different with your brother Alfred.
A somewhat wayward boy, he has never made many
friends, and none will be so patient and forbearing
towards
him as I have been. Most probably he will be
sent to some boarding-school, and kept there until old
enough to commence the study of a profession. There
will be no mother's care for himno sister's loving
and gentle ministrations. And thus he will grow up
and become a man. Ah! how my heart trembles as
I think of the dangers that will surround him as he
enters the world, free from the restraints of
guardianship
,
and unprotected by the sphere of home. It is
for him, Maryyour brotherthat I now address
you; and my purpose is to awaken in your mind for
him something of the anxious interest that I feel.
Where is he now, Mary? (I speak as though years
have elapsed.) What is he? Do you know? When
did you see him last? I put these questions with
trembling anxiety. Has he wandered from the right
path in search of forbidden pleasures? and is he
tasting
already the bitter fruit that hangs from every tree
that grows along the way of transgression? If so,
yours is the holy mission to bring him back. From
the world of spirits let my voice come to your ears
with this injunction.
If the fears I now express be groundlessif my
dear boy have passed thus far through the fiery ordeal
untouched by the flame, draw close to his side. In a
sister's pure, unselfish, devoted love lies a brother's
safety.
May the God of all mercies bless you and keep
you free from evil, my child.This is the tearful
prayer of
Your Mother
.Mr. Guzzler,Dear Sir
:I find that it won't
be convenient for me to lend you the money we
talked about. In fact, to tell the plain truth, I hardly
think it prudent to risk any thing with a man who
neglects his business. No one who lies in bed until
eleven or twelve in the morning, need expect to get
along. Pardon this freedom; but he is the best
friend, generally, who speaks the plainest.
Yours, &c., R.